Authors
David Dalgleish
Number of Reviews
66

Title
Review for Haitan de yitian (1983)
"With all that education, you should know what happiness is."
Starring Sylvia Chang, Teresa Hu, Hsu Ming, Li Lieh, Mao Hsueh-wei;
Directed by Edward Yang;
Written by Yang and Wu Nien-chen;
Cinematography by Christopher Doyle and Chang Hui-kung
Every country has, eventually, its New Wave.  France had its Nouvelle 
Vague, Brazil its Cinema Novo, China its Fifth Generation, and on and 
on.  Some waves just take longer than others, before they wash over 
us, cleansing us with the balm of discovery.  Taiwan's New Wave came 
in the 1980s, in the work of directors like Hou Hsiao-hsien, Wan Jen, 
and Edward Yang; THAT DAY, ON THE BEACH--Yang's first feature--is 
central.  It created a new language for young Taiwanese directors, 
even if the first attempts to speak that language were hesitant and 
faltering.  Later works refined the techniques that Yang first 
explored here, giving Taiwan a distinctive international presence.  
THAT DAY itself is long and frustrating, the document of a nation's 
attempt to find a voice.
It does not lack ambition.  It anatomizes urban life in modern 
Taiwan, in the manner of Antonioni, elaborating the alienation that 
the Westernized white-collar middle-class feel as their lives are 
shaped by old-fashioned roles--dedicated career men, loyal 
housewives--that they find unfulfilling.  Jia-li (Sylvia Chang) is the 
focus, but the film brings others into its compass--her husband, her 
brother, friends from her college days--as it charts her discontents.  
No one is happy.  Jia-li married her husband, We-lei, at a young age.  
At the time, her brother had been urged into an arranged marriage, 
despite his affection for another woman, and so Jia-li's marriage 
seemed, in comparison, a good one: she chose We-lei of her own free 
will, they loved each other.  But it goes wrong.
THAT DAY dutifully presents all the clichés: We-lei becomes absorbed 
in his career, indulges in an affair with a co-worker; Jia-li feels 
restless and trapped, bound by a choice she made while young, but 
which no longer seems wise.  The film never redeems these clichés by 
conveying the feel of authentic experience, the intensity of lived 
pain, and much of it seems trite and belaboured.
It unfolds, awkwardly, as a series of flashbacks, told during a 
luncheon in Vienna, where Jia-li meets her brother's old flame (Teresa 
Hu), now a concert pianist, whom she has not seen since college.  Both 
women seem rather sad, and resigned to their sadness.  Their 
circumstances (and those of Jia-li's brother and a college friend) 
suggest not so much that they have made the wrong choices--married the 
wrong man, chosen the wrong career path, etc.--but rather that the 
choices available to them were inadequate.  It is not that Jia-li 
married the wrong man; she didn't.  The problem is that she needed to 
marry at all--and that if she did not marry, she would still be just 
as unhappy.  For a woman in modern Taiwan, THAT DAY tells us, the 
cards are stacked, the dice are loaded: she can play the game, but the 
house always wins. 
The film's sympathetic feminist implications are presumably the 
reason it caused such controversy upon its release in Taiwan.  Seen 
now, it does not seem provocative.  Indeed, it's hard to imagine 
anyone having felt passionate enough about the film to generate any 
controversy: it may be ambitious, it may be innovative, but it is also 
terribly, terribly dull.  And what was new for Taiwan was not 
necessarily new for the rest of us: Yang adopts methods established 
years before by Antonioni and others, and his use of those methods is 
fumbling, uncertain, undisciplined.  Nor does he bring anything 
new--other than the locale--to the material.
There are moments when THAT DAY takes on some of the emotional 
richness it strives for--in a young couple's first kiss, in the 
awkward meeting of a woman and her husband's mistress--but they are 
brief.  Too often, Yang devotes needless time to mundane 
scenes--grocery shopping, flower-arranging--in which nothing happens, 
little is said, no emotion imparted.  Perhaps, if the film were 
content to focus on such reflective, inward moments, leaving us to 
guess at thoughts and feelings, it might have been ambiguous, 
suggestive, insinuating.  But Jia-li and her disaffected companions do 
not only brood in silence: they talk about their problems, at length, 
in detail, redundantly, and eliminate all subtleties.  At two hours 
and forty-five minutes, it all seems exorbitantly long, indulgently 
long-winded.
Consider the defining moment for Jia-li, the titular day on the 
beach.  The thrust of the whole film explains, easily enough, what we 
are to think of that moment, what it means when she walks away from a 
particular situation.  Even so, the film has not one but two 
characters explain it for us verbally, in case we may have missed the 
point.   Needless time is devoted to expressing what should have 
remained unexpressed, and that is the problem throughout.
The look of the film is as tedious as the drawn-out narrative.  It 
was the first feature shot by Christopher Doyle--at least, it's his 
name in the credits--who is now rightly regarded as one of the world's 
leading cinematographers.  In the freewheeling expressionism of his 
work with directors like Chen Kaige and Wong Kar-wai, he seems 
incapable of fashioning a boring image.  You would never know it from 
watching THAT DAY, which, due either to Doyle's inexperience or Yang's 
humdrum direction, is almost perverse in its insistence on making the 
physical environment seem as drab and banal as possible.  In 
scrutinizing the long decay of a marriage, THAT DAY manages to capture 
the ennui of the experience, but none of the damage, none of the 
heartbreak.

Title
Review for Manhattan Murder Mystery (1993)
"We could be living next door to a murderer."
The first few minutes of MANHATTAN MURDER MYSTERY are as familiar and 
pleasing as the opening notes of a favourite song.  The 
black-and-white opening credits.  New York.  Jazz.  Upper-class 
neurotic intellectuals.  One-liners.  Allusions to classic movies.  We 
have entered Woody Allen territory.
Allen, because he knows this material so well, establishes the 
situation, the tone, the characters of MANHATTAN MURDER MYSTERY, in a 
few brief, economical scenes, then moves us swiftly into the plot: 
Larry and Carol (Allen, Diane Keaton) meet an elderly couple who live 
on the same floor of their apartment building, and then the wife dies 
of a heart attack the next day.  Or does she?  Carol thinks the 
husband (Jerry Adler) doesn't look sufficiently upset by his wife's 
death; she snoops, and is soon fabricating a complicated theory 
explaining how and why the husband may have killed his wife. 
Larry doesn't buy it.  He sees the neighbour as a harmless fellow, 
who gets his kicks from showing off his stamp collection; he's not the 
murdering kind, and Larry thinks Carol has seen DOUBLE INDEMNITY one 
time too many.  Besides, while she thinks the possibility of living 
next door to a murderer is the most exciting thing that's ever 
happened to them, and a welcome break from their "dull routine," Larry 
is quite happy with his routine, and if the neighbour is a killer, he 
doesn't want to know about it, much less investigate.  So Carol, 
enduring Larry's barrage of fretful complaints, enlists their mutual 
friend Ted (Alan Alda) to join the investigation, and later Marcia 
(Anjelica Huston) also becomes involved (a plan she suggests involving 
tape recorders and a phone call leads to the film's biggest laugh).
That this is funny is no surprise.  Allen can write great dialogue in 
his sleep.  Larry, trapped in an elevator: "Don't tell me to 
relax--I'm a world-renowned claustrophobic."  Larry, talking to Carol 
about Ted: "Take away his elevator shoes, his fake suntan, and his 
capped teeth, and what do you have?"  Carol: "You."  The chemistry 
between Allen, Keaton, and Alda is terrific; Keaton and Alda have 
worked with Allen before, and this is apparent in the effortless way 
they inhabit their roles.  They are so (seemingly) artless that many 
scenes seem half-improvised.  Allen has great fun putting his habitual 
persona in the thick of a murder mystery: his paranoia and anxiety are 
played up to good effect, as he offers a running commentary of fear 
and doubt throughout each escapade.
What is surprising is how effective the mystery is.   By the midway 
point, I was hooked; the plot had gone places I didn't think it would 
go, and I was eager to know how it would all turn out.  The use of 
handheld camera and long takes are vital: when Carol sneaks into the 
neighbour's apartment, this visual style gives the film an edgy, 
pseudo-documentary feel that makes the scene surprisingly tense.
The suspense and humour are neatly woven together.  Allen seamlessly 
merges these two disparate moods by having the characters themselves 
treat the possible murder as little more than a joke: they see it as a 
welcome source of excitement, and gather in trendy, upscale 
restaurants to discuss what might have happened, lifting ideas from 
movies and books.  It is a game, a fiction.  Murder is not real to 
these comfortable Manhattanites, even if it should happen next door.  
This allows Allen to have a lot of fun with some dark subject matter, 
without being too frivolous.
This blend of wit and morbidity is the most original element here, 
and Allen deftly, convincingly handles the transition from innocuous 
amateur sleuthing to something more sinister.  Otherwise, he doesn't 
really do anything new--there are no great revelations, there is no 
pushing of the boundaries.  He simply does what he usually does: sees 
with a keen eye the way human beings behave, and turns his 
observations into something funny, fast-paced, engrossing.  It may be 
routine for Woody Allen, but it's not dull.

Title
Review for Comtesse de Bâton Rouge, La (1998)
Coupling lovers are shot from a cannon.  A young man slow dances with 
his cheek on the scaly bosom of a crocodile woman.  Canada's 
one-and-only cyclops projects cinematic images from his eye.  The 
ghost of the world's most beautiful bearded lady appears in Montreal 
movie theatres.  All these bizarreries, and more besides, are to be 
found in André Forcier's THE COUNTESS OF BATON ROUGE, but the most 
remarkable thing about this movie is how boring it all is.
It seems like a can't-miss premise.  A young Montreal film director, 
Rex Prince (Robin Aubert), meets an enchanting bearded lady, Paula 
Paul de Nerval (Genevičve Brouillette), at a freak show, but she is 
leaving the next day for Louisiana, where she plans to set up the 
"Circus of Happiness" and call herself La Comtesse de Bâton Rouge.  
Hopelessly smitten, Rex follows her south.  Love, lust, and tragedy 
ensue--in that order.  One could imagine a bad movie being made from 
this material, but not a dull one.  It sounds like what you'd get if 
an Angela Carter novel was directed by Fellini, or Southern Gothic 
crossed with magic realism: grotesque comic exuberance, with a hint of 
pathos.  The possibilities are endless, and yet THE COUNTESS OF BATON 
ROUGE lost my interest in the first scene, and never regained it.
The problem with the movie is that it is not really about anything I 
have mentioned above.  No, the carnival freaks, Circus of Happiness, 
etc., serve merely as background for the film's frame narrative, in 
which Rex, now middle-aged and (navel-gazing alert!) bankrupt of ideas 
(having just finished his own film of his relationship with La 
Comtesse), wanders around looking morose and reflecting on the healing 
power of art, the interplay of art and reality, the failure of his 
dreams, yadda-yadda-yadda.  This rigidly structured frame narrative 
chokes the life out of the film's more interesting material.  There 
should be a lot of energy and extravagance--this is supposed to be a 
movie about young love and circus freaks, after all--but what we get 
is tedious and uninspired, weighed down by its pretentions.
It doesn't help that the relationships in the movie have no depth.  
There are various love affairs, requited and otherwise, but they exist 
largely on a symbolic level: they exist so the movie can reflect upon 
their significance, rather than having any intrinsic merit.  I am sure 
Forcier made the movie in good faith, and cared about his characters, 
but that care does not show in the finished product.  The interactions 
are perfunctory, and two characters, Nuna and Biz, are totally 
superfluous.
Making matters worse, Forcier seems determined that every line of 
dialogue have some sort of philosophic import.  This results in a 
neverending succession of ponderous, portentous statements.  Really, 
there are no characters here, just actors mouthing contrived lines, 
sometimes laughably bad.  To wit: "Are you afraid of love?"  "Always.  
But never when I fall in love."  Oh, the irony!
I dunno, maybe it's all supposed to be funny, and I just don't get 
Quebecois humour--but the lifeless, vaguely bluesy score and the staid 
camera work hint that all this is indeed to be taken seriously.  
Various scenes from Rex's own film of his youth (also titled La 
Comtesse de Bâton Rouge) are shown during THE COUNTESS OF BATON ROUGE, 
and these quite obviously are played for humour: they are 
melodramatic, poorly acted, and manifestly the work of someone who 
takes himself much too seriously.  Unfortunately, that describes the 
rest of the film too.

Title
Review for Rang-e khoda (1999)
Original Title: Rang E-Khoda
Starring Mohsen Ramezani, Hossein Mahjub, Salime Feizi, Elham Sharifi;
Written & Directed by Majid Majidi;
Cinematography by Mohammad Davudi
        The children in Majid Majidi's films seem to exist, at times, in a
state of grace, an earthly Eden where their experience of the world is
whole and uncorrupted.  Their perceptions are not filtered through
politics, sexuality, economics, prejudice, or other adult concerns.  The
world is there, and they are in it--they ask for no more.  Their actions
are motivated by love and selflessness, by reverence for creation.  They
are, to borrow the title of Majidi's previous work, the children of heaven.
        Such is the case for Mohammad, a young boy who happens to be blind,
but whose other senses are keenly attuned to the sounds and smells and
surfaces around him.  His teacher once told him that God favours the blind,
and while Mohammad--reasonably enough--questions this logic, at times we
understand what the teacher means, because Mohammad seems to experience the
undiluted essence of the world in a sensual communion which we could only
dream of sharing.
        Early in the film, Mohammad hears the cries of a chick which has
fallen out of its nest in a tree onto the grass below.  Acting by sound and
touch alone, he scares off a cat which is closing in for the kill, locates
the defenseless little creature, shinnies up the tree, and returns the
chick to its nest.   This tender moment may mean little in the grand scheme
of things, but it resonates with a sense of the interconnectedness of all
life.  And because this is a deeply religious film, implicit in the scene
is the notion that just as Mohammad cradles the chick in his hands and
lifts it to its place up in the tree, we too are cradled in the nurturing
hands of God, and will be lifted up to Heaven.
        Or perhaps not.  Mohammad's life is not easy.  Blissfully Edenic as
it seems at times, Mohammad nevertheless inhabits the secular world, where
the Word of God, if it exists, is written in invisible ink.  His mother
died several years ago.  His father does not want the burden of caring for
him.  At the beginning of the film, the father urges a teacher at his son's
school to care for the boy, claiming that he cannot manage on his own.  But
Mohammad's grandmother and sister care deeply for him, and when he returns
to his rural home at the end of the school term they are delighted to see
him.  We discover that the father is not concerned about his inability to
provide adequate care for his child, but rather is worried that having a
blind son will cause a setback to his plans to remarry.
        The movie is sweet and joyous in its contemplation of the
children's lives--innocent without being cloyingly cute--but it does not
ignore the troubles that complicate those lives.  The children are limned
by clouds of glory, but Mohammad's father is a tired, selfish, unhappy man,
beset by poverty and sorrow.  There is no childhood, no heaven, left in
him, and he cannot appreciate what it is that makes Mohammad's life
meaningful.  He cruelly insists that his son go to study carpentry with a
blind carpenter, taking him away from his sister and grandmother.  He
claims that he is acting in Mohammad's interests, but the grandmother sees
right through him.  She herself is another delightful character, but her
health is failing, and she serves as a reminder that even the children of
heaven are mortal in this world.
        THE COLOR OF GOD is not so much a story as an act of devotion.
Majidi concentrates on natural unembellished images, and allows us to
contemplate them until they take on a kind of spiritual depth.  He allows
us to share Mohammad's perceptions, to some extent, by holding the camera
steady and filtering out unnecessary sounds so that our attention is
focused on the noises the blind boy hears: woodpeckers in the forest,
seagulls crying above the roar of surf on the beach.  A sense of the
vibrancy of the living world is impressed upon us: close-ups of touching
hands, a dying fish being returned to its pool of water, a butterfly caught
momentarily in a girl's palm.  The movie reminds us of the delights of
simple things, and makes them seem almost sanctifying.
        The serene, hymnal mood is disrupted in the climactic sequence,
which forces a crisis in the relationship between Mohammad and his father.
It is an exciting and tense finale, but comes as a shock, and is rather
contrived, forcing closure upon a film which does not need it.  It does,
however, lead to a remarkable final shot which perhaps justifies the shift
in tone.  On a literal level, what we see is ambiguous, but its
significance is as clear and pure as the bells that ring out at the end of
BREAKING THE WAVES.  There is no question: it is, like the film as a whole,
an act of unadulterated faith in a world where a father--or perhaps
Father--allows his children to doubt his love.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Company of Wolves, The (1984)
"If there's a beast in men, it meets its match in women, too."
Starring Sarah Patterson, Angela Lansbury, Tusse Silberg, David Warner
Directed by Neil Jordan
Written by Jordan and Angela Carter, from a story by Carter
Cinematography by Bryan Loftus
        In recent years, there has been a trend in the field of fantasy: 
writers have been revisiting the fertile world of myth and fairy tale 
and reclaiming that world, investing it with new life and energy.  In 
modern times, fairy tales have become Disneyfied and debased; they 
have become trite adventures involving leering witches, friendly 
dwarves, and cuddly talking animals.  But in their original forms, 
fairy tales have a dark, wicked edge.  Crows tear out the eyes of 
Cinderella's sisters, a gorier fate then they receive in the animated 
version.  Hansel and Gretel relish cooking the witch in her own oven.  
Writers have become fascinated by the bloodier, morally ambivalent 
aspects of fairy tales, and are now modernizing the old stories while 
simultaneously going back to their roots.
        Before this trend was in vogue, Angela Carter--whose stories always 
have a dark, wicked, subversive edge--had been reinventing fairy tales 
for years.  In THE COMPANY OF WOLVES, she and Neil Jordan retell the 
story of Red Riding Hood, enlivening it with werewolves, Rolls Royces, 
and a visit from Satan. 
        The story is structured as a dream, occurring in the mind of Rosaleen 
(Sarah Patterson), an adolescent girl about whose 'real' life we learn 
very little.  Within the dream, there are a number of inset stories, 
most told by dream-Rosaleen's grandmother (Angela Lansbury), and these 
tales gloss the central story in intriguing, suggestive ways.  The 
result is a surprisingly successful example of a sinister, 
contemporary fairy tale.
        I say "surprisingly" because there are so many ways this film could 
have gone wrong.  And there are ways in which it does.  The 
performances are mediocre, except for Lansbury's--she finds the right 
note for the prim, apple-cheeked granny, the wise and stern teller of 
cautionary tales.  The soundtrack, synth-heavy, reminded me of bad 80s 
horror movies, as did the special effects in the shapechanging scenes.  
Probably state-of-the-art at the time, they are now laughable.
        But Jordan succeeds at what I consider the trickiest aspect of the 
film: he transcends the poor acting/music/effects and conveys a sense 
of the fantastic, of otherness.  One of the problems in adapting 
full-blown fantasies is that fantasy is often best left to the 
imagination of the reader, rather than being subjected to the 
'realism' of the screen.  Part of me would love to see an adaptation 
of 'The Lord of the Rings,' but, on the other hand, I know that any 
filmmaker's recreation of ents, hobbits, and balrogs is inevitably 
going to be really lame compared to what I picture in my mind.
        This makes Jordan's accomplishment here seem mighty impressive to me: 
he imbues THE COMPANY OF WOLVES with a genuine sense of magic and 
mystery.  The somewhat Ruritanian dreamworld becomes a kind of 
ur-reality.  The sunshine is exceptionally warm and abundant.  The 
nights are quiet and misty and eerie and ghostly.  The peasant village 
is rustic and cozy, the woods old and hoary.
        This archetypal realm is the setting for a smart, subtle, literate 
script, a script which is as good as you'd expect from Jordan (himself 
an accomplished fiction writer) and Carter.  For Carter, the cauldron 
of story is a witches' brew, bubbling over with primal ingredients: 
mist-shrouded forests, ancient graveyards, virginal girls and wise 
women, wolves with glowing eyes.  She adeptly blends them all 
together.  There is a symbolic richness to the film; everything is 
permeated with a sense of significance.
        The point of it all, I think, is to represent a girl's 
rites-of-passage on an unconscious, primordial level.  A night-journey 
through the forest, from the village to the grandmother's home, is the 
crux of THE COMPANY OF WOLVES.  "Don't stray from the path," Rosaleen 
is told, again and again, and the path is both literal and figurative: 
the path through the forest and the path of life.   Staying on the 
path is the conventional approach suggested by Rosaleen's elders.  
Carter and Jordan, never conventional, explore what goes on when you 
leave the path.
        Those who stray will supposedly meet with a dark fate.  This fate is 
literalized in the dream as werewolves, but the werewolves connote 
many things: death, sex, knowledge.  If straying from the path leads 
to death, then it's not a good idea--but if that's what you have to 
risk to get sex and knowledge (and therefore power), then maybe it's 
worth the risk.  When you leave the path, the world becomes a 
dangerous, ambiguous place, but it's full of potential.  And it's 
certainly more interesting than the Disney version.

Title
Review for Ba liang jin (1990)
"A man is not a man without eight taels of gold."
EIGHT TAELS OF GOLD begins as a fish out of water story and at some
point becomes a love story involving two people whose past choices prevent
the fruition of their love.  Neither aspect of the movie is entirely
successful, but both are good enough.  And along the way there is one
perfect scene, which is one more than you find in most films.
Slim (played by portly Sammo Hung, better known as a star and
director of Hong Kong action movies) is a Chinese immigrant who drives a
yellow cab in New York. When the movie opens, we see him shouting
obscenities at another taxi driver.  He does not seem particularly out of
place.  In fact, he is about to return to visit his home in rural China for
the first time in sixteen years, spending most of his life savings in the
process, and it is there that he will become the proverbial fish out of
water, as he realizes that you can never go home.
He brings with him some Statue of Liberty cigarette lighters, cheap
sunglasses, and lobsters (which have to be large, to prove they're
American)--the tokens of his success.  He also wears a gold chain and a
gold watch, because without eight taels of gold, a man is not a man (my
dictionary tells me that taels are a unit of weight used in the Far East,
and I assume the phrase is a Chinese proverb).  He loses most of this
stuff--except the gold--when his van crashes into a river and he has to
hitch a ride, so to speak, on a raft along the river which runs past his
parents' village.  When he arrives unannounced, he almost induces cardiac
arrest in his father.
All of this has the makings of a routine comedy, and the movie has
its amusing moments, as when the villagers take turns giving Slim gifts
during a celebration of his homecoming, and they all give him birds, so by
evening's end he is surrounded by turkeys, ducks, geese and other sundry
fowl.  But EIGHT TAELS is not a comedy--it is a sad, sweet story about the
choices people make, and how they are sometimes irreparable.
Director Mabel Cheung (AN AUTUMN'S TALE, THE SOONG SISTERS) sees
clearly what it is like to have lived half of your life in one country and
half in a country on the other side of the world--what it is like to no
longer have a place to call home.  Slim does not belong in China, nor does
he belong in America, where he can barely speak the language.  Seeing water
buffalo in the fields and rafts poled down the river and fireworks
exploding gloriously in the sky over a small village, we come to know the
world Slim left behind, and it seems as if he too is knowing it for the
first time, and wishes it felt more like home.  The condition of the
expatriate is eloquently portrayed; I, being one, was sympathetic.
On his way to his parent's village, Slim hooks up with Jenny
(Sylvia Chang), whom he knew when she was a girl nicknamed Odds-and-Ends,
which is what he continues to call her, although she is now a mature,
professional, attractive woman, to be married in the spring to an
American-Chinese man.  Slim and Odds-and-Ends fall for each other.  That's
predictable.  The manner in which their (non-)romance is played out is not.
The emotions involved are adult and complex, and the film avoids cheap
solutions to their dilemma.  It's typical, for instance, that the fiancé in
this sort of plot be a colossal jerk, because it makes it easier to
empathize with the unrequited lover.  But here the fiancé is a decent,
ordinary guy, and although Slim would like to feel anger, he cannot.  The
fiancé has done nothing wrong; the situation is the result of bad luck or
bad decisions, take your pick.
EIGHT TAELS has its share of flaws (the early sequences in America
and on the plane to China are especially weak), but it compensates with
insight.  When Odds-and-Ends tells Slim that her future husband wants to
move to San Francisco, she notes resignedly, "It's all the same.  Wherever
we go, we'll be in Chinatown," and her straightforward statement expresses
much.  There is insight, too, in the understanding of the consequences of
Slim and Odds-and-Ends' decisions: he to move to America, she to marry a
Chinese-American.  Both their choices were perhaps born of impatience,
perhaps of a sense that the grass is always greener--and it turns out that
both choices were wrong.  But they cannot undo them; they must live with
what they have done.  Such is life.  The movie is tender toward these
people, but it offers no false comforts.
Everything that is right and true about EIGHT TAELS comes together
in one great scene, which is the culmination of the love story.  Slim and
Odds-and-Ends sit in a secluded spot and talk hesitantly, with the muted
pop-pop of fireworks exploding in the night behind them, and it seems the
conversation will lead to a kiss.  The exchange that follows, and what Slim
then does, is poignant and perfect: with clarity and understatement, we see
two people's lives, their heartbreaks and virtues, summed up in a single
moment.  Yes, the film is flawed, but moments like that justify most of its
inadequacies.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Lovers (1999)
        There are movies which take the everyday stuff of life and through
subtle examination make it seem fascinating and fresh, movies which capture
the infinite richness of ordinary existence.  And there are movies like
LOVERS, which take the everyday stuff of life and make it seem, well,
mundane.  It is the story of a man and a woman who meet in a bookstore and
fall in love.   There's a bit more to it than that, but not much.
        The woman is Jeanne, who works in the bookstore.  She is played by
the captivating Élodie Bouchez, who is as wonderful here as she was in THE
DREAM LIFE OF ANGELS, where she played a similar young woman: charming and
sensible, open-hearted and affectless.  The man, on the other hand, is
merely feckless.  He is Dragan (Sergueď Trifunovic), a Yugoslavian
expatriate and painter.  He is slothful, wasteful, drunken, pretentious,
and self-absorbed, to varying degrees.  He is, as Jeanne properly remarks,
a spoiled child.  But he's an artist, and artists are temperamental, so
that's alright.  He is, actually, a nice enough guy, passionate and sincere
despite his faults, and he charms her when he asks her in faltering French
to order an art book for him.
        They make a date and have dinner at her place, then make love; she
misses work the next day so they can be together.  Their relationship seems
inspired by the things lovers do in other French movies: smoking cigarettes
in coffeeshops, making love in seedy apartments, strolling along the Seine
at night.  Perhaps French people do this sort of thing in real life too,
but I hope they're not quite so clichéd.  Jeanne and Dragan cannot
understand each other's language, so they converse mostly in English
(unlike most people speaking foreign tongues, they never trip over their
words).  Their attraction deepens.
        Dramatic tension develops only when the police learn that Dragan is
an illegal immigrant and he is given three days to leave the country.  He
moves in with Jeanne and avoids the police, determined not to leave.  The
lovers can't stand the thought of parting.  There are occasional
squabbles--he's irrationally jealous of her ex-boyfriends, she's annoyed
when he comes home drunk at five a.m.--but most of the time they are
enamoured with each other.  They fill each other's thoughts.  In intimate
moments, they speak lines which sound like they're reciting bad
poetry--which is reasonable enough, since love and bad poetry are often
mutually inclusive.
        The film was directed, shot and co-written by Jean-Marc Barr, the
French actor perhaps best known for his roles in Luc Besson's THE BIG BLUE
and Lars von Trier's ZENTROPA and BREAKING THE WAVES.  He is a belated
member of the so-called Dogma 95 group, which includes von Trier.  Their
mandate insists on an unrefined, inelegant style of filmmaking: handheld
cameras, on-location sound, no artificial lighting, no special effects, no
filters, etc., etc.
        The style suits the extemporaneous, understated feel of the movie,
but it adds nothing, and LOVERS at times desperately needs an added
something.  While there is an innocent romanticism at its heart which is a
refreshing change from the more jaded or manipulative visions of love
predominant in contemporary cinema, it's more tedious than touching.  It
focuses on the down-to-earth details of desire without ever giving a proper
sense of the grand passions that drive it.  Love is a symphony, but LOVERS
makes it seem like chamber music.
        So much has been said, written, and sung on the subject of love
throughout so many years that perhaps Barr is wise not to aim for
all-encompassing statements, but rather to seek insight through observation
of the particulars of one relationship.  And he is not exactly
unsuccessful.  The direction is unobtrusive; the acting is first-rate.
Jeanne and Dragan seem sweet and authentic.  They just aren't terribly
interesting.  They embody the oldest theme of all, and fail to bring
anything new to it.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Straight Story, The (1999)
Starring Richard Farnsworth, Sissy Spacek, James Cada, Harry Dean Stanton;
Directed by David Lynch;
Written by John Roach and Mary Sweeney;
Cinematography by Freddie Francis
        THE STRAIGHT STORY is a breath of fresh air.  It winds its way
through the American Midwest, the nation's heartland, wide-eyed and
open-hearted, steeped in admiration for both the landscape and its people.
The admiration is not rooted in misplaced nostalgia or uncritical
patriotism, but in simple affection for the kindness and decency of
uncomplicated people who uphold values which seem almost archaic in a world
of increasing moral relativism.
        The relaxed narrative follows the journey of Alvin Straight, a
73-year-old man who learns that his estranged brother, Lyle, has suffered a
stroke and decides to visit him.  Lyle lives hundreds of miles away, and
neither Alvin nor his daughter can drive a car, so he decides to travel by
tractor.  He purchases a John Deere and hits the open road ... very slowly.
Near the beginning of his journey, he meets a pregnant woman, and toward
the end he chats with a priest in a graveyard, and in some sense his trip
is a voyage from life to death: it encompasses his existence and all he has
learned.
        The movie wisely does not force the "journey of life" metaphor, but
focuses instead on the particulars of each incident.   There are no
antagonists; there is little inner conflict.  The people Alvin meets are,
every last one of them, decent, trusting, and considerate.  The quirkiest
thing about THE STRAIGHT STORY, indeed, is the niceness of its characters,
who are lacking in evil or malice.  It is strange to think that this should
seem so odd, but it does.  The movie does not insist on their goodness.
The people come across as eccentrics, not saints; as individuals, not
paragons.  And their actions are reasonable enough: why on earth would you
not want to help an old man on a tractor, on his way to meet his estranged
brother?
        Alvin meets many people.  The pregnant woman and the priest, a
middle-aged couple, twin mechanics,  and more.  To some he imparts wisdom;
from others he gains insight.  The most affecting scene, perhaps, is a
conversation in a bar with another older man, who like Alvin is a veteran
of World War II.  Their conversation becomes, in effect, a mutual
confession, as they unburden memories of the war which perhaps could not be
shared with others, because the others were not there, and would not
understand.  The exchange is intensely moving, and is but one of many
moments in THE STRAIGHT STORY which illuminate the essence of the
characters' frailties and virtues, depicting them with compassion, and
without censure or unearned sentiment.
        The camera hovers lovingly over familiar American icons--an Ace
Hardware store, Alvin's John Deere tractor, combine harvesters tilling
amber waves of grain, wood-panelled saloons with neon beer logos and sports
memorabilia on the walls--but it is the people who are the heart of the
movie, and none more so than Alvin.  He is portrayed with gravitas and
dignity by Richard Farnsworth, whose unaffected performance deserves all
the praise it has received.  Alvin is plainspoken, kindly, and
self-effacing, but it is evident that he has experienced much hardship.  We
learn some of it, including traumatic experiences in the army, difficulties
experienced by his daughter, alcohol-fuelled fights with his brother--but
he has survived it, and in surviving, found strength.
        Drawing on this strength, he undertakes his journey with
determination, patience, and gruff good humour.  Everyone he meets stops
and listens and learns from him.  It is easy to see why.  He has a quality
which commands respect: a look in his eyes, a set to his grizzled chin,
which suggests that he has seen much in his time and that he should not be
trifled with.  He has earned people's attention.  If we met him, we would
pay attention too.
        The movie is by David Lynch, and has been called a radical
departure from his earlier work.  It does indeed provide a much-needed
change of pace after his past few films, which are for the most part
inferior reworkings of the obsessions he elaborated with such unsettling
genius in BLUE VELVET and "Twin Peaks."  Even so, the hushed humanism of
THE STRAIGHT STORY is not entirely new.  There is a childishness apparent
in much of Lynch's work: the perspective is often that of a male
adolescent, with a naďve appreciation of the beauty of the everyday, a
muddled and terrified sense of sin and evil, and an irreconcilable
confusion about the sexual nature of women.  This sense of adolescent
simplicity is often interpreted as ironic, but I think it is meant to be
taken at face value.  The arrival of the robins at the end of BLUE VELVET
and Agent Cooper's unwavering devotion to the ideals of law and justice,
for example, are not meant to invite our cynicism: rather, we are asked us
to set aside our skepticism and embrace their pureness.
        If such heartfelt goodness is difficult to accept as unironic, it
may be because the nightmare desires which underpin Lynch's vision of
reality overwhelm the uncomplicated sense of innocence which his work at
times strives to retrieve from a fallen world.  THE STRAIGHT STORY,
however, bestows upon us that sense of innocence in its fullness.   Unlike
Lynch's other works, the film does not address sexual desire, which in
Lynch's world is the source of all anguish.  The perspective is, if
anything, that of a child rather than an adolescent--hence the 'G'
rating--but an ancient child, both innocent and knowing.
        The mature perspective of THE STRAIGHT STORY finally humbles most
other movies, including many of Lynch's own, which, for all their
brilliance, can be rather juvenile in some respects.   The film is long and
slow, but never unfocused.  It is as efficient as a parable, and as
revealing.  It tells its lessons in a thoughtful, unhurried manner, and it
does not raise its voice.  It expects us to pause and reflect.  It assumes
that insight comes not from needless speech, but from quiet contemplation,
from taking the time to look at things without superficial distraction, and
the assumption is borne out for the duration of the film.  Simple in its
telling, complex in its wisdom, it is an American classic, and it
reconfirms David Lynch's status as one of the great American directors.
        Review by David Dalgleish (subjective.freeservers.com) -- January
8th, 2000

Title
Review for Bullet Ballet (1998)
"Kids, don't play bad games.  Losers die."
Starring Shinya Tsukamoto ,Kirina Mano, Hisashi Igawa, Takahiro Murase;
Written & Directed by Shinya Tsukamoto;
Cinematography by Shinya Tsukamoto
        It seems like everyone has a gun in the movies, these days.  They
carry them, flaunt them, shoot them, and no one blinks an eye.  They're a
given; they're commonplace.  But for those of us who live outside of, say,
Texas, guns are not a commonplace, and while it's generally assumed that
characters get a hold of their guns somehow, we're not really encouraged to
wonder how or why.  BULLET BALLET is a film that wonders how and why: how
people get guns, and why they need them so much in the first place.
        The movie begins with a premise familiar from other recent Japanese
movies (cf. THE EEL, SHALL WE DANCE?, THE BIRD PEOPLE OF CHINA): a
plain-looking white-collar thirtyish Japanese man finds himself propulsed
into a situation that stands his world on its head, that unlocks the cell
in which his id, we assume, has long been imprisoned.  In BULLET BALLET,
the man is Goda (played by writer/director Shinya Tsukamoto), who makes
commercials; one day his girlfriend commits suicide, and although Goda
doesn't miss a day of work, he is (understandably) deeply traumatized.
There are repeated shots of a window in Goda's apartment, pierced by a
bullet hole, radiating cracks; similarly, the suicide is like a hole in his
head, radiating shards of pain that undermine his sanity.
        One day he is beaten by a gang of street punks and subsequently
fixates on one of them, sullen gamine Chisato (Kirina Mano).  Seeming both
to wish to revenge himself upon the gang and to become like them, Goda
becomes obsessed with purchasing a gun.  He roams the streets, he surfs the
Net, he searches, and finds it harder than you might think to acquire one.
Why does he want it so badly?  We're not sure--to provide an answer would
require something akin to characterization, which isn't the film's raison
d'ętre.  It's clear, though, that Goda's need for the gun has nothing
really to do with being beaten by the gang; they are a pretext, although he
displaces his motives onto them.
        It seems, ultimately, as if what he really wants is either to lash
out at the world for taking his girlfriend or to kill himself for failing
her.  In the world of BULLET BALLET, both impulses are one and the same:
the seduction of destruction is also the appeal of annihilation.  There is
an astonishing scene in which Chisato stands on tip-toe on the brink of a
subway platform, balancing on outstretched arms, as a subway train flashes
by.  One twitch, and she's dead.  She won't throw herself in front of the
moving train, but she'll come as close as she can.  She, aimless and
disaffected like all the characters, both perpetrates violence and courts
death until the two become inextricable, until it's hard to tell the dancer
from the dance.
        BULLET BALLET, then, is a movie about violence as a vicious cycle,
as a state of mind, as a manifestation of anger against the world and
hatred of the self, which feeds on its own energy.  Tsukamoto pulls out all
the stops, using jump cuts, freeze frames, fade outs, slow motion, and,
most impressively, an inspired use of ambient sound, to sustain a vision of
violence as both appealing and appalling.  It's all shot with a hand-held
camera in harsh black and white which transforms the mundane into the
evocative: sun and shadow pass over a Tokyo high-rise rooftop in the rain
like a fleeting glimpse of God; an insect crawls across a dead man's face
like the embodiment of Death.
        In addition to writing and directing, Tsukamoto shot and edited and
designed the movie, and he deserves much credit--BULLET BALLET isn't
notably coherent or profound, but damn if it doesn't look cool.  As in Wong
Kar-wai's best work, the hectic disjointed rhythms, the unconventional
pacing, and the incongruous flashes of humour mimic the fractured frenetic
experience of contemporary urban life; the film speaks to us in the
language of our time.
        You would think that Tsukamoto's fellow Japanese Beat Takeshi's
work had given us the last word on violence as vicious cycle, especially in
his VIOLENT COP, but BULLET BALLET is even more extreme in its
aestheticization--and fetishization--of violence.  In Takeshi's films
violence is expressed as a transient disruption of the Taoist still centre
which the characters inhabit most of the time, and to which they inevitably
return after momentary frenzies of action.  The ultimate still centre is of
course death--which is where most of Takeshi's characters end up.  In
BULLET BALLET, however, there is no centre; the characters live on the
margins where hurt and risk and degradation are ever-present.  Violence is
a modus operandi, and its allure is simple: it keeps people too busy to
think or reflect.  For everyone in this film who has or wants a gun,
reflection seems worse than the threat of death.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Barefoot Contessa, The (1954)
"You are not a woman.  You will not allow yourself to be loved, and 
you cannot love."
Starring Ava Gardner, Humphrey Bogart, Edmond O'Brien
Written & Directed by Joseph L. Mankiewicz
Cinematography by Jack Cardiff
The trajectory of THE BAREFOOT CONTESSA is so relentless that it 
doesn't even bother with the pretense of suspense.  It is a story of 
rags-to-riches, riches-to-tragedy, and the tragedy is such a foregone 
conclusion that the movie begins with the end--the funeral of Maria, 
the Barefoot Contessa, a young woman who became a world-famous movie 
star overnight, but remained unhappy, unfulfilled, and died several 
years and three movies later.  The movie is not very interested in how 
Maria becomes a star--that story has been told before.  It is 
interested in the consequences, and while that story has also been 
told before, it has rarely been told with such style and with such 
tragic grandeur.
Humphrey Bogart, playing the aging director who gives Maria her big 
break, is billed as the star, but the movie is Ava Gardner's.  She 
plays Maria--she is Maria--and her classical, sculptured beauty is 
just right for this role, where she plays a woman whose talent and 
looks are more curse than blessing, because they put her on a pedestal 
where no one else can reach her.
Maria is a dancer in a bar in Madrid when we first meet her.  A rich 
Hollywood producer and his PR man, Oscar (Edmond O'Brien, who won an 
Oscar for the role), try to lure her to America with the usual 
blandishments.  She dismisses them, but Bogart's Harry Dawes--a 
"washed-up ex-drunk"--is able to reach her, and so she comes to 
America, and she becomes a star.
We never see a single scene from Maria's films, nor do we see her on 
the set.  What we see is her off-screen life.  She is not a typical 
star.  She doesn't have a lover; she doesn't even attend the opening 
of her first movie with an escort.  Hell, she doesn't even smoke--now 
what kind of behaviour is that for a famous actress?  And she is not 
happy.  She still feels like the vulnerable little girl she used to 
be, Cinderella waiting for her Prince Charming to come along, to love 
her and make her feel safe.  She does not allow herself to be loved by 
anyone, waiting for this fairytale lover.
While another movie might treat Maria as a cold bitch who doesn't 
know what's good for her, THE BAREFOOT CONTESSA is much wiser.  It is 
fundamentally sympathetic to Maria's point of view: Mankiewicz, as he 
did in ALL ABOUT EVE, subtly and poignantly probes the dilemma of 
women in the entertainment business, when men have all the money, when 
beauty is the sole measure of stardom and, of course, it doesn't last 
forever.
But, as with ALL ABOUT EVE, the best thing about THE BAREFOOT 
CONTESSA is Mankiewicz's dialogue.  He has an amazing talent for 
wicked, pointed exchanges; he writes dialogue that is stilted, 
melodramatic, unrealistic--and a sheer joy to listen to.  There is one 
monologue by Oscar, describing the guests at a French Riviera party, 
which in its sophistication, its wordplay, its incisive sarcasm, is as 
verbally rich as poetry.
The film is beautifully structured, too.  Mankiewicz uses the funeral 
as his frame device, and the camera shifts back and forth between 
several mourners, revealing Maria through their memories--through the 
eyes of Harry Dawes, and then Oscar, and then Maria's Prince Charming, 
an Italian Count who is the last of his line.  Maria goes to live with 
him in Italy, with his barren sister, in their dark mansion with vague 
House of Usher undertones.  They marry, with tragic consequences, 
witnessed through Bogart's eyes, and the film comes full circle.  It 
is as balanced and precise and perfect as haiku.
The movie is just as sophisticated on an emotional level, especially 
in the way it handles the relationship between Bogart and Gardner.  He 
is many things to her: friend, confessor, part-time amateur therapist, 
father figure, but never her lover.  There is a suggestion that Harry 
is really the Prince Charming that Maria is looking for, but his 
heart belongs to another woman, and so they remain friends.  The 
emotions involved in their relationship are complex and adult, not the 
clichés of formula fiction.  There is a scene in which Maria and Harry 
talk at a party, and she tells him why she is so unhappy, and her 
words may be melodramatic, but as Harry himself observes, "there's 
more to talking than just words," and there is more to her speech than 
superficial emotions--there is clarity and comprehension.  It's easy 
enough to show a beautiful actress whose life is ruined by show 
business; it's a lot harder to understand that actress, to get under 
her skin, to know her, but this movie does just that.  The Contessa is 
placed on a pedestal where no one can reach her--no one except the 
viewer.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
It's not easy being a legend.  The STAR WARS movies are, of course,
legendary, and bringing out a new film, a continuation of that legend,
poses a problem: knowing that you are building on a legend, how do you
ensure that you live up to the attendant expectations?  George Lucas's
answer is to deliver more or less the same goods as he has delivered in the
past, but bringing them to a new level of sophistication.  He succeeds;
unfortunately, his answer is the wrong one.
        THE PHANTOM MENACE is certainly a more sophisticated film than the
previous three STAR WARS films.  The headline performers (Liam Neeson, Ewan
McGregor, Natalie Portman) are, as a whole, substantially finer actors than
their counterparts in the first trilogy (Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie
Fisher).  The special effects resources available to filmmakers today are
significantly more refined than they were fifteen or twenty years ago.  The
sets and costumes and art design are, as always, impeccable.  The dialogue
induces fewer cringes.  The hokey mystic trappings of the Force are
presented in a less adolescent manner.  All of which would make you think
that THE PHANTOM MENACE would be a better film.  It is not.
        Something is missing.  The earlier movies were, in all respects,
more primitive than the latest entry in the series, but it is that
primitive aspect that was perhaps crucial to their success.  There was a
naďveté to the earlier movies--they were innocent.  Darth Vader was a
comic-book villain, and his Oedipal conflict with Luke Skywalker lacked
even the semblance of subtlety, but the crude mythic underpinnings provided
a cumulative effect that was remarkably potent--potent not despite its
simplicity, but because of it.  THE PHANTOM MENACE, by contrast, is not
innocent, not simple--it is knowing and slick, painstakingly crafted to
live up to its legendary status.
        It is, it should be said, very good, in the way that STAR WARS
movies are inevitably good: it possesses a visual sweep and an imaginative
abundance that shames other science fiction movies.  There are multitudes
of alien beings and scientifically improbable spacecraft and even more
improbable planets and wondrously improbable shoot-em-up set-pieces.  All
are splendidly conceived: STAR WARS embodies our adolescent dreams, the
pulp dreams of the future conceived by writers like Doc Smith and Edgar
Rice Burroughs, in a way that other movies have never approached.  Still,
we expect as much from STAR WARS movies.  We also expect more, and it is
the "more" that is lacking, and which I think is responsible for the vague
sense of disappointment that has been audiences' most common response to
the movie thus far.
        The tightly knit plot begins when Jedi Master Qui-Gon Jinn (Neeson)
and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor, who subtly and
effectively imitates Alec Guinness's manner of speaking) arrive on the
planet Naboo, which the ominous-sounding alien-run Trade Federation has
sealed off with a military blockade, planning what amounts to the
interplanetary equivalent of a hostile takeover.  Young Queen Amidala
(Portman), however, has no intention of signing the treaty the Trade
Federation wishes to impose, and it is her resistance to the Trade
Federation (who are acting at the behest of someone called Darth Sidious,
who is the Emperor from the previous films, and whose true identity is not
difficult to figure out) that drives the movie, as the fast-moving
narrative takes us from Naboo to Tatooine to the seat of the Council of the
Galactic Republic and back to Naboo, gathering along the way a Naboo native
called Jar Jar Binks (Ahmed Best) and a young boy called Anakin Skywalker
(Jake Lloyd), whom you might have heard of.
        Much of what happens is simply a reworking of the earlier movies,
with different characters and venues, but with the same underlying
patterns.  The conflict between Naboo and the Trade Federation repeats the
conflict between the Rebels and the Empire.  The climactic sequence
features a suicidal space assault on a heavily defended enemy craft,
recalling the attempts to penetrate the Death Star's defences in STAR WARS
and RETURN OF THE JEDI.  Tatooine is revisited, and characters and alien
species familiar from the earlier movies return.
        Dazzling as it is at times, there is a sense of redundance,
although this is mitigated by the rousing pace and the weath of visual
detail; the film kicks off with a great action sequence as Qui-Gon and
Obi-Wan battle a horde of identikit battle droids, and never relents.  But
although it keeps moving, it lacks the inexorable momentum of the original
STAR WARS, which was a slow burn, beginning with.a Tatooine farmboy and a
mysterious message from a beautiful princess, ending with the pyrotechnics
of a Death Star destroyed.  In THE PHANTOM MENACE, there is no slow burn;
things are always exploding, with pauses for us to catch our breath.
        While the central characters are strong and promise to hold our
interest through the sequels, the supporting cast is rather weak.  Darth
Maul (Ray Park), billed as a villain comparable to the incomparable Darth
Vader, proves to be utterly dispensable, in more ways than one (although he
does manage to get in one very nifty fight sequence).  Jar Jar Binks is a
constant distraction, both because of his ill-conceived dialogue (much of
it employing inappropriate--and sometimes incomprehensible--variations of
contemporary vernacular) and because the digital effects used to animate
him are so slick that he seems more of a state-of-the-art videogame
character than a film character capable of standing alongside
flesh-and-blood actors.  R2-D2 and C-3PO make obligatory appearances (with
C-3PO in particular being superfluous).
        THE PHANTOM MENACE is effective as a self-contained movie on the
level of good old-fashioned escapist adventure, but it is clear that Lucas
is also laying the groundwork for the sequels, and as the story builds, its
power may grow. The fate that shapes the proceedings--the knowledge that
the Empire will emerge and conquer, the knowledge that innocent Anakin is
doomed to become Darth Vader--could be foregrounded to much greater effect,
and if the tone darkens in the next movie, as it seems it will, then new
legends may be spawned.  Fundamentally, though, what is lacking is what
science fiction fans and critics call the "sense of wonder."  The original
STAR WARS and its sequels left us agape in contemplation of new and
unexpected vistas of the imagination.  THE PHANTOM MENACE does what we
expect it to do.  It revisits the same vistas.  Yes, they're impressive,
but after sixteen years, isn't it time for some new ones?

Title
Review for Boon sang yuen (1997)
"It is as difficult to love someone forever as it is to hate someone 
forever."
Starring Wu Chien-lien, Leon Lai, Anita Mui, Huang Lei, Ge You
Directed by Ann Hui
Written by Kin-chung Chan, from the novel by Eileen Chang
Cinematography by Ping-bin Lee
        EIGHTEEN SPRINGS is a love story in which no one ever says the words 
"I love you."  No one speaks the word "love" in any context, as far as 
I recall.  There is talk of marriage, of money, of couples who are 
good pairs, of couples who are poor matches--but never of love.  
Marriage is less a matter of what is right than what is appropriate.  
Yet the movie is founded on the convincing, touching, deeply felt 
romance between Shujun (FALLEN ANGELS' Leon Lai) and Manjing (EAT 
DRINK MAN WOMAN's Wu Chien-lien), two young people who are 
transparently in love, even if they never say the words.
        Shujun is the son of a wealthy family in Nanjing.  Manjing's father 
died when she was young, and her sister (Anita Mui) had to take a 
shameful job as a "ballroom hostess" to provide for the family.  
Because the sister's work reflects poorly on Manjing's entire family, 
she is an unsuitable bride for Shujun--according to his family.
        Today, Shujun might ignore his family's wishes, but he and Manjing 
live in Shanghai in the 1930s, where marriages were decided by decorum 
as much as by desire, so he does not have that liberty.  They live in 
a world not unlike Jane Austen's, where social codes and manners 
govern all behaviour, and the way people act within such strict 
guidelines can be at times humorous, at times heartbreaking.
        Heartbreaking, mostly, for the difference in social status is merely 
the beginning of the lovers' problems.  Shujun's choice of family over 
self has tragic consequences, especially for Manjing.  The problems 
become perhaps too extreme--Chinese movies never seem to err on the 
side of caution when it comes to providing hardships for their 
characters.  The latter half of the film struck me as being a bit too 
much, because the first half is so gentle, so graceful and delicate in 
its exploration of young love.  Nevertheless, the idyllic beginning 
makes the lovers' later separation, their loss and longing, terribly 
poignant.  
        EIGHTEEN SPRINGS is refreshing in the way it devotes time to the 
courtship, unlike most movies, which treat romance in a perfunctory 
manner.  Here, we see love developing, rather than being informed 
about it after the fact.
        Shujun and Manjing are introduced by a mutual friend (Huang Lei) when 
Shujun comes to work in a factory in Shanghai.  The budding romantic 
tension is subtle but unmistakable.  Soon Shujun and Manjing are 
finding moments alone together, but there is no overt romance, no 
profession of love.  They grow close, and, without even a kiss, are 
soon discussing marriage.   It is typical of their hesitant courtship 
that marriage is not so much proposed as suggested: "Wouldn't it be 
nice if we were married?"  But we can believe that it would be nice.  
They are both quiet, mild-mannered, conscientious; they are 
comfortable together.
        Their love manifests itself in small, understated gestures.  Shujun 
learns that Manjing lost one of her gloves, so he takes a flashlight 
and searches through the woods at night to find it.  When he gives it 
to her the next day, he doesn't tell her about the trouble he went 
through--clearly, the act of giving, of pleasing her, is all the 
gratification he needs.  He walks her home from work every night, and 
when they part, they simply say, "See you tomorrow," but the way they 
glance at each other as they do, awkward, guarded, wanting to say more 
but afraid to do so, perfectly captures the fragile emotions of young 
lovers.  Credit for this belongs to Lai and Wu, who are both 
wonderful: they imbue mundane exchanges and brief gestures with 
complex, profound, restrained feelings.
        This is one of the great pleasures of the film, that it pays 
attention to the nuances of feeling that attend even the smallest 
gestures.  In this sense, it is a domestic movie, a movie about 
everyday lives, everyday things.  Such films can be drab, but in the 
right hands they can be fascinating--as this one is--because they 
remind us that there are hidden worlds of emotion that we tend to 
forget about, that we take for granted as we go about our lives.  
Unfortunately, Shujun and Manjing never get the chance to take those 
emotions for granted.

Title
Review for Frankenstein (1931)
"Frankenstein was interested only in human life: first to destroy it, 
then recreate it."
Starring Boris Karloff, Colin Clive, Mae Clarke, John Boles, Edward 
Van Sloan;
Directed by James Whale;
Written by John L. Balderston, Francis Edward Faragoh, and Garett 
Fort, from a play by Peggy Webling;
Cinematography by Arthur Edeson
If parody is a form of tribute, then James Whale's FRANKENSTEIN is 
surely one of the most honoured films of all time.  Few movies, if 
any, have been aped and imitated so often and so pervasively.  Boris 
Karloff's braying, lurching monster.  The hunched, atavistic lab 
assistant.  Dr. Frankenstein in his white labcoat, scuttling around 
his lab, dwarfed by the vast walls and the mad scientist decor.  They 
have become icons of our culture, and it is a measure of how good 
FRANKENSTEIN is that it emerges, indefatigable, from this smothering 
pile of cultural baggage, retaining still some measure of the power it 
must once have had.
All popular works suffer from inevitable datedness, because the 
conventions they manipulate to provoke sensation are as ephemeral as 
the box-office success they strive for; but FRANKENSTEIN, if not 
exactly contemporary in feel, is at least well-preserved: watching it 
is not simply an exercise in camp nostalgia.  It has more to offer.
For one thing, at only seventy minutes, it seems a model of clarity 
and purpose compared to the flaccid torpor of today's blockbusters.  
Whale finds a fine balance, embellishing outlandish scenes with 
extravagant stylistic flourishes, but proceeding through the straight 
scenes with ruthless economy.  Compared to the melodramatic excesses 
customary of popular films, the key moments are charged--rather 
impressively--with a stark simplicity of emotion and imagery.  The 
monster choking a man to death, a little girl innocently offering him 
a flower, a windmill burned by a frenzied mob: the images are concise, 
bare, direct, and remain vivid in the mind's eye.
There is also, at times, a surprising degree of dramatic 
understatement.  The ultimate meeting of maker and monster, at the 
edge of a cliff after an urgent mob/chase scene, is expressed in a 
couple of quick close-ups.  We see the monster's face and 
Frankenstein's face, and there are no words.  We know all we need to 
know.  (In the novel, the equivalent of this scene is the starting 
point for much speechifying.)  Earlier, when the monster is birthed, 
we don't see (as I anticipated) a head-on shot of Boris Karloff 
sitting bolt upright, eyes wide and wild.  Instead, we see him in 
flashes: a hand twitching, a glimpse of the head behind the gloating 
figure of Dr. Frankenstein (Colin Clive).  He comes to life in 
pieces--which is somehow rather appropriate.
Boris Karloff's performance has long since become legend, so much so 
that it is easy to forget that it is just that: a performance, and a 
savvy one.  The role, of course, did not require much dramatic range, 
but it required something beyond the haunted gaunt pallor of the 
make-up.  The shambling wooden gait is obviously intended to suggest 
the unnatural quality of his existence.  But Karloff adds something 
more: even though he himself is not freakishly large, it seems as if 
he is, for he dominates the screen.  He achieves this by seeming to 
place his entire weight on each foot as he walks, giving the sense of 
ponderous body mass, of largeness.  It's remarkable how dramatically 
effective this simple trick is.  And in the fight scenes, the brute 
unchoreographed simplicity of the monster's violence powerfully 
suggests his animal innocence.
Although the script--itself taken from a theatrical adaptation--plays 
fast and loose with the original novel, it retains crucial thematic 
elements, one of which is the concept of the monster's innocence.  He 
is abused, persecuted, vilified, yet he wilfully initiates no 
wrongdoing; he simply responds, in his bewilderment, to the 
provocation around him.  The movie cheats somewhat by having the 
monster's brain come from a criminal (stored in a jar helpfully 
labelled "ABNORMAL BRAIN"), but the way it develops, this becomes 
irrelevant.  When he tosses a girl into a lake, it is not the 
malicious act of a criminal--no criminal's gaping grin could seem so 
silly--but rather the amoral act of an infant who has not yet learned 
how to interpret the world and respond in socially appropriate ways.  
The creator is, in a way, as sociopathic as his creation, and Dr. 
Frankenstein's sin lies not so much in having made this unnatural 
being, but rather in abandoning it to its fate.  His crime is not 
hubris, but lack of moral responsibility.
The story plays out in a series of improbably spacious rooms, a 
panoply of ornate TARDIS chambers, bigger inside than out.  The narrow 
dark spire of Frankenstein's retreat opens up to reveal vast shadowy 
spaces; the rooms of the Frankenstein household, even the hallway, are 
palatial in their dimensions.  But there are no ceilings.  Long-shots 
show us extensive horizontal space but never tilt up to show us what 
is overhead, creating the sense of an oppressively low ceiling always 
just out of sight.  It's a strange sensation, this almost subliminal 
distortion of spatial perception, and--while it is doubtless a mere 
accident of the mechanics of production--it is odd, unsettling, and 
the perfect ambience for a tale of terror.
There is one ceiling in the film, and that is in the 
laboratory--which is a marvel of set design, a comic-book array of 
Gothic exaggeration and primitive sci-fi apparatus--where the sheer 
walls frown forebodingly down on the banks and coils of machinery: 
this is a space that seems more vertical than horizontal.  When the 
instant of creation arrives, the monster's incumbent form--in an 
inspired moment--is hoisted off the floor on a gurney and winched up 
to an aperture in the ceiling, where it bathes in the lightning-glare 
of the storm, in the sturm and drang of the sky.  Watching from below 
as flares of illumination flicker about the immobilized body, it truly 
seems as if we behold something greater than us, beyond our ken, 
unknowable: the act of creation is irradiated by mystery, as it should 
be.  The film entire may not be perfect, but in splendid set-pieces 
such as this, it is lit from within by the eternal fire of myth, and 
makes its flame burn brighter.

Title
Review for Elizabeth (1998)
"I am not your Elizabeth; I am no man's Elizabeth."
Watching ELIZABETH is like watching history dissolve before your very 
eyes.  It retrofits the reign of Elizabeth the First (Cate Blanchett) 
so that it becomes no more than a spectacle for our amusement here at 
the end of the twentieth century.  The poverty and the sickness, the 
abuse of the working and servant classes; the philosophies and habits 
of thought, the alchemical sense of world and being--all these and 
much more are ignored, while our own supposed interests are transposed 
into another era.  This is the story of Elizabeth as we would like it 
to be: all politics, sex, treachery, a "Dynasty" for the 1500s.  It's 
not exactly a bad movie, just an appallingly unsubtle one.
It is, however, craftily told and well played, charting Elizabeth's 
rise to power and assumption of responsibility.  When we meet her, she 
is just another well-bred lady with no sense of what it takes to be a 
ruler; shortly thereafter, she ascends to the throne, bastard 
half-sister of Queen Mary, who is now dead.  By the end, she has 
settled into that throne as the Virgin Queen, red tresses shorn, face 
masked in white greasepaint, ice-cold, diamond-hard.  The path she 
takes is a difficult one.  She has to tiptoe through the minefields of 
political expediency: Spain and France vie for her affection, hoping 
to subsume England through marriage; the factions in her own court 
plot her downfall, principal among them Lord Norfolk (Christopher 
Eccleston); she tries to balance her love for Lord Robert Dudley 
(Joseph Fiennes) against the nation's need for her to marry wisely and 
well and bear a child.
Elizabeth is unique among this dramatis personae: not only is she a 
woman, she's a time-traveller too.  She is not a historical figure, 
but a refugee from today, a mouthpiece for comfortably liberal PC 
beliefs: she's a feminist, she advocates freedom of religion, she's 
sexually liberated.  It's not that Elizabeth wouldn't make a good 
feminist icon--she does--but refusing to implicate her in her own time 
and its attendant prejudices means that her iconic status remains 
unearned.  It is too easy to identify with her, to root for her.  A 
woman who embodied progressive ideals despite the burden of her own 
assumptions and weaknesses would be a genuine icon.  A woman who 
retroactively embodies contemporary ideals--and their attendant 
prejudices--becomes merely a vehicle for the scriptwriter.  She has no 
interior life, no sense of human complexity.  She is perfect, 
transcendent: she is all surface, all illusion.
Blanchett's performance does make it a very convincing illusion, and 
the other actors too impart a zest and engagement to material that 
doesn't really deserve it.  They brood, they strut, they emote, they 
connive, all on cue, all by the numbers, with that impeccable sense of 
not-quite-overplayed theatricality that the Brits do so well.  
(Australians do it well too, apparently: Geoffrey Rush is deliciously 
wicked as Walsingham, an utter bastard but a loyal advisor.)   But the 
performances, and Remi Adefarasin's sumptuous photography, are rather 
spoiled by Shekhar Kapur (BANDIT QUEEN), whose direction seems 
inspired by a nigh-unbreachable diktat: never let a shot last more 
than five seconds, or, if you do, make sure the camera is always 
moving.  Coverage of a scene is one thing; this is smotherage.  It 
betokens a nervousness about the material, a refusal to let it stand 
on its own merits, and serves as a smokescreen to hide the hollowness 
of the thing, the lack of any authentic historical perspective.
It may seem rather unfair to criticize the movie for its 
ahistoricity: it is not an uncommon problem in period pieces, and it 
is to some extent a forgivable one.  We want to see the bright 
costumes, the sprightly dances, the hallowed rituals.  We don't want 
to see the dirt, the squalor, the disease.  We want story, not 
sociology.  But still: the sense in ELIZABETH that history exists 
solely for our entertainment is persistent and aggravating.
Consider a love scene in Elizabeth's bedroom: the bed happens to be 
veiled by translucent silk hangings, of the kind found in your average 
soft-core sex flick, so that the coyly half-shown lovemaking has that 
hazy-focus art-porn look.  Maybe Elizabeth's bedroom really did look 
like that, but I doubt it.  That's a minor quibble; the opening 
sequence is something else entirely.  It is a brutal depiction of 
heretics (i.e., Protestants) being burned at the stake.  While he 
elswhere opts for a sanitized version of Elizabethan life, Kapur's 
mise-en-scčne here is graphically bloody, sooty, grimy, real.  The 
scene's inclusion can be justified by only the flimsiest of pretexts; 
it is in effect being used for shock value, as a hook.  But real 
people died, real people burned, once upon a time, and there is 
something spurious and dishonest about Kapur's lackadaisical treatment 
of them.  ELIZABETH not only ignores the past, it exploits it.
The argument in favour of this approach may be that modernizing the 
material makes it more relevant: but the effect is precisely the 
opposite, for nothing has been learned.  By refusing to deal with 
Elizabeth I in her own terms, by dealing with her solely in our terms, 
the movie is of no interest to us, here, now, in 1998, except as 
diversion.  And it is, at times, a spectacular diversion, even if it 
is all overstatement.  If it were a book, all the key passages would 
be underlined, with exclamation marks--but, oh my, what fine-looking 
exclamation marks they would be.

Title
Review for Bad Boy Bubby (1993)
Starring Nicholas Hope, Claire Benito, Carmel Johnson, Ralph Cotterill;
Written and Directed by Rolf de Heer;
Cinematography by Ian Jones
        He has spent his entire life in an awful little apartment, raised
and cared for and imprisoned by his domineering mother.  She inspires his
love and his fear, and instills in him a similar love and fear of Jesus.
He has a rudimentary grasp of language, mouthing monosyllables and
repetitions of his mother's phrases.  He is taught that the world outside
is fatally poisonous; his mother dons a gasmask whenever she goes out the
door.  He is 35-years-old in body, but a child in mind and spirit.
        He is the premise for BAD BOY BUBBY, a defiantly original
Australian movie about a man called Bubby (Nicholas Hope) who has spent his
entire life in an awful little apartment, etc., etc.  Then one day his
father (Ralph Cotterill) appears.  His father is a shabby down-at-heels
priest who appears to have permanently misplaced his religion.
Unsurprisingly, he is not thrilled with the way "his" boy has turned out.
He is, however, rather pleased at renewing his acquaintance with the mother
(Claire Benito), and, more to the point, her ample breasts.  Soon they are
copulating on the dingy couch, while Bubby crouches, confused, in the next
room, acutely aware that the mother who had devoted all her attention to
him has a new interest.
        Bubby's relationship to the world may be warped, but it is at least
stable.  The father's arrival disturbs his precarious balance, causing an
Oedipal conflict which ends--Freud would be pleased--in violence and, as a
result, freedom.  Bubby intuits from his father's arrival that the air
outside is breathable: he leaves the apartment, his past, his world,
behind.
        So far, so good.  The first thirty minutes or so of BAD BOY BUBBY,
which bring us to this point, are quite brilliant.  The movie is at its
best when its stays within the constraints of Bubby's hermetic two-room
universe.  It follows through unrelentingly on the implications of its
premise: Bubby is used by his mother for sex, he unwittingly suffocates the
pet cat with cellophane, he is terrifed by the notion that Jesus will beat
him senseless if he sins.  It is grim and savage and appalling, but also
strangely tender--de Heer, having imagined a life as bizarre as Bubby's,
does not exaggerate for comic or grotesqe purposes, but simply empathizes.
He observes what it might be like.
        The intensity of these opening scenes, with their minimalist
mise-en-scene, immerses us in a claustrophobic environment which seems to
be a decayed stratum of our own world, and owes much to David Lynch's
ERASERHEAD, not least the ambient industrial white noise of the soundtrack.
For thirty minutes, the movie maintains the feel and mood of a reality
that does not seem far removed from our own.  Then de Heer lets Bubby out,
brings him into contact with our world, and the film never quite recovers.
        Our unlikely hero finds himself in Port Adelaide, where he wanders
the streets and meets people, where he suffers and learns and survives.
He is seduced by a young woman from a Salvation Army band (how an
anti-social half-wit with no sense of hygiene manages to get laid mere
hours after his escape is not the sort of question the film encourages,
wisely); he is given free pizza by a sympathetic waitress; he insults a
traffic cop and is punched in the stomach; he shares a few beers in the
back of a truck with a rock group; he is imprisoned and raped; he becomes a
translator for mentally handicapped people whose speech is impaired beyond
comprehension; he is loved by a motherly large-breasted nurse (Carmel
Johnson) . . .
        It goes on, by turns inventive, silly, tasteless, endearing, and
sometimes all of these things at once. De Heer never seems to be sure how
Bubby should interface with the real world: the tone shifts, uneasily, from
fable to realism to satire and back again.  The scenes which try to touch
base with a believable version of reality are the weakest; the film is best
understood as a kind of parable, and, indeed, the religious implications of
Bubby's experiences are foregrounded: icons of Jesus on the cross hang from
the mother's walls, Bubby dons a priest's collar stolen from his father, a
church organ-playing atheist lectures him on the necessity of unbelief, the
woman who redeems him is named Angel.  The manifold stresses of our world
do not shatter Bubby's mind, do not fragment him into psychosis; rather,
the world accomodates him, and heals him.
        Although de Heer's touch is at times overbearing, Bubby's salvation
is touching; what seemd at first a harsh lesson in the damaging effects of
the social construction of reality becomes a naďve humanist tale of
improbable hope.  A hapless rock group write a song about Bubby and sing it
for him and so give him the gift of community.  He returns the favour when
he steps on stage one night and becomes their frontman, turning the
fragmented impressions of his experiences into performance art, and turning
the band into a popular draw.  Innocence triumphs.  Bubby becomes a holy
fool, an idiot savant, and graces us with wisdom.  It's a strange turn of
events, but by now we shouldn't be surprised, because BAD BOY BUBBY ain't
like other movies.

Title
Review for Shikoku (1999)
"Do a person's feelings have to die with them?"
Starring Yui Natsukawa, Michitaka Tsutsui, Chiaki Kuriyama, Kie Negishi;
Directed by Shunichi Nagasaki;
Written by Kunimi Manda and Takenori Sento, from a novel by Masako Bando;
Cinematography by Noboru Shinoda
        SHIKOKU is named after its setting, and with good reason, for the
setting is vital to its success.  Shikoku is an island in Japan, removed
from the familiar urban environments of Tokyo, Osaka, and the other great
Japanese cities.  It is a remote place where the primal forces of the earth
have not been paved over.  The sky is wide and blue, the mountains are
steep and verdant.  Temples with priapic pillars and womb-like openings
lurk in the depths of the forest.  SHIKOKU tells the story of a woman who
seeks to bring back her daughter from the underworld of the dead, and, in
this setting, it resonates with ancient myths, taking on an elemental power
which is hard to resist.
        Eighty-eight temples circle Shikoku.  They act as a seal,
buttressing the island against the influence of the dead.  Buddhist priests
circle the island, travelling from temple to temple, chanting, invoking,
maintaining the seals.  But the seals can be undone: by traversing the
temples in the reverse order, and performing the appropriate rituals, the
boundary between the living and the dead can be weakened.  Complete the
circuit once for each year of the deceased's life, and she will be brought
back.  The name of the island itself reflects its dual nature: it can mean
both "The Island of the Four Lands" and "The Island of the Dead."
        Sayori was sixteen when she died.  Her mother is a priestess who
can summon spirits, and she decides to resurrect her daughter, so that her
bloodline may continue.  As this is happening, Sayori's childhood friend
Hinako returns to her home village for the first time as an adult.  There
she meets another old friend, Sayori's high school sweetheart Fumiya, and
learns of Sayori's death.  In the days that follow, Fumiya and Hinako are
both haunted by sightings of Sayori's restless spirit.  They become further
perturbed when they learn that Sayori's father has been in a coma for eight
years after a mysterious accident.  They seek advice from a folklore
expert, who tells them about the 88 seals and how they may be broken.  They
learn that Sayori's mother is on her sixteenth pilgrimage around the
island.  They begin to piece it all together, with a growing sense of
dread--which the audience shares.
        The sense of dread, unfortunately, is often undermined by a kind of
niceness or prettiness which underlies the film.  It is beautiful to
behold: the lead actress is beautiful, the village is beautiful, the
surrounding countryside is beautiful.  The cinematography is especially
beautiful, awash in hazy evening sunshine and moon-lit forest mists and
rippling blue light reflected off the surface of still waters.  All well
and good, but it's difficult to feel scared by a movie that at times
resembles an unusually elegant travel brochure.
        The nicety extends to the characters as well.  The ghost is
motivated by that most acceptable of undead sentiments: a love which defies
the boundaries of life and death.  She does bad things, but she is
sympathetic.  Hinako and Fumiya are attracted to each other, and though the
power of ghost stories is amplified by repressed emotions, they are allowed
a tender, perfunctory romantic interlude which effectively unleashes all
their repressions.  In the closing sequence, when drama is called for, we
are instead given an overlong scene in which the characters work out their
differences by having what is almost a therapeutic chat.  Then a dramatic
resolution does come, but Hinako--our focal point--is more observer than
participant.  The brunt of the disaster is not borne by her, and what
should be tragedy seems like mere misfortune.
        Director Shunichi Nagasaki otherwise handles the material expertly.
SHIKOKU does the things horror movies are supposed to do, and does them
well.  A pale hand, slimed with algae, emerging from a black pool.  A bare
room wallpapered with sheets of paper bearing the 88 seals, fluttering in
the wind.  A marvellous scene in which Fumiya sits at a desk reading, and
another character places her hand on his shoulder, and he talks to her
without looking back--but the woman he thinks he's talking to is not the
one who has her hand on his shoulder.  The dramatic irony is played for all
its worth.  None of this is revolutionary, but there is still a deep
pleasure to be gained from a movie which takes timeworn elements and uses
them so well that it almost makes them seem new.  Almost.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Kanzo Sensei (1998)
Starring Akira Emoto, Kumiko Aso, Juro Kara, Masanori Sera, Jacques
Gamblin, Keiko Matsuzaka;
Directed by Shohei Imamura;
Written by Imamura and Daisuke Tengan, from a novel by Ango Sakaguchi;
Cinematography by Shigeru Komatsubara
        DR. AKAGI--a farcical tragedy about (in no particular order) a blue
whale, grave-robbing, a nuclear bomb, hepatitis, a Dutch spy, a morphine
addict, a microscope, an arc lamp, a bayonet-wielding granny, and the fate
of virgin boys in battle--is reputedly the final film by the great Japanese
director Shohei Imamura.  If so, he goes out with a bang--not that a
whimper was ever likely.  It is not his definitive work, but it is
representative of his vision of human life as anarchic, fertile, harsh,
communal, bawdy, and, above all, resilient.
        World War II is nearing its end.  The small Japanese town of Hibi
is not what you would call strategically important, and it experiences the
war at a distance, in radio broadcasts and air-raid sirens.  But the
psychic stresses the community feels are no less painful, and the people of
Hibi mostly cope by means of the usual opiates--sex, drugs, alcohol--but
while the opiates are usual, the people are not, including a drunken
priest, a cynical morphine-addicted doctor, a
prostitute-turned-doctor's-assistant (latest in a long line of pragmatic,
carnal, emotive Imamura heroines), and so on.  They are vividly portrayed,
in the round, and the anguished sense that they use their vices as
desperate survival strategies, as ways of both coping with and escaping
from war-time reality, is moving.
        Then there is Dr. Akagi, who stands apart.  Our first sight of him
is revealing.  He is running, as he often does, from one patient's home to
the next.  He is immaculate and comic in a pristine white suit and shirt,
knee-length black stockings and bow-tie, legs pumping furiously as a jaunty
jazz theme plays on the soundtrack.  The mock pomposity of this first
impression is apt: there is something both absurd and admirable about
Akagi, in his futile devotion and his fruitless heroics.
        A middle-aged widower with a son serving in the army, he is
unsparing of himself in his attention to his patients, but he also
diagnoses all of them with hepatitis, and is affectionately mocked as a
charlatan and "Dr. Liver."  Nevertheless, he is beloved.  He never seems to
heal anyone, but he persists: if he did not, he might have to think about
his son, his wife, the war, things for which there is no diagnosis, no
prescription.
        He is fond of telling anyone who will listen that hepatitis will be
the next epidemic to sweep Japan, if preventive measures are not taken.  It
soon becomes clear that while Akagi truly believes he is talking about
swollen livers, what the film is talking about is something else.
Hepatitis is what happens when the body can no longer process its toxins
properly, and, metaphorically, that is what is happening to Japan:
destructive energies are not being contained, but are running rampant
through the country, manifest as participation in the war.  Every patient
whom we see Akagi treat is treated for hepatitis (except, significantly,
his one foreign patient), but what he is really trying--and failing--to
treat is the underlying sickness of Japanese society.
        When the nuclear bombs fall, in the end, as they must, it is the
ultimate symptom of the sickness.  The bomb may be dropped by America, but
the blame, in DR. AKAGI, must be shouldered by Japan: the nuclear attack is
the fatal consequence of the disease of war, the disease Japan refused to
treat.  It is a harsh message, and beneath the vital profuse energy that
fuels the film, there is anger and sadness: anger that no one cured the
sickness, sadness because maybe it couldn't be cured anyway.
        DR. AKAGI is a busy movie: there's a lot going on, a lot of people,
a lot of plots.  It tries, with considerable gusto, to bring life to each
character, each story, but it takes on too much.  It is crammed full of
life, only to become something of a mess.  Perhaps that is the necessary
price of any attempt to show life as chaotic and haphazard, but in DR.
AKAGI the disordered shapelessness of the film almost cripples its central
thrust.
        Then there is the ending, which, despite its uneven execution, is
laudable for its audacity, and memorable.  While his earlier (and better)
BLACK RAIN was an unusually sober and gravely respectful look at the
aftermath of the nuclear bombing, Imamura here frames a response to the
bombing that is characteristic of his work as a whole.  He provokes a sense
both of pathos and preposterousness, as his characters look upon the rising
mushroom cloud and discuss it in terms that are utterly banal and wildly
inappropriate.  He strives to wed the sublime to the ridiculous, but some
risible special effects disrupt the complex discordance of tone, the
attempt to shape the conflicted impulses of the film into something great.
It is an attempt that fails, but not by much.

Title
Review for Dong (1998)
"We are grateful that we have the songs of Grace Chan to comfort us."
Taiwan, 24/12/99.  The millenium approaches.  An incessant downpour 
batters an unnamed city.  Sectors of the city are being sealed, 
quarantined due to the onset of a mysterious virus.  The virus causes 
people to act like insects: they crawl about on all fours, hide from 
bright lights, huddle in damp corners.  The water supply to the 
quarantined zones will be cut off in a week's time.  Residents are 
advised to evacuate the area, ASAP.
This premise--Kafka by way of Cronenberg--is the background for THE 
HOLE, which could have been a great movie, but, sadly, ends up as a 
waste of good ideas.  The quick sketch above suggests a dark, absurd, 
hallucinatory near-future parable of life in the late 20th century; in 
execution, however, it is nothing like that.
 The virus, the evacuation, the visual possiblities of the deluge: 
these are all relegated to the background.  Instead, THE HOLE focuses 
on the lives--for want of a better word--of a man (Lee Kang-Sheng) and 
a woman (Yang Kuei-Mei) who live in the same apartment building, and 
who have no personalities.  The entire movie taks place in settings 
that are uniformly ugly and sterile: the charmless rooms and corridors 
of a post-industrial apartment complex, photographed to look as dim 
and dingy as possible.  It's a vivid setting, but an unappealing one, 
especially with the monotonous hiss of falling rain and the gurgle of 
drainage pipes in the background.
The man lives in the apartment directly above the woman's.  One day, 
a repairman investigating a leak leaves a small hole in the floor of 
the man's living room, opening into the ceiling of the woman's living 
room.  This hole--symbol of the solitary opening in the character's 
lonely, compartmented lives--allows them to interact in unusual (and 
mostly non-verbal) ways.
Example: the man, suffering from the onset of the virus (or so I 
assume--everything is obscure in this movie) vomits through the hole.  
The woman, wandering around in the dark, accidentally puts her hand on 
his vomit, and then cleans it up.  This is what passes for meaningful 
communication.  And they say romance is dead.
Much of the film does not even focus on their interactions, such as 
they are.  There is almost no dialogue and we learn next to nothing 
about these people.  They are ciphers.  Instead, we are treated to 
long takes in which we witness their miserable lives; we watch, for 
instance, as the woman boils some water, pours it onto some noodles, 
then eats the noodles.  (This is as fascinating as it sounds.)
Offered as counterpoint--or perhaps relief--to these dreary sequences 
are a series of musical numbers, fantasies in which the woman 
lip-synchs to pop songs by Grace Chan (popular, so I'm told, in 1950s' 
China).  She prances around in grimy hallways and grungy stairwells, 
incronguously lit by cheerfully bright spotlights.  Sometimes, in 
these fantasies, she is joined by the man.  These scenes are 
presumably intended to be bright and fanciful, sharply contrasting the 
dreariness of reality, but they fail.  When the man and the woman 
dance, it seems half-hearted and listless.  Astaire and Rogers this is 
not.  Even in imagination, these people are numb, weary, boring.
THE HOLE is part of the 'Collection 2000' series, a group of films 
commissioned by French TV station La Sept ARTE on the subject of the 
millenium.  Others include Canada's LAST NIGHT, Brazil's MIDNIGHT, and 
American Hal Hartley's THE BOOK OF LIFE.  THE BOOK OF LIFE is the only 
other one that I have seen, and it is infinitely superior to the 
Taiwanese entry.  Witty, energetic, humane, it makes the THE HOLE seem 
(ahem) empty.
American movies with nothing to say try to disguise their lack of 
content with flashy movements, quick cuts, superficial emotions.  
Foreign movies with nothing to say do what THE HOLE does: they point 
the camera at something of minimal interest for unbelievably long 
periods of time, and call it art.  THE HOLE is self-evidently a film 
about alienation, and perhaps director Tsai Ming-Liang wants the 
audience to share in his characters' alienation.  If so, he succeeds.  
Perhaps it is a challenge: he dares us to enjoy this movie, despite 
his best attempts to ensure that we don't.  If it was a challenge, I 
wasn't up for it.

Title
Review for Narayama bushiko (1982)
"Old Orin was a lucky woman.  Snow fell when she went to Narayama."
Starring Ken Ogata, Sumiko Sakamoto, Tonpei Hidari, Seiji Kurasaki
Directed & Written by Shohei Imamura
Cinematography by Masao Tochizawa
Life is hard for the people on the mountain.  Their late 19th century 
village is far from civilization, in northern Japan, and they struggle 
to subsist on the meagre fruits of the earth.   Marriages are not 
decided by anything as frivolous as love, but rather by the need to 
survive, to perpetuate the species.  Dead babies are dumped 
unceremoniously in a neighbour's rice field; living babies, especially 
girls, may be sold. Justice is swift and merciless; whole families may 
be brutally punished for a crime committed by one member.
People who live in a place like this need something to give them 
hope, something to provide structure and meaning for their hardships.  
For the people in this village, that something is Narayama.  It is not 
clear, until near the movie's end, what exactly Narayama is, but we 
know it holds deep significance.  A younger woman, seriously ill, 
laments that she may die without visiting Narayama.  An older woman, 
nearing the age of 70, the age when people make the trip to Narayama, 
speaks of her impending journey with eagerness; she is so determined 
to go that she breaks off her front teeth, smashing them with a stone, 
to prove her health is failing and it is time for her to depart.
Ken Ogata (THE PILLOW BOOK, MISHIMA) has top billing in the film, but 
the centre of the story is his mother, Orin (Sumiko Sakamoto), the old 
woman readying herself to go to Narayama.  Ogata plays her elder son, 
Tatsuhei, who is deeply concerned with his family's honour and his 
duties towards them--so much so that he does not much seem to enjoy 
life.  The younger son (Tonpei Hidari) is a simple lad, with a rather 
poor sense of hygiene--so much so that no woman in the village will 
sleep with him, and he takes his pleasure from a neighbour's dog.  
Tatsuhei's son, Kesa (Seiji Kurasaki), has not yet learned the 
difficult truths that age will bring; he cavorts with young women of 
the village, impregnating one girl, with no heed for the consequences.  
A baby is not a happy addition to the home: it is an extra mouth to 
feed.
 The first two-thirds of the movie observe Orin's life, and that of 
her family and their neighbours, during the months preceding her 
departure.  We see her arrange for a woman to have sex with her 
younger son, making sure he has lost his virginity before she leaves; 
we see her subtly enforce the village's strong-arm justice, when she 
sends Kesa's pregnant girlfriend off to her family one night, knowing 
that they are to be punished for a crime her father committed.  The 
punishment is shown in objective, horrifying detail, and is one of the 
film's most powerful moments.  Imamura sometimes seems to view these 
people's lives as a long, miserable journey toward death, especially 
in moments of raw brutality like this dispensation of justice.  There 
is beauty in the film, but it has little to do with the people.  
Scenes of animals copulating, hunting, preying on one another, are 
intercut with the villager's activities, and these are stirring 
images, as are various longshots of wilderness vistas, but they seem 
to show human life as at best an irrelevancy, at worst an 
embarrassment, in this primal world.
But the first part of the movie, somewhat confused and overlong, is 
merely preparation for the bravura finale, when we finally learn why 
the villagers regard Narayama with such reverence.  Its location is a 
secret, conferred to Tatsuhei and Orin in a special ceremony, and the 
directions include going around a pond three times, passing through 
the Seven Valleys, that sort of thing.  Tatsuhei and Orin undertake 
this near-mythic journey, and the film becomes a remarkable meditation 
on human mortality, a meditation achieved through powerful, simple 
images.
There are bold, visionary moments (which I will not reveal) in these 
closing scenes, but there are also quiet, intimate moments, equally 
significant.  Tatsuhei comes upon an old, crude bridge, made of three 
planks; two of them are rotten and fall away at his touch, yet he is 
prepared to crawl across the one remaining plank, exhausted, feet raw 
and bleeding, Orin on his back, so that his mother can reach her goal.  
She says nothing, but taps him on the shoulder and motions for him to 
find another route.  This moment, and what it says about their 
unspoken love for each other, is powerful.  Later, they come upon 
other travellers headed for Narayama, a son carrying his father; the 
son treats the father in a peremptory, brusque manner, and then 
commits an act of shocking cruelty.  There is no love, no respect, and 
the difference between this pair and Orin and Tatsuhei is, we sense, 
the difference between a life without meaning and a life with some 
meaning.  It is nuances like this that earn a filmmaker adjectives 
like "great."
Shohei Imamura has been making films for 40 years now, and is indeed 
considered by some to be one of the world's great directors; as with 
many other great foreign directors currently at work, his films are 
difficult to find in North America, even though he is one of only 
three directors (the others being Francis Ford Coppola and Emil 
Kusturica) to have won two Palmes d'Or, one for this film and the 
other for 1997's THE EEL.
He is a difficult filmmaker, whose works offer no easy pleasures.  
His vision of the world is bleak and dark and pessimistic.  He doesn't 
give his characters any lucky breaks, but, then, life hasn't given 
them any lucky breaks either.  It is easy to dismiss him as a cold 
nihilist.  But Imamura has taken it upon himself, throughout his long 
career, to explore the lives of the disenfranchised, to give them a 
voice, and there is more compassion in this choice than in a dozen 
exercises in cheap sentimentality.   He considers the lives of people 
most filmmakers don't want to consider: the prostitute in THE INSECT 
WOMAN, the serial killer in VENGEANCE IS MINE, the radiation victims 
in BLACK RAIN, and a 70-year-old woman, nearing death in a remote 
mountain village.  While he offers his characters few comforts, this 
makes the rewards they do earn all the more meaningful.  Because we 
have seen a measure of the pain she has suffered, the peace earned by 
Orin at the end of THE BALLAD OF NARAYAMA is truly profound, and so is 
the film.

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
"This job would be great if it wasn't for the fucking customers."
Starring Brian O'Halloran, Jeff Anderson, Marilyn Ghigliotti, Lisa Spoonhauer
Written & Directed by Kevin Smith
Cinematography by David Klein
        Kevin Smith is a frustrating director.  The man clearly has talent: 
last year's CHASING AMY was a smart, funny, surprisingly wise film.  
But the wretched MALLRATS and the uneven CLERKS seem to be the work of 
a lazy writer, someone with inspiration and skill, but without the 
discipline to keep his work at a consistently high level of quality.  
CLERKS was Smith's debut, and, in a sense, it anticipates both CHASING 
AMY and MALLRATS.  It is a hit-and-miss affair (with the emphasis on 
miss): moments of CHASING AMY's wit are interspersed throughout 
tedious stretches of MALLRATS' juvenile humour.
        The premise is simple.  We follow an eventful day in the life of 
Dante (Brian O'Halloran), a clerk in a convenience store.  He is 
visited by his girlfriend and ex-girlfriend (Marilyn Ghigliotti, Lisa 
Spoonhauer), attends a wake, plays hockey on the roof of the store, 
and discusses RETURN OF THE JEDI, auto-fellatio, and the worthlessness 
of guidance counsellors, usually accompanied by Randal (Jeff 
Anderson), the clerk from the adjacent video store.  Jay and Silent 
Bob (Jason Mewes, Kevin Smith) hang around outside the store, 
occasionally dropping in.  And, of course, Dante and Randal must deal 
with obnoxious customers, like a man in search of perfect eggs and a 
man who won't stop talking about tabloid headlines--at least not until 
someone spits water in his face.
        Much of the film consists of nothing more than a few characters 
relaxing and talking.  Smith, fortunately, has a flair for dialogue, 
and isn't afraid to let his characters be smart and verbose.  Some of 
the lines are good (high school is about "algebra, bad lunch, and 
infidelity"); others fall flat.  The actors, unfortunately, aren't 
quite up to the challenge of making the dialogue sound authentic.  
Mostly, it sounds like exactly what it is--contrived, scripted lines.  
O'Halloran is quite good, but the rest of the cast are not able to 
deliver their lines in a natural, unstilted manner, and often sound 
like they are reading from a teleprompter.
        They are not helped by Smith's direction: there are many static, long 
takes of characters simply talking and doing little else.  Woody Allen 
has used this technique to great effect, but while Smith may have a 
flair for dialogue, as a director he is nowhere near Allen's level.  
The film, as a result, grows tedious after a while, not helped by some 
recurring jokes which lose whatever charm they had very, very quickly.  
The frequent use of 'chapter' titles like "Perspicacity" and "Malaise" 
is particularly annoying, being both pointless and unfunny, as is a 
recurring joke about shoe polish.
        The film as a whole is too contrived for my taste.  Smith tries too 
hard to be funny: the people who visit the store are caricatures and 
the situations are exaggerated, telegraphing the humour.  A less 
forced approach could have resulted in a funnier film: allowing the 
situations to develop naturally, allowing the customers to seem real, 
would have given us a better pay-off.  Smith has a gift for observing 
the natural interactions between people, yet seems afraid to let them 
remain natural.  And some sequences are simply tedious, like the 
rooftop hockey game.  CLERKS is a good idea, poorly executed.
        That this movie was made at all--and then distributed--is something 
of a triumph, however, given its infinitesimal budget and 
less-than-stellar production values.  And Smith's profane, 
self-indulgent dialogue is a refreshing contrast to all those 
Hollywood films where dialogue is used only to further the plot.  But 
the intended effect is better than the final result, and after CHASING 
AMY, CLERKS' pleasures seem even less rewarding.  Let's hope Smith is 
able to make more films as good as his last one, and doesn't get lazy 
again.

Title
Review for Xiao Wu (1997)
        One becomes accustomed to seeing the world on screen distorted by
the conventions of cinematic "realism," so it is rather a shock to see a
movie which resembles life as it might actually be lived.  XIAO WU is a
low-budget Chinese film which opens a window onto small-town China.  It
gives us a view unobstructed by the things which distance most movies from
actuality: no narrative structure, no famous actors, no technical polish.
It is not a documentary, but it might as well be.
        It is set in Fenyang, a dusty provincial town not likely to be
found in any tourist brochures.  Fenyang is director Jia Zhangke's
hometown, and his actors are non-professionals.  Town and people are
presented with a spare, unglamourous style which emphasizes above all what
this place is like, seemingly without exaggeration and certainly without
romanticization.  Xiao Wu is a pickpocket living a rather aimless existence
in the town.  The movie follows him through the days and nights of his
life.
        Xiao Wu's former partner in crime is now a respectable
businessman--which is to say, he sells cigarettes.  He is getting married.
Xiao Wu, an embarrassing reminder of the businessman's past, is not invited
to the wedding.  Sometime in their past, Xiao Wu promised a gift to his
former friend.  To honour his promise, he shows up before the wedding
reception and offers his gift.  The two men sit down in a back room and
have an awkward conversation, seen as one long unbroken take.  It is one of
the film's best scenes, capturing the two men's respective characters with
precision, suggesting the weight of the emotional history between them
without verbalizing it.
        But the film does not stitch scenes like this into a larger design.
We witness a succession of incidents in Xiao Wu's life, related only by
the fact that they all happen to the same man and they all serve the film's
political agenda (like most Chinese movies seen in the West these days, it
is a harsh critique of communism).  Xiao Wu goes to a brothel and befriends
a prostitute.  He has dinner with his family.  He falls under the suspicion
of the local chief of police after some ID cards are stolen.  There is no
sense of imposed narrative, no sense that the film is moving toward
closure.  Instead, there are long unbroken takes which ignore the demands
of drama.
        A representative sequence: Xiao Wu and the prostitute he is sort of
dating sit together in bed.  They talk.  They are silent.  They smoke.  The
smoke drifts in the air.  Background sounds from the street emphasise the
silence in the room.  She sings.  They smoke some more.  Smoke drifts.  She
asks Xiao Wu to sing.  He demurs, embarrassed.  The camera never moves.
        The movie as a whole is similar in approach: it lets things happen,
not forcing them in any particular direction.  Xiao Wu purchases a pager.
His girlfriend has his number.  One day, he goes to the apartment she
shares with some other prostitutes and discovers that she has gone away
with some men from the city.  He waits for her to page him.  Each time his
pager goes off, we wait for it to be her, expecting a resolution to their
relationship.  But she never pages him.  That's not the way this movie
works.
        The thrust of the film, instead, is simply to _see_ Xiao Wu.  He is
under our scrutiny throughout the film, which strips away the clutter and
distraction of plot and laboured symbolism and postcard photography, and is
instead content to observe.  This impulse toward exposure becomes literal
at one point, when Xiao Wu is alone in a public bathhouse.  We see him
fully naked.  He sings--something he has refused to do in public, in front
of his girlfriend.  It is here that XIAO WU crystallizes into the
epiphanous vision of one man's private life that it strives to be.
        It is easy to become impatient with the film's methods, but what it
accomplishes, in the end, is rare.  We are given some obscure understanding
of Xiao Wu's existence, freed of moralizing or generalizations.  He is not
a victim or a hero or an everyman.  He is himself.  That is XIAO WU's
triumph: it shows a man who is no more than what he is.  It shows us what
it is that makes him, like all of us, unique.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Husbands and Wives (1992)
"People grow apart; it's a lot of little personal things."
Starring Woody Allen, Mia Farrow, Judy Davis, Sydney Pollack, Liam 
Neeson, Juliette Lewis
Written & Directed by Woody Allen
Cinematography by Carlo di Palma
In MANHATTAN, Woody Allen filmed a love letter to New York; it was a 
romantic, sentimental vision of a city and its people, full of glorious 
black-and-white postcard shots and charming portraits.  Diane Keaton's 
character's obsessive self-analysis came across as an endearing 
mannerism, while Mariel Hemingway's teenage love interest did not 
represent anything unhealthy, but simply a stabilizing influence and a 
naďve faith in life to counter the Allen character's angst.
My, how things change.  HUSBANDS & WIVES, fifteen years later, turns 
MANHATTAN inside out.  If the earlier film was an unequivocal 
declaration of love, then the later one is the divorce proceedings after 
the relationship has broken down.  Here, we see a New York that is drab 
and brown and anonymous, filmed with a jittery hand-held camera.  Mia 
Farrow's character's constant dissection of herself and her relationship 
is aggravating in the extreme; Juliette Lewis, the precocious love 
interest, represents nothing healthy at all, but instead typifies the 
Allen character's self-destructive obsession with unstable women.  
  It is occasionally very funny (e.g., when Judy Davis's character 
reveals what she actually thinks about during sex), but more often than 
not it is painful and uncomfortable.  Where MANHATTAN was three-quarters 
comedy and one-quarter drama, HUSBANDS & WIVES inverses those 
proportions.  It pries into the characters' innermost lives, and exposes 
them, warts and all--although, figuratively speaking, when you take away 
the warts, there isn't much left. 
But they seem to be happy enough, when we first meet them.  Gabe and 
Judy (Allen, Farrow), a married couple, are about to go out to dinner 
with their good friends Sally and Jack (Davis, Sydney Pollack), when 
Sally and Jack drop a bombshell: they are planning to separate.  This 
stuns Gabe and especially Judy, who is more upset than either Sally or 
Jack, both of whom discuss their separation with equanimity.  No one's 
angry, they say; it's not a tragedy.  But they are; it is.
The "happy" separation lasts until Jack moves in with someone else.  
Then, in one of the finest scenes, Sally, furious, calls him up and 
rants at him, as her date for the evening listens from another room.   
Sally hurls accusations at her ex, then walks out, smooths down her 
dress, and assures her date that she's fine ... then walks back to the 
other room, calls Jack again, and raves some more.  The violently raw 
emotion of Sally's monologue makes us cringe; the reaction shots of her 
date in the other room make us laugh.  Allen, handling his material as 
well as he ever has, is able to make both the drama and the comedy work: 
the tone is always just right.
After Sally and Jack separate, and reveal the cuts that have been 
festering beneath the band-aid of their marriage, Gabe and Judy in turn 
analyze their own relationship.  She wants a baby; he doesn't.  They 
argue.  Finally, he agrees to have sex without contraception, and she 
doesn't want to: now she's not ready for a baby.  This kind of emotional 
doublethink is second nature to these people, and Allen sees it very 
clearly, as when Judy sets up Sally with one of her co-workers (Liam 
Neeson), only to admit later that she was attracted to him herself.
While there is a cutting edge to his wit, Allen is not cruel to his 
characters.  Jack's new amour, a "tofu and crystals" New Age woman, is 
lampooned quite savagely, but she comes across much better than Jack in 
one startling sequence, when he becomes furious with her for embarassing 
him at a party, and ends up embarassing himself more than she ever 
could.  Nothing is straightforward.
Allen could treat these people with disdain, with their euphemisms and 
their analysts and their rationalizations and their self-absorption, but 
instead he sees them for what they are: fairly average people struggling 
to make some sort of accomodation with life, to make some sense of their 
incoherent emotions.  And while there is sympathy, there is also a 
refusal to allow them to make any excuses.  This even-handedness, this 
maturity, is what distinguishes the movie from similar--but more 
simplistic--comedies of modern-day manners.  MANHATTAN may be the better 
movie, but HUSBANDS & WIVES is the wiser one.

Title
Review for War Zone, The (1999)
        There is never a moment when we do not suspect something is wrong.
The household is filled with silences and shadows.  Family members talk to
each other, but there is an underlying tension.  The teenaged son and
daughter are sullen and withdrawn--which is perfectly acceptable teenaged
behaviour, but here seems excessive and disturbing.  Outside their solitary
house in Devonshire, the lowering clouds are ominous and oppressive, and
the grey sea crashes against the black rocks of the shore.  All is bleak.
        In sunlight, it would be merely a pretty and peaceful swathe of the
English coast, but there is no sunlight in THE WAR ZONE, Tim Roth's
masterful directorial debut.  The cliché says that all actors really want
to be directors, even though most of them should be content with acting.
Roth, on the other hand, as good an actor as he is, might want to give up
his day job.  He manages one of the trickiest feats in cinema: conveying
through the medium of film the dense emotional complexities that we find in
great novels.  The cumulative power of THE WAR ZONE is frightening.
        The opening scenes set the table for the revelation and anguish
which will follow.  Roth's direction at first seems rather mannered: the
camera is static and holds for a long time on quiet, restrained scenes.
Nothing much happens.  It soon becomes apparent that this is not a
stylistic tic, however, but mere reportage.  This is a household where
nothing much does happen: the silences are not exaggerated, they are a
symptom.  The source of the ambiguous malaise that besets the family is
soon revealed: the daughter, Jessie, is being sexually abused by her
father.  No one knows until the son, Tom, comes home one night and sees his
father and his sister in the bath together through a window.  The family
dynamics are already strained by the arrival of a newborn baby--a
daughter--and Tom's discovery places a burden on him whose impact drives
the film.
        Incest and abuse are terrible subjects for fiction.  Good art
thrives on shades of grey, but sexual abuse is black and white: there is a
victim, and a perpetrator.  Right, and wrong.  To tell us what is right and
what is wrong is redundant.  To offer therapeutic clichés is at best
earnest and at worst trivializing.  To steer between the Scylla of
overwrought sincerity and the Charybdis of glib simplification is
difficult.  It is a testament to the sensitivity of THE WAR ZONE that it
never once strikes the wrong note.  It approaches its subject
unflinchingly, including one graphic and appalling scene, but it is not
exploitative.  It leaves no doubt about the sins being committed by the
father, but it does not preach needlessly.
        Instead, the focus is on what abuse means to those who suffer it.
It is about the psychological fall-out of the trauma.  Both Ray Winstone
(NIL BY MOUTH) as the father and Tilda Swinton as the mother are excellent,
but they are good actors; what is exceptional about THE WAR ZONE are the
performances by the two teenagers, who are reportedly non-actors, and whose
ability to give nuanced expression to such complex pain is astonishing.
        Freddie Cunliffe, as Tom, plays a boy who is taciturn and
undemonstrative, yet we are able to perceive the tumult of conflicting
emotions that surges within him, as he wrestles with his moral crisis.  His
emotions register only in the smallest gestures of his body language, in
subtle modulations of his expression, but there is no mistaking them.  Lara
Belmont, as Jessie, plays the most damaged and the most complex character,
and is even better.  She shows us both the glib facade that Jessie presents
to the world and the wretched humiliation she nurses within her, and these
divergent selves always seem like aspects of the same young woman.  There
is a delicately understated scene involving the brother and sister and a
cigarette lighter and such contradictory and inchoate emotions that few
actors could manage it.  It is a scene which could go wrong in so many
ways, yet Cunliffe and Belmont play it perfectly, generating fierce drama.
        THE WAR ZONE offers no answers.  There are none which would not be
facile.  It simply bears witness, refusing to impose false resolutions.
Tom and Jessie are victims, but they are also imperfect.  Tom at first
thinks his sister is a willing participant, and blames her as well as their
father for what is happening.  He unthinkingly makes cutting remarks which
aggravate her sense of self-loathing.  These scenes are painful, as we
understand the damage being done while Tom does not, but they are honest,
as is the entire movie.
        The title at first seems odd, for there is no war, no zone.  By the
end, once we understand what the movie is about, it could not seem more
appropriate.  The war zone is the place where these people live, and
although there are no guns, tanks, or trenches, there is savage and
unbearable violence of the soul and, for Jess, of the body.  And, as in all
wars, there are survivors who bear wounds so deep they may never heal,
wounds for which there is no justification.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Kauas pilvet karkaavat (1996)
"Take a number, fill out a form, and wait your turn."
Starring Kati Outinen, Kari Vההnהnen, Sakari Kuosmanen, Elina Salo;
Written & Directed by Aki Kaurismהki;
Cinematography by Timo Salminen
It might be possible to call DRIFTING CLOUDS a satire or a black 
comedy, but that would imply a sense of anger, of vitriol, of energy; 
DRIFTING CLOUDS is what you get when the rage and vitality are gone.  
It is the sad, slow story of Lauri and Ilona, a married couple caught 
between the wheels of capitalism as it grinds inexorably onward.  He 
loses his job as a tram driver, because everyone drives cars nowadays.  
Within a couple of months, she loses her position as a head waiter, 
when her restaurant is bought out by a chain and the entire staff 
replaced.
A conversation early in the film reveals a lot about their situation.  
Lauri has surprised Ilona by buying her a TV, which she greets with 
little enthusiasm.  She notes that they haven't finished paying for 
the bookshelves or the couch yet.  He says that in four years the 
payments will be done and then they can buy some books for the 
shelves.  It would pass as deadpan humour if it wasn't spoken with 
such resigned weariness.
This sets the tone for the rest of the movie.  There is humour and 
idiosyncracy at the periphery, but at the centre there is frustration 
and futility, and sorrow for the ways in which the logic of profit 
reduces people, until their worth is equated solely with their earning 
capacity.  There is an element of political commentary in this 
critique of the mechanisms of capitalism and the stultifying social 
environment it creates, but in DRIFTING CLOUDS the political is 
subsumed by the personal: the movie is about two people and what 
happens to them, and nothing else matters.
Lauri and Ilona live lives starved for friendship, respect, culture, 
passion.  They go to the movies, and walk out past old posters for 
L'ATALANTE and L'ARGENT, but the movie they have just seen is a 
pointless, violent, unfunny comedy.  Their house and workplaces are 
uniformly unpleasant, painted and upholstered in lifeless colours 
(ugly greens, dull reds, insipid blues), full of inelegantly 
functional objects and appliances.  The art design is impeccable in 
its tawdriness, and director Aki Kaurismהki often matches the colour 
of characters' clothes with the background colour and/or lighting, so 
that it seems as if they are almost physically fading into the 
environment.   There is no suggestion of sexuality in the 
relationship; Ilona and Lauri sleep in separate beds and their 
gestures of affection lack the heat of desire; their lives are now 
bound by something more complex and desperate than love.
Their downward, downsized, downtrodden lives have a momentum that is 
almost comic, as one setback succeeds another, bottoming out when 
Lauri stakes all their remaining money on the spin of a roulette 
wheel.  It must have been tempting to play the story for more laughs, 
more farce, more deadpan wit, but the film's great strength is the 
sober, empathic manner in which it observes Lauri and Ilona's 
misfortunes.  Irony would be an injustice.  Situations and settings 
are broad and exaggerated--this is not realism--but they are not 
distorted.  The emotions are authentic.
If it is difficult to laugh at anything that happens, despite the 
droll performances, the laconic humour, that's because Kaurismהki 
brings such compassion and understanding to the manifold indignities 
that are suffered.   He shows us how humiliating it must be for a 
woman of thirty-eight, who has worked long and hard to win a 
respectable position, to be forced to accept a job as a dishwasher in 
a two-bit restaurant; how humiliating it must be for a man nearing 50 
to confront his wife's former employer, demanding the rest of her 
wages, only to have the crap beaten out of him, unable to land a 
single punch, when the employer and his cronies refuse to give him the 
money.
All this is observed keenly, with great economy: every cut, every 
line of dialogue, is judicious.  If most films are novelistic in their 
telling, this one brings the focus and concentration of a short story 
to bear.  But what is gained in nuance and acumen is rather undermined 
by the sense that the material barely accommodates the 96-minute 
running length.   I have seen many movies far less profound, less 
humane, less necessary than DRIFTING CLOUDS, but they filled me with 
an urge to watch them again, and this one did not.  It does not need 
to be seen twice: its every detail and implication can be absorbed in 
one viewing.
It is not a movie that will be seen by a large audience, because it 
cannot be pitched to one.  There is no selling point.  It is all 
understatement, restraint, melancholy.  The characters are 
unremarkable, their best years behind them, their dreams dissipated; 
it takes all the effort they can muster just to pay the bills.  This 
does not make them less fascinating, merely less marketable, which is 
a shame, because this is a movie which should be seen, precisely 
because it pays attention to people and emotions that most movies 
prefer to ignore.  It engages us and touches us and 
resolves--surprisingly, and movingly--into something resembling a 
happy ending.  The only thing greater than the ill-luck that governs 
the characters' lives is their refusal to give in to despair.  Their 
persistence is rewarded with what might be called a "feel-good" ending 
elsewhere, but not here, because this ending differs in kind from most 
such endings: this one has truly been earned.

Title
Review for Maboroshi no hikari (1995)
        Some movies want to explain everything.  They approach some of life's 
most profound issues--love, faith, mortality--and try to give us a 
neatly-packaged answer in a couple of hours.  Sometimes this even 
results in great movies.  But there are other, wiser films, which 
don't try to explain everything, but undertake the harder task of 
observing life, watching events unfold, standing back and illuminating 
the nuances of existence, without theorizing or philosophizing.
        Hirokazu Kore-eda's remarkable first feature, MABOROSI, is one of 
those movies which is content to watch from a distance.  It plays like 
a series of stills, one beautifully composed shot after another, 
observing the life of a woman whose first husband commits suicide, 
leaving her alone with a three-month-old son, and who remarries a few 
years later.
        There are obvious ways of dealing with this subject matter: tearful 
scenes of mourning, angry outbursts, denial.  Kore-eda isn't 
interested.  We never see the woman, Yumiko (played perfectly by 
Makiko Esumi), crying over the death of her husband.  Infinitely more 
powerful is a long-shot of Yumiko and her son (Gohki Kashiyama) 
boarding a train platform several years later, preparing to leave the 
city and join the new husband in his little Japanese fishing 
community; we watch them, dressed in black, walk slowly up the steps 
and along the platform, the sky grim and overcast.  What does it mean?  
It doesn't 'mean' anything.  What does it convey?  It conveys volumes, 
and does so in the language of pure cinema.
        That is one of the great pleasures of MABOROSI, that it says so much 
by saying so little, by merely contemplating the everyday rituals and 
routines of life.  Yumiko's changing moods are reflected in the visual 
compositions, not simply in her 'character arc.'  Later in the film, 
after she has lived with her new husband (Takashi Naitoh) for some 
time, we see the family seated in front of their house, looking at the 
sea.  The husband and son eat slices of watermelon, laughing as they 
spit the seeds out; Yumiko watches and smiles.  This scene conveys 
subtly, without fanfare, the pleasure she has found in her new life; 
everything we need to know is up there on the screen, in the little 
gestures and details, and nothing needs to be said aloud.  In this 
movie, it is not grand speeches and melodramatic confrontations that 
are important, it's things like scrubbing the steps or teaching a 
child to ride a bike. 
        Kore-eda and cinematographer Masao Nakabori use light and shadow 
masterfully, without the benefit of off-screen lighting (as far as I 
could tell).  In the first third of the film--the build-up to the 
suicide and its aftermath--most scenes are shot in darkness, or on 
cloudy, grey days.  There isn't much sunshine.  The second third, as 
Yumiko finds some measure of happiness again, is sunnily lit, 
reflecting her changing circumstances, and the final third becomes 
grey again, rainy, stormy, as the unresolved grief from her first 
husband's death preoccupies her once more, and she seeks an answer 
that doesn't exist--the dead never explain themselves.  There is also, 
in most scenes, a balance of light and dark.  Indoor scenes are either 
brightly lit inside with darkness outside, or shadowy within and light 
without.  This mix of light and dark reflects the balanced tone of the 
film--and of life, for that matter--augmented by Ming Chang Chen's 
spare score.
        Some of the shots are perfect.  Two children run beside a 
lake, their reflections in the still water, the sky looming above: the 
image is unforgettable.  And my favourite visual shows a line of 
mourners walking along the shoreline, silhouetted by a narrow ribbon 
of ocean, dwarfed by land below and sky above.  Both these images show 
human figures trapped by water, caught between the vast reaches of 
heaven and earth, and this poetic re-fashioning of images (such as the 
various shots of bicycles and trains) serves to develop and deepen the 
film's themes, and the feelings it evokes.
        The only problem, really, is that this approach demands 
considerable patience from the viewer.  This is not a movie to see 
when you're in the mood for something light and entertaining, nor is 
it a movie for impatient viewers.  But if one has the patience to 
accept Kore-eda's approach, it is deeply rewarding.  The most obvious 
point of reference is Kieslowski's BLUE, but MABOROSI is, I think, 
even better.  The final third in particular is absorbing, moving, and, 
in its finest moments, sublime, possessing a grace and wisdom few 
films strive for, much less achieve.

Title
Review for Babettes gćstebud (1987)
"This head chef had the ability to transform a dinner into a kind of 
love affair."
Starring Stéphane Audran, Bodil Kjer, Brigitte Federspiel, Jarl Kulle
Written & Directed by Gabriel Axel, from a story by Isak Dinesen
Cinematography by Henning Kristiansen
It is hard to imagine, in the last years of the 20th century, why 
anyone would choose the chaste, ascetic lifestyle that deeply 
religious people lived in the past (and that some still live today).  
The pleasures of the flesh are so immediate, so tangible: why forsake 
them?  BABETTE'S FEAST, a wise, gentle Danish film, poses this 
question, but rather than the usual contrast of pious self-denial with 
the intense rewards of sex, it approaches the issue from a different 
angle, by looking at that other great carnal pleasure: eating.
Based on a novella by the great Isak Dinesen (probably best known for 
her memoir, OUT OF AFRICA), the tale is set in a village on the wild, 
rugged coast of Jutland.  It is the 19th century, but it could easily 
be the 17th.  The people are kind but puritanical; they live in 
simple, modest cottages; their favourite recreation is singing 
devotional songs.  There are few young people in the community, and 
it's not hard to imagine why.
The first half of the film mostly fills in details of the past.  We 
meet Philippa and Martina (Bodil Kjer, Brigitte Federspiel), the 
sweet, virginal daughters of a respected minister.  Each sister is 
wooed by an outsider, but they reject their respective suitors, opting 
instead for lives of duty and charity, following in their father's 
footsteps.
As is often the case in Dinesen's stories, these brief, youthful 
passions have long-lasting consequences.  Martina's suitor is an 
emotional French singer, and years later, still remembering the 
sisters' generosity and humanity, he refers a woman to them, a refugee 
from civil war in Paris.  The sisters agree to let her live with them 
as a maid.  The woman is Babette (Stéphane Audran).  And years after 
this, Philippa's suitor, Lorenz (Jarl Kulle), who had departed when he 
realized he could not have her, happens to be visiting, on the 
occasion of their late father's 100th anniversary.  For this special 
occasion, Babette asks that she be allowed to create a special dinner.  
Reluctantly (they don't want to indulge themselves), the sisters agree 
to let Babette treat them and their guests to the full range of her 
culinary talents.
The movie's first half is awkward; it betrays its literary 
provenance.  We are shuttled back and forth in time, jarringly.  
Frequent voice-overs try to smooth over the awkward transitions, but 
the end result is intrusive.  The film explains everything that is 
happening--the emotions and events are kept at a distance.  But if it 
seems hurried and detached, it is perhaps because the filmmakers were 
anxious to get to Babette's feast, and who could blame them?
What a dinner it is.  It is the centerpiece the movie, and it is 
wonderful.  The guests arrive; are seated; they chat; fine wine is 
poured; and, one by one, exquisite French dishes are set before them.  
The camera lingers lovingly on every aspect of the meal: the 
preparation, the serving, the consumption.  With musical precision, 
the film cuts back and forth from kitchen to dining room.  Babette 
devotes herself to the feast, while the guests enjoy the results of 
her devotion, all the while making small talk, or religious 
observations, or toasts, or quiet sounds of satisfaction.  Without 
fuss or bother, we are shown just how much pleasure can be had from a 
single meal, after a lifetime of soup and ale-bread.
There is very little use of incidental music; instead, ambient noises 
are emphasized, and this is particularly effective during the feast.  
The sounds of the kitchen and the dining room become a sort of ersatz 
orchestration, the perfect accompaniment to the conviviality and 
epicurean delight of the dinner.  The fizz of champagne filling a 
glass, the bubbling of sauce in a pot on the stove, the soft clink of 
knife and fork as a piece of fruit is sliced open--these become a 
symphony, and Gabriel Axel the conductor.  He makes the dinner 
sequence sensuous, intimate, vivid, but never calls attention to his 
methods: this is filmmaking so fine, so subtle, you are hardly aware 
of it.
Because they fear they are indulging their appetites unbecomingly, 
the dinner guests make a pact: they will say not a word about the food 
or drink.  They will not admit that they have enjoyed it.  Lorenz 
alone is not part of this pact, and his vocal enjoyment of the meal is 
humourously contrasted to the other guests' refusal to express their 
delight.  But they certainly are delighted, and, in, the end, it is 
fortunate that they promised to say nothing--no words would have been 
adequate to express their dawning realization that in the 
gratification of our earthly senses there is, perhaps, something holy.

Title
Review for Da hong deng long gao gao gua (1991)
        Two shots recur with the insistence of ritual--or nightmare--in
RAISE THE RED LANTERN.  The first is a close-up of the face of Gong Li,
playing a young woman who is sold to a rich man and becomes his concubine,
his Fourth Mistress.  The second is an overhead shot of the central
courtyard in the rich man's house, a small open space hemmed in by grey
walls, overhung by jutting roofs.  Director Zhang Yimou never quite
superimposes these two shots, but he doesn't need to: the movie is all
about the way the young woman becomes trapped--physically and
psychically--in the rich man's space, until she is merely another feature
of its stark geographies.
        It doesn't seem so bad, when she first arrives.  Servants fetch her
bags in, light lanterns in her honour, lave her feet.  But the privileges
of a new wife are temporary: later, they must be earned.  Fourth Mistress
soon becomes involved in a power struggle with the other three mistresses.
        First Mistress is older, post-menopausal, and so of little sexual
interest to the master: she is not as attractive as the others, and she can
no longer bear children.  She seems to have acceded to her fate with quiet
acceptance, more observer than participant.  Second Mistress, who has only
borne the master a "useless" daughter, seems resigned, even good-natured,
about her fading position in the household; she dissembles well.  Third
Mistress is Fourth Mistress's principal rival.  She is a former opera
singer, still young, coquettish, jealous.  As soon as the new woman
arrives, she tries to wrest the master's affection from her.
        Each evening, red lanterns are lit outside the rooms of the
mistress with whom the master is sleeping that night.  She is the mistress
he holds in the highest esteem, at least for an evening.  The four women
are asked to stand in the courtyard while the majordomo ritualistically
announces where the lanterns are to be raised.  This daily observance has
more than a touch of sadism about it: its purpose is as much the
humiliation of the neglected mistresses as it is the announcement of the
favoured one.
        Much of the film is concerned with similar rituals of power and
humiliation.  Fourth Mistress weeps on her first night in the house, but
soon resolves, steelily, to play the game with the rest of the mistresses.
She is cunning, and tough, but inexperienced; she makes mistakes which
cannot be unmade.  In a tense sequence, Second Mistress, who has been
conniving with Fourth Mistress's sullen maid, invites Fourth Mistress to
her house, and asks that she cut her hair.  The point for Second Mistress,
currently favoured by the master, is to demonstrate her power: she can ask
this of Fourth Mistress, who cannot refuse.  But Fourth Mistress then
"accidentally" wounds Second Mistress with the scissors, a petty act of
vengeance which leads to tragic consequences.  Hell hath no fury ...
        The women's lives are explored with perspicacity and empathy.  They
should, in theory, be united against a common foe, the master, who robs
them all of their dignity and freedom.  But there is nothing they can do to
him that will not lead to dire consequences.  The only dignity to be had is
by currying favour so as to be held in higher regard than the other
mistresses.  And because it is only human to seek dignity, the women
constantly, subtly, vie for power over one another.  They are rigidly
circumscribed in what they can do or say, so their actions take on an added
fascination, as we see them walk the line between the acceptable and the
unacceptable in their attempts to gain the upper hand.
        The master himself is never properly seen: he is vaguely shown in
long-shots, or an arm or leg is seen in close-up, but we never look upon
his face.  The movie depersonalizes him.  This is an intriguing change from
the source material, a novella by Su Tong in which Fourth Mistress is much
more complicit in her own fate and the master is a more vivid, human
character.  The obvious reading of Zhang's approach is to see the master as
a symbol of patriarchy, which he is, but it's a bit more complicated than
that.
        To render the master symbolically would, you'd expect, make him
seem more powerful, more forbidding.  But the effect is precisely the
opposite: he is diminished.  Insofar as he can be excised from a story in
which he wields all the power, he is.  Zhang frequently and effectively
uses close-ups to reflect the complex emotions of the mistresses and the
servants, which gives them a vividness, a presence, which the master does
not have.  This is their story, not his.  They are photographed with the
exquisite, formally beautiful camerawork Zhang has elsewhere devoted to
rural Chinese landscapes, which accords them a significance they are unable
to find in the master's house.  It gives them as much dignity as is
possible for people whose lives are doomed to end in premature death,
despair, or madness.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com):
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Kamikaze Taxi (1995)
        Starring Koji Yashuko, Kazuya Takahashi, Mickey Curtis, Taketoshi
Naito, Reiko Kataoka;
        Written & Directed by Masato Harada;
        Cinematography by Yoshinao Sakamoto
        You know a film is in trouble when it has to explain its premise in
an opening caption.  The caption at the beginning of KAMIKAZE TAXI tells us
three things: 1) There are 150,000 "foreign" labourers in Japan who are in
fact emigrés who have returned to their homeland, where they are treated as
second-class citizens, 2) There are 90,000 yakuza, and, 3) There are many
corrupt politicians.  The caption then observes that sometimes the lives of
these three groups converge.  We need this information because the film is
long and unfocused, its polemical intent undermined by its tortuous script.
It is part yakuza movie, part buddy movie, part road movie, part social
realism, and part a lot of other things.  Even with the introductory
explanation to guide us, it never coheres.
        It seems for quite a while that it will be just a yakuza movie,
centring on Tatsuo (Kazuya Takahashi), a second-rate gangster who starts
pimping for Senator Domon (Taketoshi Naito) when his predecessor is
promoted in the family.  Domon is a corrupt, xenophobic misogynist, an
aging former kamikaze pilot who seems to represent everything that
writer/director Masato Harada dislikes in Japanese society, with good
reason.  When Domon savagely beats one of the girls Tatsuo sends him,
another girl in Tatsuo's employ protests hysterically.  She is killed for
her trouble by Animaru (Mickey Curtis), a yakuza thug working for Domon.
        Tatsuo, who cared for the dead prostitute, is incensed by her
murder.  When he learns that the beaten girl's silence was bought with a
small offering from a huge stash of money in Domon's house, Tatsuo and some
of his buddies stage an armed robbery, making off with the Senator's money.
Tatsuo, unlike his partners in crime, survives the initial manhunt by the
yakuza, and finds himself to be very rich and very high on the yakuza's
most wanted list.  So he gets the hell out of Tokyo, wisely.
        The movie thus far is engaged, violent, pointed, darkly humourous,
and somewhat routine--it's just a yakuza movie, after all.  Then the
Japanese-born migrant workers enter the picture.  The abrupt shift in
direction is no less strange or arbitrary just because it is anticipated by
that opening caption.  Tatsuo, flush with wealth, hires a cab driven by
Kantake, a Japanese-Peruvian recently returned to the country, and tells
him to keep the meter running all all the way from Tokyo to Izu, where
Tatsuo wants to visit his mother's grave.  Cue road movie.  Because Kantake
is illiterate, Tatsuo has to show him the destination on a map, explaining
how to read the words.  And so the two men begin to bond.  Cue buddy movie.
        Once Kantake appears, the emphasis gradually shifts away from
Tatsuo, probably because Harada realizes the cab driver is the more
intriguing of the two.  He is played by the affable Koji Yashuko, currently
one of the best-known Japanese actors in the West, after starring in THE
EEL and SHALL WE DANCE? and playing a memorable secondary role as the
white-suited gangster in TAMPOPO.  Yashuko plays Kantake as a quiet-spoken,
imperturbable man, burdened by more than his fair share of hardships.  A
key early scene, a coincidental encounter with an enraged Animaru,
establishes Kantake's placid strength, and suggests that he is a man who
has seen so much trouble that Tatsuo's concerns seem trivial; a later
monologue confirms our initial impression.
        The movie nevertheless keeps coming back to Tatsuo and his trivial
concerns.  To honour a dying friend's request, he resolves to slaughter
Domon, Animaru, et al., in a brief blaze of kamikaze glory.  Kantake
remains stoically by Tatsuo's side, for reasons of his own: Kantake's
father, it turns out, was a kamikaze pilot with Domon during World War II,
and Kantake has cause to hate the politician for his past deeds.  The
connection between Domon and Kantake is improbable, but drives the closing
sequences, leading to a confrontation which is the film's worst scene.
        While Harada's politics are admirably Leftist for the most part, he
resorts to the cheap solutions of violence in the finale.  Kantake, a
serene pacifist when he first appears, becomes a kind of noble urban savage
by the end: illiterate, unsophisticated, he obtains justice by following
his heart and using his hands, brutally.  Harada seems to present this
transformation as desirable or at least necessary, contradicting the points
he was making earlier.
        All told, the film's political thrust seems both confused and,
after 140 minutes, belaboured.  Harada positions the film rather
transparently within political discourse on contemporary Japan.  In the
opening sequence, for instance, he shows us excerpts from sober
talking-head interviews with Japanese-born migrant workers: the tone and
method are at odds with the rest of the movie.  Elsewhere, there are clips
from televised current affairs debates featuring Senator Domon, unsubtly
underlining some of the movie's political concerns, which are too broad and
complex to be addressed by a genre picture, or, in this case, three genre
pictures spliced together.   Rather than cramming all these discrete
elements into a single film, Harada may have done better to make several
shorter, tighter movies--preferably beginning with one about Kantake.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Across the Pacific (1942)
Starring Humphrey Bogart, Mary Astor, Sydney Greenstreet
Directed by John Huston
Written by Richard Macaulay
Cinematography by Arthur Edeson
        The Genoa Maru is a ship bound for Japan, with a handful of 
passengers aboard.  They are Rick Leland, an artillery officer 
recently given a dishonourable discharge; Dr. Lorenz, an intellectual 
American ex-pat who has lived in Asia for 30 years; and Alberta 
Marlow, a woman from Medicine Hat, Alberta, who sells peanut brittle 
in a ten-cent shop.  Well, that's who they say they are.  We're pretty 
sure they're lying, and, indeed, they are.  Finding out who they 
really are--and why they're on board the vessel at the same time--is 
one of the many pleasures in John Huston's ACROSS THE PACIFIC.
        The passengers are also Humphrey Bogart, Mary Astor, and Sydney 
Greenstreet, reunited with Huston and cinematographer Arthur Edeson 
(CASABLANCA) for the follow-up to the director's stunning debut, THE 
MALTESE FALCON.  With a cast like that, under the guidance of a master 
like Huston, the film seems almost guaranteed to offer splendid 
entertainment--and that is precisely what it does.
        The events take place during World War II, and involve a sinister 
anti-American plot by the villain, Greenstreet, who is allied with the 
Japanese.  To reveal more would be to spoil the fun: Richard 
Macaulay's script is tight, tense, and compelling.  But, this being a 
Bogart movie of the 40s, it's also fairly predictable: we know he'll 
defeat the villain, and we suspect he'll win the lady's heart.  What 
makes it so entertaining are the little things.  The dialogue is 
wonderful: fast, funny, and perfectly suited to these actors.  
Greenstreet plays an expansive, sophisticated villain as only he can; 
Bogart is, well, Bogart, except here his persona is a little less 
cynical than usual, a little more playful.  And Astor's Alberta Marlow 
is particularly refreshing--a smart, independent woman who loves to 
engage Bogey in verbal fencing matches.  Their repartee is 
consistently witty and playful.  After their first kiss, which happens 
while Alberta is still finding her sea legs, she remarks, I feel sick; 
Bogart asks if that's normal, and she retorts, how do women usually 
respond when you kiss them?  They trade pointed rejoinders throughout, 
to our delight.  If only people talked like that in real life; if only 
they still talked like that in the movies.
        The interactions between other characters are equally sharp.  After a 
shooting incident, Bogart and Greenstreet discuss the preponderance of 
guns on the ship, and when each reveals his own weapon, Bogart 
playfully comments, "Mine's bigger than yours," relishing the silly 
Freudianism.  They are later joined by Joe Totsuiko (Victor Sen Yung), 
a second-generation American (with hidden motives, of course) who 
desperately wants to sound like an authentic Yankee, so he speaks with 
splendidly overblown American diction, calling Rick "Ricky" and saying 
things like "I wonder if those Panamanian mamas are all they're 
cracked up to be."
        If the characters did nothing else but talk, this would be great 
stuff, but there's no shortage of secret identities, double-dealings, 
and revelations.  The pace never flags, sweeping us along from Halifax 
to New York and on to Panama, where the film ends, despite the title.  
In Panama, the characters finally confront each other, all truths are 
finally unveiled, and then the finale devolves into a rather mundane 
action sequence.  The ending, indeed, is the weakest part of the 
movie, particularly in the wake of THE MALTESE FALCON, where the 
conclusion was absolutely perfect.
        ACROSS THE PACIFIC was filmed during World War II, and not 
surprisingly, it contains no small amount of pro-U.S. propaganda.  The 
final shot shows American planes flying west to (paraphrasing Bogart's 
character) help the Japs commit hara-kiri, and could have been lifted 
straight from a war-time documentary.  There is also a gallery of 
laughable Asian caricatures and some extremely racist dialogue.  At 
one point, Bogart complains that all Japanese look the same, and Astor 
says they don't--upon close examination; Greenstreet refers to the 
Japanese as "wonderful little people."  The actors seem to be aware of 
how ridiculous these lines are, and deliver them tongue-in-cheek, so 
that these moments are not as ugly as they might have been.  
Fortunately, while Huston himself left to help the war effort before 
filming was complete (Vincent Sherman took over), his movie plays 
mostly as entertainment, not propaganda, and it is a thoroughly 
enjoyable diversion.  Only a director whose first film was THE MALTESE 
FALCON could make a second film this good, and have it be a weaker 
effort.

Title
Review for Leggenda del pianista sull'oceano, La (1998)
"You're alright as long as you've got a good story and someone to
tell it to."
Starring Tim Roth, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Bill Nunn, Mélanie Thierry;
Directed by Giuseppe Tornatore;
Written by Tornatore & Alessandro Baricco, from a novel by Baricco;
Cinematography by Lajos Koltai
The 1900 of the title refers, of course, to the year, but also to a
man: Danny Boodmann T.D. Lemon 1900.  His strange name can be explained.
He was found as an infant on board a cruise ship called The Virginian by a
man named Danny Boodmann; he was in a "T.D. Lemon" box at the time; and the
year 1900 had just begun.  He was named and raised by Boodmann in the
boiler room of The Virginian, never setting foot on land as the vessel
cruised from Europe to America, back and forth and back again.  He grows up
to become a piano prodigy, and is played by Tim Roth as a mild-mannered,
pleasant, charmingly eccentric man, who seems slightly removed from the
world.  He approaches life at a different angle.
As is obvious, verisimilitude is not the intention here.  The movie
is based on a novel by Alessandro Baricco, best known to English-speaking
readers for his novel "Silk," which treated its characters in a similar
manner, as people whose lives are shaped by stories larger than they are.
Both THE LEGEND OF 1900 and "Silk" show the influence of the Latin American
magic realist novelists, who spin equally grand and improbable tales,
featuring equally colourful, larger-than-life characters.  They give us
tales which hover on the boundaries of the possible and return a sense of
the marvellous to a world dearly in need of it.
We learn about 1900 in a series of flashbacks.  The frame narrative
features Max Tooney (Pruitt Taylor Vince in a slightly twitchy, overwrought
performance), a trumpeter who played with 1900 for years and was his
closest friend.  During the course of the film, Max tells parts of 1900's
story to several people, relating his life aboard The Virginian.  Max's
reminiscences are sparked by the discovery of a rare recording of 1900's
music and fuelled by the knowledge that The Virginian, now a derelict, is
about to be destroyed by the port authorities and committed to the ocean
floor.
While the movie is first and foremost a story, a tall tale, a
legend, it lacks the steady narrative momentum which it needs to contain
and direct its ambitions.  Using Max as the focus seems an awkward and
transparent method of preventing the film from unravelling, of holding it
together during its shambling progress from one set-piece to the next.
The set-pieces, though, are wonderful.  The best of all is a "piano
duel" between 1900 and Jelly Roll Morton (Clarence Williams III), who comes
on board calling himself the "creator of jazz," determined to demonstrate
his superiority to the upstart prodigy.  They square off in the ship's
crowded ballroom, before an expectant audience composed of crew,
passengers, and eager journalists.  The two pianists take turns playing
their tunes.  Director Giuseppe Tornatore (CINEMA PARADISO) handles it
magnificently, delighting us with Jelly Roll's provocative braggadocio,
disarming us with 1900's initial refusal to indulge in the game of
oneupmanship, rousing us as we sense that a final dramatic flourish is
coming.  The "duel" ends with an inspired gesture which is a superb piece
of grandstanding showmanship on the part of both 1900 and Tornatore.
The entire sequence is so good that the audience at the World Film
Festival screening I attended burst into spontaneous applause, as if we had
just witnessed a virtuoso jazz solo, and, indeed, the movie is perhaps best
appreciated in the way one appreciates a jazz show.  The story of 1900 and
Max is the theme to which the players return, while the set-pieces are
solos by great performers, taking the basic materials and reinventing them,
occasionally fashioning something awesome out of them.  The ensemble may
not be jumping the whole night, but the show provides some dynamic and
captivating moments.
The first meeting between Max and 1900 is one such moment.  It
takes place during a stormy night on the ocean, with the ship lurching
violently from side to side, and we are treated to the sight of the two men
seated at a grand piano as it zig-zags wildly across the huge floor of the
dark, empty ballroom.  The mood of camaraderie and whimsy is magical.  The
friends' last meeting is another great scene.  It takes place, again, on
The Virginian, after the Second World War.  The ship is a rusted decaying
hulk.  Max and 1900 sit in the heart of the vessel's ruined splendour, in
the remnants of 1900's whole world, and movingly tell each other about the
course of their lives.
Despite all these moments, THE LEGEND OF 1900 is a story which
loses track of itself.  It forgets what it wants to say.  The fact that
1900 is born at the dawn of the century is surely significant; his enclosed
world of music and eternal movement perhaps serves as a counterpoint to the
industrialization-run-amok nightmares of the twentieth century as it grinds
to a halt.  Or perhaps 1900 is a kind of antihero, and his refusal to
confront the world is intended as an injunction to us: you cannot taste the
fullness of life if you are unwilling to risk its poisons.  The movie can't
seem to decide what 1900 is.  Like 1900 himself, it sails from shore to
shore, from meaning to meaning, without ever settling down.  But the voyage
sure isn't dull.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Todo sobre mi madre (1999)
Starring Cecilia Roth, Antonia San Juan, Penélope Cruz, Marisa
Paredes, Candela Pena;
Written & Directed by Pedro Almodóvar;
Cinematography by Affonso Beato
        In the opening scenes of Pedro Almodóvar's ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER,
Esteban is preparing to write a story about his mother, Manuela (Cecilia
Roth); we are shown excerpts from Joseph L. Mankiewicz's ALL ABOUT EVE;
mother and son attend a performance of Tennessee Williams's "A Streetcar
Named Desire" on Esteban's seventeenth birthday.  These are all
refererences to stories about women, written by men.  And then Esteban is
run over by a car.  His story about his mother remains incomplete.
        The rest of the movie belongs to women: other than Esteban, the
only male characters of any significance are a senile father who no longer
recognizes his own daughter and a stagehand obsessed with sex.  There are
also two transsexuals who have opted to become women.  The suggestion is
that the death of Manuela's son represents the termination of the masculine
viewpoint: instead of men's stories about women, we will be given access to
a film about women, seen from the vantage of women.  It's a rather
disingenuous suggestion on the part of Almodóvar (LIVE FLESH), who is of
course a man--and the author of the movie--but what follows represents an
admirable attempt to represent the complexities of women.
        A bare bones outline of the plot might suggest the flamboyant
nature of the director's earlier work.  Woman's son dies in freak accident.
Woman abandons her job and heads to Madrid.  Woman meets a transsexual
friend (Antonia San Juan), befriends a pregnant nun (Penélope Cruz),
becomes assistant to an aging actress (Marisa Paredes) and has to deal with
her young, sullen, self-destructive, heroin-addicted mistress (Candela
Pena).  But Almodóvar treats the material as straight melodrama, more or
less, not as farce.
        The movie has a sense of humour and is sometimes provocative, but
the tone is rather sombre.  The emotions it reaches for are undistorted by
irony.  We are asked to accept these women just as they are given to
us--prone to extravagent emotional outbursts, their lives governed by
far-fetched coincidences.  In this respect, ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER resembles
soap opera, which likewise expects to be taken at face value (and whose
audience is primarily female).  Soap opera itself is a form which descends
from the sentimental fiction of the 18th century, when novelists like
Samuel Richardson wrote mammoth serialized novels--about women, for women.
        All of which is to say that ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER makes use of
fictional forms that are traditionally associated with women, and has fun
with them.  It's a fascinating film in terms of its manipulation of ideas
about gender, but as a viewing experience it is perhaps too languorous and
comfortable.  The urgency and effrontery of Almodóvar's earlier work is
missing.  Despite the playful approach to gender roles, the movie relies on
the clichés of sentimental fiction to the point where it at times seems no
more than a humdrum melodramatic tearjerker.  There is an instance of the
tired routine in which a woman throws up for no apparent reason--and, of
course, it later turns out that she's pregnant.  Almodóvar makes use of
this cliché without ironizing it or putting it to the service of the film,
and so it remains no more than a cliché, a shortcoming.
        The women in ALL ABOUT MY MOTHER represent most of the customary
female roles and stereotypes: mother, daughter, nurse, actress, lesbian,
prostitute, nun.  What is most complex and rewarding about the movie is the
manner in which the various women slip from one category to another,
inhabiting numerous roles, wearing them like an endless succession of
masks.  We learn, for example, that a young nun (Penelope Cruz) is
pregnant, and that she was impregnated by an older transsexual; our
preconceptions become worthless.  At the end, we are told that one of the
lesbian characters has married a man and had a child.  Manuela herself, the
emotional centre of the movie, is mother, friend, confidante, nurturer, and
much more besides.  She can be vulnerable, tough, bitchy, playful: she
cannot be pinned down.  By fostering slippages and tensions, by undermining
conventions and expectations, the movie allows the intricacies of
personalities which resist stereotyping to emerge.
        The notion that women's social roles represent a series of
performances is fundamental: two characters are actresses, Manuela performs
in a play one night, and Manuela's transsexual friend gives a theatrical
monologue about herself which verbally duplicates the construction of
female identity she has undertaken through surgery, make-up, implants,
hormonal treatments, etc.  He has become she: the result of her own
constructs and not those of society or biology.  Almodóvar's underlying
message seems to be that a woman is what she makes herself out to be,
irrespective of what others would impose on her.  One female stereotype is
notable for its absence: woman as victim.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Cheun gwong tsa sit (1997)
"One day we might start over.  For him, 'starting over' has many 
meanings."
Starring Tony Leung, Leslie Cheung, Chang Chen
Written & Directed by Wong Kar-wai
Cinematography by Christopher Doyle
        When you watch a Wong Kar-wai movie, you get the impression that he 
is impatient with the way things are usually done in movies.  He isn't 
interested in story as a join-the-dots sequence of events, but as a 
basis for visual improvisation.  He isn't interested in exploring 
people and their feelings through dialogue and conflict, but is 
intrigued by the patterns of light and shade on someone's features as 
they stand brooding in a dark street, lighting a cigarette.  It's a 
shame, then, that HAPPY TOGETHER devotes so much time and energy to a 
love story which doesn't much seem to interest him, never mind the 
audience.
        The lovers are Lai and Ho, two Hong Kong ex-pats living in Argentina.  
They are played by two of Hong Kong's leading men, Tong Leung (CHUNG 
KING EXPRESS) and Leslie Cheung (FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE).  The movie 
isn't sentimental or prudish or righteous about their relationship.  
It is unusually frank in its depiction of their sexuality--there's no 
way in hell two Hollywood stars would have accepted these roles as 
written--but it is not a platform for gay rights.  They are lovers who 
happen to be homosexual.  End of story.  There is no concession made 
to the possibility that some people might consider the subject matter 
risqué or offensive or controversial.  What a relief.
        But this refreshing directness goes only so far.  The movie seems 
intent only on proving that a story about homosexual lovers engaged in 
constant spats and confrontations and reconciliations can be just as 
pointless and repetitive as its heterosexual equivalent.
        The pattern is established early on.  Ho is moody and mercurial and 
petulant and needy; Lai is balanced and stoic and responsible.  He 
loves Ho, but knows that he shouldn't: Ho is one of those 
self-destructive personalities who drag others down with them.  When 
Ho leaves Lai early in the movie, Lai tries to maintain a certain 
distance when Ho comes back to him, knowing that if they resume their 
relationship, he will be hurt again.  And so it goes: Lai tries to 
maintain an even keel while Ho is unpredictable and exasperating.  
        The film also explores, in a desultory way, the lives of 
ex-patriates, people far from home in a foreign land; it considers 
what it feels like to be an outsider.  Lai strikes up a friendship 
with another Hong Kong man (Chang Chen) who works in the same kitchen, 
because of their shared nationality.  This relationship is, oddly, 
more affecting than that of the lovers.  The friendship picks up a 
recurring theme in the three Wong films I've seen: it shows how brief 
relationships, lives that touch each other only tangentially, can 
still be profoundly important to us.  These fragile connections are a 
vital part of what it means to be human.
        This theme is the closest Wong comes to making any sort of deep 
philosophical statement, but such a statement is hardly necessary: the 
man has style, and this is HAPPY TOGETHER's saving grace.  He has a 
marvellous sense of texture and ambience; watching his movies, you 
become aware of how monotonously glossy, polished, and sterile other 
movies are.  He infuses his works with energy and vibrancy and colour 
and sound--with life.  The cramped, hot, seedy apartment where the 
lovers live.  A noisy, smoky, neon-shot club.  A cool, shady doorway 
in a cobblestoned alley, touched by the first light of the day.  Wong 
and cinematographer Christopher Doyle are sensitive to each setting, 
and the way they shift restlessly from one shot to the next keeps the 
film fresh and invigorating.
        This kaleidoscopic approach is rather hit-and-miss, but, still, it 
seems to me that Wong is one of the few directors working today who is 
genuinely interested in extending the possibilities of cinema, of 
finding new means of expression.  When he can combine sounds and 
feelings and pictures in just the right way--as he does in the closing 
sequence, when a melancholy Lai rides the Hong Kong subway to the tune 
of "Happy Together"--his work is exhilarating.  It is poetic, intense, 
entrancing.  When it doesn't all fit together, I find myself wishing 
he'd hurry up and get to the point.

Title
Review for American Perfekt (1997)
"All over America, sane people doing insane things."
Starring Robert Forster, Fairuza Balk, Amanda Plummer, David Thewlis
Written & Directed by Paul Chart
Cinematography by William Wages
AMERICAN PERFEKT knows exactly what kind of movie it wants to be, but 
it doesn't know how to be it.  It aspires to be a quirky road movie, 
but goes about it in the wrong way.  It's as if debut writer/director 
Paul Chart held his material at arm's length, looked at it carefully, 
decided that he wanted it to be weird, and systematically applied 
cosmetic changes to make it seem weird, hoping that these surface 
changes would somehow sink into the bones of the story, transforming 
it.  They don't.  
Chart works from the outside in, but real weirdness comes from the 
inside and works its way out, distorting everything it touches along 
the way.  It takes the eye of a David Lynch or a Joel Coen to make a 
really weird movie.  Chart doesn't have that eye.  This is not to say 
that he doesn't have talent; I think he does.  But, in AMERICAN 
PERFEKT, I think his talent is wrongly applied.  The premise is that 
of a thriller-cum-road-movie, pure and simple; the other stuff just 
gets in the way.
Robert Forster stars as Jake Nyman, a criminal psychologist obsessed 
with chance.  In a world where science seems to have an answer to 
everything, Jake thinks the toss of a coin--a 50/50 proposition whose 
outcome cannot be known in advance--holds an uncertainty that is 
immensely appealing.  He decides what to have for breakfast by tossing 
a coin; he decides who to kill by tossing a coin.  Life, he believes, 
has become routine and predictable; people need the unexpected in 
their lives.  This, he says, is the reason why white-collar petty 
crime, like shoplifting housewives, is on the rise; he takes this need 
for the unexpected to the extreme.
Forster, fresh off his Oscar nomination for JACKIE BROWN, does good 
work here.  He seems like such a regular guy, in appearance and 
demeanor, but there is a maddening reasonableness in everything he 
says and does which subtly suggests the insanity of a serial killer.  
As he travels through California, two emotionally unbalanced sisters, 
Sandra and Alice (Amanda Plummer, Fairuza Balk), and a British con man 
(David Thewlis) will be involved in his fatal game of chance.
Each scene in the film has an off-kilter quality, as the characters 
talk and act in unpredictable ways, but there is no flow.   Each scene 
seems to stand apart, and the weirdness does not progress according to 
any internal logic.  Characters act strangely only because the script 
wants them to be strange.  Alice at one point describes her 
ex-boyfriend as being "like all the colours you've never seen," yet 
nowhere else does she speak in this flowery fashion.  Santini makes a 
comment about a piece of music which makes him want to cry--for no 
apparent reason, except that it's not the sort of thing you'd expect 
him to say.   Nor are they an appealing bunch--Plummer, Balk, and 
Thewlis play people who are downright annoying.  You want to grab them 
by the lapels and shake some sense into them.  We don't care about 
them, so what we have to care about, if we are going to like the film, 
are the idiosyncracies that make the material fresh and compelling.  
But it is not idiosyncratic enough.  The narrative momentum carries us 
past the weaker moments, but leads to a conclusion which is abrupt and 
unsatisfying.  AMERICAN PERFEKT is not solid enough as a thriller to 
satisfy us, and not weird enough to intrigue and entertain as a 
bizarre road movie.
There are nice details.  I liked Paul Sorvino as a small-town law 
official who seemed at first to be another of those incompetent hick 
sheriffs who are commonplace in movies, but turned out to be an 
efficient, reasonable guy, playing off our expectations.  And Sharp 
has a flair for disorienting the viewer in small, subtle ways.  Early 
in the film, Sandra and Jake are talking, and the camera pans right 
till we can only see Sandra, who keeps talking; moments later, Jake 
reappears on the opposite side of the frame, having circled around 
off-camera.  It's a neat, disarming touch.  Even the end credits 
scroll backwards, from bottom-to-top.
But all this stuff, which I liked, happens on the edges of the film.  
The centre does not hold.  The story is incoherent, lacking background 
and resolution, leaving us with a series of encounters and incidents, 
loosely pieced together.  Maybe all this incohesion is justified by 
Chart as being part of the randomness of life, the randomness 
celebrated by Jake in his own bloody way--but anyone can use that as 
an excuse for a bad movie.  Cinema is not a random happening.  And if 
Chart really wanted to make a movie which imitates the messy 
unpredictability of life, he shouldn't have used the overdetermined 
logic of a thriller to draw us in, then abandon that logic when it 
suited him.  He wants to have his cake and eat it too; he plays with a 
two-headed coin, and as Jake himself observes in the movie, that's 
cheating.

Title
Review for Duoluo tianshi (1995)
"Partners should never get involved emotionally with each other."
Starring Leon Lai, Michelle Reis, Takeshi Kaneshiro, Charlie Yeung
Written & Directed by Kar-wai Wong
Cinematography by Christopher Doyle
        FALLEN ANGELS is the work of a man in love, a man infatuated, 
intoxicated by the act of making a movie.  It is love of the dizzying, 
unconditional kind, where the lover does not question his love, but 
simply immerses himself in it.  He surrenders to it.  Here, Kar-wai 
Wong (CHUNG KING EXPRESS) surrenders to cinema; he revels in 
everything it has to offer.  There is sex and violence and comedy, 
there are slow-motion hand-held shots and distorted overlit close-ups, 
there are shadows and smoke and mirrors and neon.  It is a sensory 
overload, orgasmic in its intensity.
        It's also very good, which is somewhat surprising, since the whole 
thing is so self-indulgent that it should, by all rights, be an 
incoherent mess.
        The narrative, such as it is, involves two parallel love stories, 
which intersect in intriguing ways.  The first of these plots involves 
a hired killer (Leon Lai) and his partner (Michelle Reis), who tells 
him who he has to kill.  Their relationship is strictly professional, 
but there is substantial sexual tension, which is not surprising, 
considering how good-looking they are.  This plot depends heavily on a 
fascination with things Hong Kong movies have long been fascinated 
with: there is a hip hitman who performs his job with ice-water in his 
veins, but is troubled in his heart, and there are gorgeous, pouty 
women in fabulous clothes, who fall in love with him.  
        The other plot, played mostly for comedy, is like some bizarre 
hyperkinetic adapation of a Banana Yoshimoto story; it features two 
young lovers (Takeshi Kaneshiro, Charlie Yeung) who meet in the night 
(the whole movie happens at night), and who have the sort of 
relationship befitting two disingenuously innocent oddballs.  This 
pair is more original and potentially interesting than their 
counterparts in the first storyline--but the hitman's story, clichéd 
as it may be by now, lends itself far better to Wong's ultra-cool, 
ultra-flashy style.  The first plot calls for manic energy, the second 
for subtlety and reflection.  The latter qualities are in short supply 
in FALLEN ANGELS, but that's not necessarily a bad thing.    
        Wong goes to great lengths to make every single shot interesting.  He 
and cinematographer Christopher Doyle (TEMPTRESS MOON) use lenses that 
distort everything so we seem to be watching through one of those 
fish-eye peepholes in apartment doors.  They use filters that give 
everything a grainy, overlit look.  The lights are abnormally bright 
and the darkness is abnormally dark and pervasive.  Colours are 
washed-out and monochromatic.  Hong Kong becomes the ultimate 
millennial urban sprawl, a place of garish neon lights, subway trains 
blazing in the night, McDonalds, and featureless undergound corridors.  
The camera is always calling attention to itself: moving or tilting or 
looking at the action from a strange angle.  The editing is of the 
breathless, breakneck, MTV-ish variety.   
        But, while he seems to be plunging ahead with reckless abandon, Wong 
has a good feel for rhythm and pacing.  The two plots are more or less 
dispensible, since FALLEN ANGELS is primarily concerned with how it 
looks, and the look is what makes it compelling.  Some of the best 
sequences in the film have no dialogue--they are streams of images, 
set to music, spendidly integrated.
        It would be easy to think that the movie is so hectic and frenetic 
because Wong doesn't want us to realize there is no substance to it.  
There is probably some truth to that idea, but I was surprised to find 
myself touched by a couple of scenes, and it seems to me that despite 
his rather unsubtle techniques, Wong develops a kind of poetry in the 
film, a poetry of sound and image, rather than words and meanings.  
Those moments which seem most superficial, concerned purely with 
visual play, are, finally, the most telling, because of Wong's 
intuitive sense of the language of cinema, the language of sound and 
image.
        Case in point: the scene I remember most vividly (admittedly, this 
might have more to do with hormones than great cinema) is a totally 
gratuitous masturbation scene.  It starts with Michelle Reis in a 
moodily lit bar, taking long sensuous drags on her cigarette, then 
playing a dreamy song on the jukebox, caressing herself through her 
shimmery silver dress, then we cut to her bedroom, where she pursues 
her onanistic pursuits to their end, now wearing black leather and 
fishnet tights.  There's no nudity, and all things considered, the 
scene is actually pretty tasteful despite its blatant fetishism.  The 
eroticism has more to do with the way it's put together than any 
pornographic effect: the music, the editing, the images, and the 
lighting tease out the sexuality of the act, rather than thrusting it 
upon us.  
        And while it may be gratuitous, the sequence is also incredibly cool 
and sexy, and that's what counts.  Indeed, that's not a bad way to 
describe the whole movie.  It's flashy and energetic, effervescent and 
evanescent.  It's rather like a 90-minute-long ad, but the only thing 
FALLEN ANGELS is selling is itself--and it's very persuasive.

Title
Review for Picture of Dorian Gray, The (1945)
"We suffer for what the gods give us, and I'm afraid Dorian Gray will 
pay for his good looks."
Starring Hurd Hatfield, George Sanders, Angela Lansbury, Basil 
Hallward
Written & Directed by Albert Lewin
Cinematography by Harry Stradling
Of all Oscar Wilde's works, THE PICTURE OF DORIAN GRAY was surely the 
one that most easily accomodated a Hollywood adaption in the 1940s.  
Hollywood, then as now, likes neat conclusions, preferably moral 
ones--and dislikes subversive ironies.  DORIAN GRAY, Wilde's only 
novel, can be taken at face value (and not to its detriment) as an 
exemplary conte morale, with a neatly symmetrical finale.  There are 
subversive ironies distorting the smoothly polished narrative surface, 
but, while they enrich our enjoyment, they are not necessary to it.  
It could make a fine movie, and it did.
The story, for those who came in late, concerns Dorian Gray, a young 
fin-de-sičcle Adonis who, looking upon a recently finished portait of 
himself, idly wishes that the painting would age, absorbing by proxy 
time's decay, while he would stay young and beautiful.  And, for 
reasons that are never explained and don't really matter anyway, his 
wish is granted.  No matter what he does, he retains an air of 
youthful innocence that makes it difficult for anyone to believe ill 
of him.  This, in effect, gives him free license to commit all manner 
of debauchery, most of it merely hinted at: he becomes engaged, then 
rather cruelly dismisses his fiancée, prompting her suicide; he 
frequents opium dens; he indulges in scandalous affairs.  But as with 
all granted wishes, there is a catch: no longer subject to the 
indignities of human mortality, Dorian loses touch with the dignity of 
human morality.
Playing a Wilde-scripted role can be tricky: there is more than a 
hint of smugness in his epigrammatic, paradoxical wit, and in the 
wrong hands, it can become self-congratulatory, every line becoming a 
paraphrase of "look, aren't I ever so clever?"  DORIAN GRAY has fewer 
pitfalls than his stage comedies, though, because almost all the 
typically Wildean lines go to Lord Henry Wootton, an aristocrat who 
becomes a kind of mentor to Dorian, schooling him in the ways of 
refined amorality.  (It is his cruelly conceived "test" that prompts 
Dorian's fiancée, Sybil Vane, to commit suicide.)  Lord Henry is 
played by a perfectly cast George Sanders, whose droll and 
oh-so-sophisticatedly world-weary performance seems like a dress 
rehearsal for his later role as Addison de Witt in ALL ABOUT EVE.  He 
anchors the film; he does Wilde proud.
 Hurd Hatfield's Dorian is stiff, emotionless, almost robotic.  
Although this is intended to convey Dorian's soullessness, it is 
perhaps too straightforward an interpretation, a minimalist reduction 
of the complex and contradictory impulses that torment the man.  
Angela Lansbury's performance has an altogether different problem.  
Her Sybil Vane is good, sweet, nice, respectable, and exceedingly 
dull: she seems to be acting in a different film entirely.   Lansbury 
can be great in quirky roles (THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, THE COMPANY OF 
WOLVES) but she founders here, playing the femme douce to Dorian's 
heartless roué.
But, if my memory of the novel is correct, this is how Wilde wrote 
her in the first place, and the fault then lies with him.  He believed 
in his bitchy men and catty women more thoroughly than he ever 
believed in an innocent like Sybil Vane.  (No wonder he killed her off 
so early).  Elsewhere, the script likewise remains faithful to the 
text.  The homoeroticism is, of course, carefully elided, but the 
necessary time dilation and plot excisions are well-handled--if 
anything, the story becomes neater, more incisive, pared of the 
novel's occasional longeurs.  Lewin embellishes the original tale with 
some flourishes that echo and elaborate--perhaps a trifle too 
obviously--the motifs of beauty and entrapment: Lord Wootton drowns a 
butterfly in a dish of water; Sybil Vane sings of a bird in a cage of 
gold.
When Dorian's moral free-fall reaches its nadir, he commits murder.  
D.P. Harry Stradling--whose work is masterful throughout--makes this 
the film's most memorable moment: during the struggle, the victim's 
hand dashes an overhead light, which sets to swinging violently, 
sending shadow and light chasing each other throughout the cloistral 
room.  Dorian, expressionless, is momentarily, hallucinatorily, 
backdropped by a blank wall, against which brightness and darkness 
shift restlessly, irreconcilable.  This chiaroscuro image is a 
marvellously apt picture of Dorian Gray, a man whose soul is as 
divided from his self as light is from dark, and emblematic of the 
movie as a whole, which cuts to the quick of Wilde's novel while 
retaining all its wit, its contradictions, its ageless lessons.

Title
Review for Shining, The (1980)
There is only one character in Stanley Kubrick's THE SHINING, and it 
is not a person.  It is the Overlook Hotel, a remote Colorado resort 
that closes during the winter, because no one can reach it through the 
snowbound mountains.  During this season, it is empty, save for the 
caretaker and his family.  An empty hotel is an eerie place; without 
the bustle of guests and bellhops and receptionists, it becomes a 
still, silent place.  Too still, too silent.  It is a place where 
something is waiting to happen--and if it doesn't happen, the hotel 
will drag ghosts out of the past to make it happen.
Jack Torrance (Jack Nicholson) is the caretaker this particular 
winter, with his wife Wendy (Shelley Duvall) and son Danny (Danny 
Lloyd) joining him.  Jack claims to be a writer, and looks forward to 
the solitude which will give him a chance to work on a new project.  
He isn't concerned that a previous caretaker, presumed to be suffering 
an extreme case of cabin fever, killed his wife and twin daughters, 
then took his own life.  We know better.
Based on what we see of him, Jack can't be a very good writer; he 
possesses no wit, no charm, no originality.  He is a void waiting for 
a personality to fill him.  Eventually, it does--giving Nicholson the 
opportunity to perform some of his most famous scenes, and he performs 
them gleefully.  He takes the menace and madness that lurk in the 
corners of the Overlook and embodies them in one man; it is a great 
performance, just as the Overlook is a triumph of production design.
Nicholson manages to take something trite and boring and make it 
skewed and unnerving--and this is what the film as a whole does.  
Stephen King famously criticized Kubrick's adaptation of his novel, 
but Kubrick at least did justice to one of King's strengths as a 
writer: his ability to take the mundane, the trivial, and make it a 
locus of terror.  The dialogue and the people in THE SHINING are 
terribly banal.  Remove the style, and all the interactions--a job 
interview, a father-son conversation, a tour of the hotel, etc.--would 
be stupefingly dull and clichéd.
But the film is never boring; it is compelling and disturbing.  
Kubrick uses formal, strikingly symmetrical visual compositions for 
even the most routine actions and conversations, and he also avoids 
close-ups as much as possible, so that what we see, we see from a 
distance, and what we see are everyday actions presented in an 
artificial, stylized manner.  This incongruity generates a sense of 
unease, an unease which pervades every shot.   We know something will 
go horribly wrong; it's just a matter of when and how.
The genius of the film is in the details.  It is in the way Kubrick 
shows Danny riding around the hotel hallways on his go-cart, shooting 
from a low angle so that the large, silent passages seem even larger, 
even more silent, and very ominous, as they loom high over Danny's 
head.  It is in the way he has Danny--using the unnatural voice of 
Tony, the "friend" who lives in his mouth--say "red rum" over and over 
again, the pitch rising at a key dramatic moment.  It is in the way we 
are shown a brief glimpse through a bedroom door, late in the film, of 
two mysterious characters, hinting at further secrets somewhere in the 
hotel's dark history.
There is never a moment when Kubrick--with help from cinematographer 
John Alcott, production designer Roy Walker, and a seriously 
unsettling score--does not seem to be utterly sure of himself.  The 
movie is a showcase for his talent; I am reluctant to attach any 
deeper significance, because none is needed.  Yes, Jack is a 
recovering alcholic; yes, there are intimations of abuse and 
dysfunction; yes, the movie insinuates that on a deeper level, it may 
be "about" those issues--but, fundamentally, I think to look for those 
meanings misses the point.
THE SHINING wants to frighten us, to induce a pleasurable frisson of 
terror, and to impress us with its craftsmanship.  If it's "about" 
anything, it's about cameras moving slowly and sinisterly down empty 
hallways; abrupt images of silent, solemn twin girls; a frantic chase 
through a snow-covered hedge maze.  It's about style, and it knows 
that subject as well as any movie ever made.

Title
Review for 8˝ Women (1999)
"How many film directors make films to satisfy their sexual fantasies?"
Starring John Standing, Matthew Delamere, Vivian Wu, Polly Walker;
Written & Directed by Peter Greenaway;
Cinematography by Sacha Vierny
        Like all of Peter Greenaway's movies, 8 1/2 WOMEN is founded on an
intellectual conceit which is, in theory, intriguing and suggestive.
Unlike most of them, though, it fails to find a structure which can shape
and elaborate its central conceit.  What we are left with, in practice, is
a movie which is often intriguing, often suggestive, never cohesive.
        The premise is this: after the death of his wife, Philip Emmenthal
(John Standing) and his son Storey (Matthew Delamere), inspired by the
famous harem scene in Fellini's 8 1/2, decide to turn their Swiss mansion
into a harem.  There they keep 8 1/2 women, with whom they act out their
sexual fantasies, only to discover that they are unable to govern those
fantasies: the women's inclinations, sexual and otherwise, are too much for
the two men to handle.  Soon the balance of power in the harem has shifted.
        It is played as intellectual farce, which means that it avoids the
obvious humour, but, by the same token, isn't all that funny.  We begin in
Japan, where the Emmenthals and their assistant Kito (Vivian Wu) are inking
a deal with a Japanese businessman, who is signing over 8 1/2 pachinko
parlours to discharge a substantial debt.   Philip then returns to Geneva;
a short time later, his wife dies.   During his period of mourning, he
wonders if his devotion to his rather passive spouse denied him the
opportunity for sensual experimentation for all those years of marriage.
Storey, sympathetic, offers his father access to his new Japanese
girlfriend as a kind of filial gesture--the father and son have, to put it
mildly, a rather uninhibited relationship with respect to sexual matters.
        Events proceed from there according to the film's perverse logic,
until the Emmenthals have stocked their household with an assortment of
strange women, including a Japanese who wants to be a female impersonator
so she can appear more feminine than she already is (BULLET BALLET's Kirina
Maso); a self-possessed, opportunistic woman who cheerfully negotiates the
terms of her own sexual indenturement (ENCHANTED APRIL's Polly Walker); and
an injured horse thief who keeps a pet pig of whom she is perhaps
unnaturally fond (PULP FICTION's Amanda Plummer).  Greenaway scrupulously
avoids taking a straightforward approach to the material--the women at
first seem to represent male-constructed stereotypes (nun, prostitute,
mother, etc.), but are in fact much more complex and vital.
        The typical Greenaway film uses a single location and/or
structuring device--the zoo in A ZED & TWO NOUGHTS, _The Tempest_ in
PROSPERO'S BOOKS, and so on--to provide a framework for the web of visual
quotes, historical references, interlocking metaphors and schematic
plotting which makes up his work.  In 8 1/2 WOMEN, however, the framework
(and the visual scheme inspired by it) is not nearly as rigorous.  There
are some of the usual geometric parallels--8 1/2 pachinko parlours;
Fellini's 8 1/2; 8 1/2 women--but these are surface decorations, not
guiding principles.  Much of the film in fact seems digressive and
unnecessary, like a scene in which two servants discuss sexual deviance, or
a mildly amusing sequence in which Philip is refused entrance to his wife's
funeral because he has worn white, and has to switch clothes--in broad
daylight--with his black-clad retinue so that he can attend.
        The film's visual texture is lavish and baroquely inventive by
anyone else's standards--fastidious attention is devoted to the sets,
costumes, art design, and lighting--but for Greenaway it represents a kind
of minimalism.  Many elements characteristic of his work are gone or
downplayed: the stately tracking shots, the use of multiple frames, the
striking music.  These are replaced by visual tricks which sometimes seem
like empty contrivance.  A methodical alternating series of close-ups and
long-shots of Philip and Storey seated by an indoor pool, for example, is
distracting and self-conscious.  Greenaway's tactics are always
self-conscious, but here it serves no purpose.
        Nevertheless, Greenaway and his longtime cinematographer Sacha
Vierny provide us with an abundance of diverting images.  A Japanese dancer
poses in the Emmenthals' courtyard, daintily manipulating her fan, while
her movements are partly obscured by a huge pink pig in the foreground. A
nude woman rides a horse bareback across a bright green meadow.  Two naked
men sign a document in the middle of a gaudy pachinko parlour while the
resident gamblers look on soberly.  The movie's nonchalant dismissal of
convention is refreshing.  Still, there are signs that the enfant terrible
is mellowing: the single most transgressive act in the movie--consensual
father-son incest--takes place off-screen.
         There is much to admire in 8 1/2 WOMEN, however discursive and
long-winded it might be.  The intricate ambivalence of the movie's
"meaning" offers a welcome contrast to the transparent motives and methods
of most mainstream cinema.  However, the convoluted, paradoxical ironies
that weave their way through the film do tend to cancel each other out.
Reflections on sex, death, gender, art and the body are offered and then
forgotten; their meaning is not amplified as the movie progresses.   We are
left, in the end, with little more than postmodern artifice: clever,
provocative, and self-defeating.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Time Bandits (1981)
        TIME BANDITS is the first film in Terry Gilliam's "trilogy" about
childhood, adulthood, and old age.  It is a fantasy, and like the two later
films, it is also about fantasy--it explores the relationship between
reality and dreams, illusion, escapism.  While BRAZIL chillingly showed the
failure of imagination, and THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN its triumph,
TIME BANDITS is more ambiguous: both the fantastic and the mundane in some
way disappoint the story's hero.
        TIME BANDITS shares the pessimism of the other two films: reality
is not much fun, and that is why we need fantasies.  Kevin (Craig Warnock),
an adolescent boy, lives a stultifying life with his parents, who are
obsessed with technology and routine, and spend their evenings watching
awful TV shows.  His room, wallpapered with posters, littered with toys, is
his place of escape--literally so, when a troupe of time-travelling dwarves
stumble out of his closet one night and whisk him away on a series of
temporal adventures.
        They visit the siege of Castileone, Sherwood Forest, the Titanic,
Mycenae, and the Fortress of Ultimate Darkness, all with the aid of a map
they have stolen from the Supreme Being, showing the location of various
"timeholes."  The dwarves were in fact formerly in the employ of the
Supreme Being--they helped build the world, although because it was done in
only seven days, it's a "botched job"--and were given the map so they could
repair various oversights in the construction of reality.  Fed up with
their servitude, they chose instead to wander the ages and steal from the
rich (giving to the poor is not part of the plan, however, until they meet
Robin Hood, drolly played by John Cleese).
        Naturally, this plot offers plentiful opportunites for Gilliam's
fertile imagination to run wild, and there are some delightful sequences:
the band's arrival in Castileone is marvellously staged, as is their escape
from a cage hanging over a pit of ultimate darkness.  This is, in effect,
the first recognisable Terry Gilliam movie (the feeble JABBERWOCKY was
presumably directed by his evil twin), and while he is not yet in complete
command of the medium, the signs of his later accomplishments are evident.
The problems with TIME BANDITS--and there are many--are on the level of the
script.
        While the humour is probably fine for kids, the jokes in TIME
BANDITS are mostly poor by adult standards, even the ones thrown in
specifically for a mature audience.  Gilliam demonstrates a gift for both
satire and whimsy in his later films, but comedy is not his strong point;
even with Michael Palin as co-writer, the script never approaches the manic
comic brilliance of "Monty Python's Flying Circus."  And the episodic plot
suffers from its arbitrariness: the various sequences, while each effective
on its own, do not add up to much because there is no dramatic impetus.
With minimal tinkering, the plot could be re-written so that the episodes
occur in any order.
        The finale, however, rescues the movie.  It is no surprise that it
builds to a climactic sequence in the Fortress of Ultimate Darkness, a
showdown with the Evil Genius (Satan) created by the Supreme Being (God).
The outcome, however, is surprising: in its own way it is as disturbing as
the ending of BRAZIL.  This is not a happy, feel-good kids' movie.  There
is whimsy, there is silliness, but the underlying tone is grave, and the
movie's examination of free will and the relationship between good and evil
is quite sobering, particularly for adults.
        Gilliam does not cop to a cheap explanation of the events in TIME
BANDITS--it is not all just a dream--nor does he allow us any comfort from
those events.  What Kevin experiences is, for him, real, and because
reality is not much fun, the escapism offered by the dwarves and their map
proves to be much less fun than he expected.  In this movie, fantasy offers
lessons that are, if anything, harsher than the lessons of real life.
That, however, is an adult perspective; younger viewers will probably
remember the giant who wears a ship as a hat, Napoleon's appreciation for
Punch and Judy shows, and an ogre named Winston.  After all, one of the
points TIME BANDITS makes is that fantasies are more than adequate--until
you start to grow up.
        Review by David Dalgleish (subjective.freeservers.com) -- January
16th, 2000

Title
Review for Ciudad de los prodigios, La (1999)
Original Title: La Ciudad de los Prodigios;
Starring Olivier Martinez, Emma Suárez, François Marthouret, Tony
Isbert, José María Sanz;
Directed by Mario Camus;
Written by Camus and Gustau Hernández, from a novel by Eduardo Mendoza;
Cinematography by Acacio de Almeida;
        Like too many movies adapted from complex novels, THE CITY OF
MARVELS wears its literary source on its sleeve: you can see the
scriptwriters labouring to translate prose into film, and failing.  There
is a crucial transitional moment when a woman goes from a state of
happiness to melancholy to insanity to dementia--all compressed into about
three seconds of screen time, thanks to the marvels of voice-over
narration.  Long expository narrations book-end the film, serving as a kind
of duct tape to patch together pieces of the movie which would otherwise
seem even more disjointed than they are.  Voice-overs shoehorn in
background details which could not be integrated into the script.
        It's a shame, because when the narrator keeps his mouth shut and
lets events speak for themselves, the movie is often superb.  The titular
"City of Marvels" is Barcelona, in the years before and after the Universal
Exposition of 1888.  Olivier Martinez stars as Onofre, a young man who
comes to Barcelona in search of the wealth of experiences offered by the
city.  He finds it harder than he thought it would to be find gainful
employment, and he ends up spending much of his time at his boarding-house,
where he is befriended by the owner and his daughter Delfina (Emma Suárez).
        Delfina introduces Onofre to an anarchist group.  Thanks to his
memories of a father who left for the Caribbean to seek his fortune and
came back an abject failure, as well as his own disappointments in the
city, Onofre is sympathetic to the anarchists' goal of equality for the
workers.  He joins the cause, but the anarchists' theoretical ideals are
opposed by the strong-arm pragmatism of the local police.  After surviving
a harsh example of police injustice, Onofre becomes disillusioned and gives
up the anarchist cause as hopeless.
        He is then bribed by one of the city's wealthy powermongers and
forced to join the ranks of the very people the anarchists are dedicated to
overthrowing.  But once he's within the establishment, Onofre finds that
the shoe fits.  He works at first as a hired thug, a bodyguard, a
street-level operative, but he has ambitions.  He initiates a cunning and
far-sighted play for power within the savage--and often fatal--world of
Barcelona politics.
        The momentum of Onofre's obsessive quest for power and the
corrupting effect of his realpolitik compromises make for fascinating
viewing.  It is here that the movie really hits its stride, at times
possessing something of the elemental force of grand tragedy.  Onofre
exists in a world of brutality and treachery.  He manipulates and schemes
and betrays in order to further his own aims.  He makes and breaks secret
deals in shadowy cobblestoned alleys.  He is a study in moral decay, and
perhaps a symbol of Spain's own failings; his tactics bring to mind, for
example, the rise of Franco and fascism in the years preceding World War
II.
        Onofre is a convincing villain, but the movie wants him to be more
ambiguous.  The cruel thrust of his ruthless political expediencies is
ostensibly balanced by the fact that he does it all for--what else?--the
love of a good woman.  The good woman is Delfina, the woman who introduced
him to the anarchists.  She loved him, once, but after he rapes her and,
later, manipulates her father into committing murder, she understandably
professes to despise him.  In a turn of events that could only have been
written by a man, she admits, years later, that she still really does love
Onofre, even though by now he is a rapist, thief, and murderer many times
over. The two find happiness together (sort of).
        The love story is misguided, to put it mildly, and it's no
coincidence that the best thing about the movie is the lengthy middle
section after Delfina moves to France, when the focus is squarely on
Onofre's rise to power.  Delfina's change of heart occurs only after Onofre
has obtained wealth, power, and privilege: in this movie, even the noblest
of human souls comes with a price tag. Just as the villainous man nurses a
secret love in his heart through the years, so the virtuous woman is
secretly seduced by the lure of status and luxury.
        The contradictions inherent in Onofre and Delfina's personalities
are intended to embody the contradictions of their age--the concluding
narration helpfully explains this to us, in case we missed the point.  And
it is indeed, like all eras, contradictory: the heady possibilities of
technology and industry clash with the rigid class divisions, political
repressions, and authoritarian violence.  Onofre is supposed to encapsulate
the best and worst of it.  But except for his brief stint as an idealistic
anarchist, he does not embody the best of anything, except perhaps the
cutthroat mentality of the born survivor.   He represents the sins of his
age and none of its virtues.  THE CITY OF MARVELS would have us believe
otherwise, and so founders under the weight of its own contradictions.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Wandafuru raifu (1998)
"I would like you to choose the most important memory of your life."
Starring Abe Sadao, Ishido Natsuo, Oda Erika, Terajima Susumu, Naito 
Takashi
Written & Directed by Kore-eda Hirokazu
Cinematography by Yamazaki Yutaka and Sukita Masayoshi
It begins with a great hook.  Several men and a woman gather in a 
room, discussing their workload for the week to come.  Each is 
assigned several cases--people, presumably patients, maybe in a 
hospital, maybe in a mental institution.  But the workers discussing 
their cases wear ordinary clothes, and the building seems more school 
than hospital.  The people--patients, if that is what they are--are 
greeted in a reception room, and then directed to the person handling 
their "case."  Everyone is amiable and courteous.  The "case workers" 
lead their "patients" to a private room, sit them down at a desk, face 
them squarely.  They then inform them that they are dead, and in a few 
days they will pass on to another realm, beyond self-awareness.
So begins the second fiction feature by Japanese director Kore-eda 
Hirokazu, whose previous work, MABOROSI, was one of this decade's more 
impressive debuts.  But that movie, sublime as it was, is surpassed in 
all regards by AFTER LIFE.  MABOROSI was a strikingly beautiful film, 
but austere and formal: it required patience.  To appreciate it, you 
had to bear with it.  AFTER LIFE requires no such act of faith: it is 
warm, intimate, direct, and it is a masterpiece.
The building, then, is neither hospital nor school nor institute: it 
is limbo, the doorway to heaven, the threshold of nirvana, any or all 
of the above.  The men and the woman are not case workers, they are 
advisors, they will guide the dead on their final voyage.  Their task 
is simple enough to describe, but difficult to perform: they must help 
the dead choose a single memory, their most cherished memory, and when 
they have done so, they will pass on to a place where they will dwell 
in that memory forever, forgetting all else.  In a splendidly 
conceived literalization of this task--and a self-reflexive comment on 
the task that AFTER LIFE itself undertakes--the guides also have to 
stage a reenactment of each chosen memory, which will be filmed for 
posterity.  (This leads, amongst other things, to a clever scene 
staged like a pre-production meeting, in which they discuss how to 
recreate individual memories: clouds rushing by the cockpit of an 
airplane in flight; cherry blossom falling like snow.)
The dead--who look, talk, and act as they were just before they 
died--ask the kind of questions we might ask.  There is no heaven and 
hell?  No, there isn't.  Can they choose a dream instead of a memory, 
or a vision of the future instead of a recollection of the past?  No, 
they can't.  Once they have established the parameters, they begin to 
pan the rivers of memory, sifting the rocks and the sand and the mud, 
looking for the precious glint of gold, the single instant that sums 
up who they were.  The process is as much self-definition as 
recollection.  Much of this part of the film is done in "talking head" 
documentary-style interviews: the camera, fixed, faces the characters 
head-on, and lets them talk.  Nothing else is needed: listening to 
their reminiscences, feeling their emotions as they try to capture the 
essence of themselves in a single moment, provides all the drama and 
passion we could want.
There is an authenticity about these reminiscences that goes beyond 
fiction, beyond acting, that seems to capture something raw and true.  
I was not surprised to learn, after I had seen the film, that many of 
the cast members are non-professionals, real people recalling real 
lives.  They were selected from over five hundred interviewees, found 
more or less at random, in nursing homes and parks and temples in 
Tokyo.  What these people have done in this film is remarkable.  It is 
not acting, but its opposite: they have stripped away pretense and 
artifice, and bared their souls.
We learn much about them, but as they talk to their advisors, we also 
start to learn about the advisors, too.  There are many quiet 
revelations, each fitting perfectly into the overall scheme of the 
film.  We are treated to the details of the advisor's jobs, the 
logistics involved in the mock-up recreations, the formalities that 
provide a send-off for these people as they pass into easeful 
self-less sleep.  Some details are left deliberately obscure--we never 
learn how anyone died, we never learn the boundaries of this spiritual 
halfway house--but we eventually find out who the guides are, and why 
they do what they do.  The more I think about it, the more profound 
and reassuring that revelation seems.
The same can be said for the whole movie, but one sequence in 
particular affected me beyond all reason.  An older woman--who I am 
convinced is one of the non-professionals, remembering genuine lived 
experience--is describing her chosen memory.  She recalls dancing as a 
young girl to a song called "The Red Shoes."  As she talks, details 
return to her: the dance steps, her red dress, a gesture made with her 
handkerchief. There is nothing in my own experience that connects me 
with these things.  She is a woman; I am a man.  I have never been to 
her homeland; she, probably, has never been to mine.  I have never 
heard a song called "The Red Shoes," and I don't like dancing.
Yet this scene, this simple, unpoetic remembrance, moved me, 
inexplicably, to tears.  I can count on one hand the number of times I 
have felt so choked up by a single scene in a movie.  The only thing 
that this woman and I have in common is our humanity.  One of AFTER 
LIFE's many lessons is that, in the end, that is enough.  We are all 
bound by our mortality, and it is that bond which makes it bearable.

Title
Review for Mon oncle Antoine (1971)
"I'm not made for the country.  I hate it here."
Claude Jutra does two things with great assurance and subtlety in MON 
ONCLE ANTOINE ("My Uncle Antoine").  First, he captures the essence of 
a place, a people, and a time.  Second, he tells the story of a young 
boy's rite-of-passage.  If Jutra did one of these things well, this 
would be a good movie; because he does both, it is great.
The place is a small asbestos mining community in Quebec; the people 
are the insular, Catholic townsfolk; and the time is Christmas, 
sometime in the 1940s, before the Quiet Revolution urbanized and 
secularized the province.  Place, people, and time are lovingly 
observed: there is not a moment in this film which does not seem 
authentic.  The cold, stark winter landscape is captured in all its 
austere beauty by Michel Brault, while the naturally lit interiors are 
cluttered and shadowy and everyday, filling the frame with a sense of 
real places and real lives.  There is a strong sense of community: 
these people have only each other, and Jutra conveys all the joys and 
frustrations of this way of life.  This is a cinematic postcard, a 
memento of a place which no longer exists as it once did.
The principal players are Antoine (Jean Duceppe) and his nephew 
Benoit (Jacques Gagnon).  Antoine should, in theory, be the grand 
patriarch of this town.  He owns the general store--the community's 
heart--and he is also the undertaker, responsible for bringing the 
dead to church for last rites.  But it is his wife (Olivette Thibault) 
who really runs the store, with the aid of the clerk (Jutra) and the 
two adolescents who live and work there: Benoit and Carmen (Lyne 
Champagne).  Antoine mostly sits about lazily, drinking heavily; we 
realize he is living one of Thoreau's lives of quiet desperation.
As the title suggests, the crucial moments of MON ONCLE ANTOINE are 
seen through Benoit's eyes: the story is in his changing awareness of 
his uncle and of nubile Carmen, his growth into maturity, into a 
newfound awareness of mortality and sexuality, death and desire: the 
two issues which separate adulthood from childhood.  There is one 
scene which is absolutely perfect.  Benoit and Antoine go to a rural 
house, where the eldest son has just died, to bring the body back to 
town;  they are given a meal for their trouble by the grieving mother.  
The way Jutra handles this entire scene is virtuosic: his camera 
captures the emotions of the mother, the surviving children, Benoit 
and his uncle, with economy and accuracy and insight.  This is cinema 
at its most accomplished, conveying with images and sparse dialogue 
all the complexity and emotional texture of a great novel.
Most of the film approaches this level of mastery, but not all: it 
drags on perhaps 15 minutes too long, and there is one tedious, 
predictable scene in which Benoit and another boy, fascinated by women 
and clueless about them, nervously spy on an older woman as she 
strips.  I've seen variants on this scene many times, and considering 
how well Jutra elsewhere handles Benoit's growing sexual 
self-consciousness, here it is irrelevant.  But this is an exception: 
what is remarkable is that Jutra manages to avoid cliché, making this 
timeworn material seem new and even profound, in its own deceptively 
simple way.
MON ONCLE ANTOINE has twice been voted the greatest ever Canadian 
film, in Canada's version of the once-a-decade Sight & Sound poll.  
This in part reflects the feebleness of the Canadian film industry and 
the resulting paucity of great Canadian movies, but it also reflects 
the quintessential Canadian-ness of the film, which in its quiet, 
understated examination of small-town life resembles Canadian literary 
classics like Stephen Leacock's Sunshine Sketches of a Little Town.  
Its ambitions are modest, but it more than succeeds in what it sets 
out to do.  It is also quintessentially Canadian in that it could have 
been a little less restrained, and a little more ambitious.

Title
Review for Tokyo-Ga (1985)
        TOKYO-GA has been called a film "diary," but it might be more apt
to call it a scrapbook.  It is an assortment of images, clips, reflections,
and interviews assembled by Wim Wenders during a trip to Tokyo.  The
impetus for the trip, as described by Wenders himself, is to see whether
the Tokyo--and by extension the Japan--captured so precisely in the films
of Yasujiro Ozu still exists.  Wenders holds Ozu in the highest esteem: he
describes the revered Japanese director's oeuvre as the closest thing to a
"sacred treasure" in the cinema.
        The documentary was made in between two of Wenders's great works,
PARIS, TEXAS and WINGS OF DESIRE.  TOKYO-GA is a much more low-key,
personal work, although it has the same sense of introspection and
haphazardness that distinguishes the two fiction features.  It represents,
very deliberately, an attempt to wed Wenders's own style with that of Ozu;
to emphasise the point, TOKYO-GA is framed by the beginning and ending of
Ozu's most famous film, TOKYO STORY.  Wenders remarks at one point that
movies should be made the way we open our eyes: they should attempt simply
to see what is real, rather than trying to prove a point.  He believes that
Ozu's films achieve this goal, and his documentary is an attempt to do the
same.
        The movie is in effect a rather shapeless series of digressions and
anecdotes, connected tenuously by the twinned themes of Tokyo and Ozu.  It
is filtered through Wenders's own preoccupations with cinema and the ways
it can both reveal and distort truth.  He moves according to his whims from
one sequence of images to another, punctuating them with his thoughts on
the nature of representation, which tend to be less compelling than the
representations themselves.
        Although it is tedious on occasion--no one will ever accuse Wenders
of using overly short takes--there are many pleasures to be had from his
observations of Japan.  An extended series of images of Japanese
businessmen playing pachinko goes on for too long, but other moments are
humorous, human, and fascinating.  Members of the "Tokyo Rockabilly Club"
perform Elvis impersonations in a park; a mother tries to cope with a
petulant child in a subway station; ranks of people practice their golf
stroke on a driving range atop a skyscraper; children play baseball on a
cemetery path overhung with cherry blossom.
        It is in this sampling of everyday peculiarities that Wenders seeks
insight into contemporary Japan, circa 1985.  There is no attempt to
investigate broad social, political, and economic trends.   And his method
is effective: he succeeds in capturing, obliquely, something of the
paradoxes which underlie Japanese society, the marriage of Western fashions
to Eastern idiosyncracies.  There are also interviews with former
colleagues of Ozu: his cinematographer, his assistant director, the actor
Chishu Ryu.  All regard the late director with a sense of humility and
respect bordering on awe; one refers to him as a "king."
        Despite the evident fondness and open-hearted curiousity with which
Wenders approaches all he encounters, there is an air of studied detachment
to TOKYO-GA which tends to distance the viewer.  The feeling is not helped
by Wenders's laconic, unimpassioned voice-overs.  The notable exception,
and almost certainly the most affecting incident in the movie, is an
interview with Ozu's former assistant director, who, after lengthy
reminiscence, is overcome by emotion at the memory of his mentor, and
tearfully thanks Wenders and asks him to leave, turning away from the
camera in embarassment.  It is here, for the first time, that we really
sense the passion that Ozu and his movies inspire in people.
        At one point, Wenders meets fellow German director Wernor Herzog.
Standing on the observation ring of Tokyo Tower, backdropped by the city's
seemingly infinite skyline, a monument to the bewildering complexity of
human achievement, Herzog proclaims his belief that there are few "pure"
images left in the world and one must go to great lengths to find them, and
he would like to go into space for this purpose.  Wenders acknowledges
Herzog's point, but tells us that in Tokyo he finds all the "pure" images
he needs.
        TOKYO-GA thus becomes a refutation of Herzog's argument: "pure"
images are everywhere, if you can find them, and Wenders can.  Perhaps the
most remarkable are discovered during his trip to a factory that
manufactures the mouthwatering artificial dishes displayed in the windows
of Japanese restaurants.  These representations of food are, at a distance,
indistinguishable from the real thing.  Wenders finds men assembling the
imitation dishes with care and precision, consulting blueprints as they
construct each one.  It is a task which seems surreal at first--more effort
is spent on the fake food than would be on cooking the actual meal--but
Wenders takes the time to show us the craft with which the men perform
their labour.  Indeed, it is not surprising that he is sympathetic to their
efforts. What they are doing, after all, is approximating the real by means
of the artificial--like Ozu, like Wenders, like cinema.
        Review by David Dalgleish (subjective.freeservers.com) -- January
29th, 2000

Title
Review for Nohoi oron (1998)
"... the man, the dog, the heaven, the earth ..."
Starring Nyam Dagyrantz, Baatar Galsansukh, Purevdavaa Oyungerel
Written & Directed by Peter Brosens and Dorjkhandyn Turmunkh
Cinematography by Heiki Färm and Sakhya Byamba
You would think that a movie billed as a Belgian-Mongolian 
co-production would be unusual, and you would be right.  STATE OF DOGS 
is a peculiar hybrid, a patchwork of documentary and fiction, 
travelogue and animal fable, mysticism and social realism.  It has a 
story, but is not overly concerned with telling it.  It unfolds in 
fragments and impressions, like a dream, and, like a dream, some of it 
is memorable, some of it is not.
The story which holds everything together is the tale of Baasar, a 
dog who dies at the beginning of the film and wanders through 
landscape and memory as a disembodied spirit, until he is reborn as a 
human at the end.  This synopsis sounds like a cute animal story, but, 
while STATE OF DOGS is many things, it is not cute.
Baasar dies in the first few minutes, shot by a dog-hunter, along 
with several other strays.  Stray dogs are a problem in Ulan Bator, 
capital of Mongolia, but most of the population refuses to kill 
animals, believing it to be an evil act.  We see the dog-hunter, a 
lonely man shunned by others because of his activities, rise in the 
morning, prepare his rifle, drive out to the edge of the city, and 
kill some dogs.  He loads them into the back of the truck, takes them 
to the garbage dump, and throws them off.  This is all authentic 
footage: the dog-hunter is real, and so are the dogs he kills.  It is 
definitely not cute.
But this is not a grim study of the solitary life of a dog-hunter.  
These early episodes are merely a preamble to the disconnected 
sequences that follow, seemingly random images, sounds, moments of 
Mongolian life, in the city and on the steppe, in winter and summer.
Baasar's spirit wanders the city.  We watch a family honouring its 
dead in a dry, dusty graveyard.  We watch a young woman seated at the 
back of a bus, staring out the windows on a bright summer day (later 
we discover that she will give birth to the child which will house 
Baasar's reincarnated spirit).  We see the dreary outskirts of the 
city, a place of highways, rubbish tips, and squat blocky buildings.
The dog also recalls his past life, when he was owned by a Mongolian 
nomad on the steppe. In his memories, we see a gathering of herd 
animals, all bleating and fussing; we see the nomadic people setting 
up a satellite dish so they can receive Mongolia's one TV channel; we 
see young men wrestling while an older man sings and plays an odd 
stringed instrument; there is much more.
All these things seem to have been assembled more or less at the 
whims of the filmmakers.  There was a solar eclipse visible from 
Northern Mongolia while they were shooting, so, hey, why not include a 
shot of a solar eclipse, and link it to a myth about a dragon eating 
the sun?  There was a radiantly beautiful young pregnant woman at the 
hospital while they were casting for a pregnant woman, so, hey, why 
not include a shot of her in the nude?  There was a neat shot that 
could be achieved by tracking away from a highway along a railroad, to 
reveal the bleak vista beside it, then turning to look back down the 
railroad, so, hey, why not include it?
It is revealing that some brief interludes in which a young man 
recites poems directly to the camera were shot for no other reason 
than, a) he was the production assistant, b) he was a poet, and, c) 
they had some film stock left.   But I am glad they did use this 
grab-bag approach.  Some of the material, like the poem recited at the 
beginning, or an amazing demonstration by a female contortionist near 
the end, would have no place in a more structured format, and it is 
these throwaway incidents that make this unhurried, low-key film so 
charming.
But it is more than that: the cinematography and sound design are 
both terrific, and in a film which has little dialogue, these elements 
are crucial.  During the solar eclipse, the Mongolian people beat 
metal objects in an attempt to ward off the dragon who is eating the 
sun.  We see the solar eclipse, accompanied by a mighty clashing and 
banging, and it's a powerfully dramatic moment--quite remarkable given 
that the film has no dramatic tension to speak of.
To find fault because it is incoherent (it is), because it lacks plot 
and character (it does), because it repeats itself (ditto), would be 
petty.  This is an extraordinary movie: and so its pleasures are not 
those of ordinary movies.  STATE OF DOGS transports us to another part 
of the world.  It reveals how life is lived in a place which, in all 
likelihood, most of us will never see for ourselves.  It brings us to 
a land so alien it might as well be another planet, as strange as it 
is beautiful, as beautiful as it is strange.

Title
Review for Inquietude (1998)
"We must die with dignity, mustn't we?"
Starring Irene Papas, José Pinto, Leonor Silveira, Luis Miguel Cintra
Written & Directed by Manoel de Oliveira, from stories by Agustina 
Bessa-Luís, Prista Monteiro, and António Patrício
Cinematography by Renato Berta
When writer/director Manoel de Oliveira first conceived of ANXIETY, 
it probably sounded like a really good idea.  It would be a sombre, 
literate meditation on mortality, told through three interwoven 
stories, each story resonating with the others to create a whole 
greater than the sum of its parts.  That, indeed, sounds like a movie 
I would enjoy.
ANXIETY is not that movie.  It is one of the most excruciatingly 
tedious experiences I have had in a theatre in a long time, an opinion 
shared by the friend who endured it with me and (evidently) the two 
dozen or more people, wiser than I, who left before it was over.
What is wrong with the film?  Almost everything.  On an intellectual 
level, it does offer some thought-provoking ideas, but that's of 
little use when those ideas are removed from any human context.  De 
Oliveira's approach to his material seems to be one of philosophic 
detachment, but he was entirely too successful with the detachment 
part.  The characters exist so that they can debate certain ideas; 
they have no personality traits beyond those immediately required.  
They have no passion, no life.  The acting is stiff, and everyone 
appears to have only one emotional register, viz., sober reflection.  
Characters mostly sit in one place and talk, using very formal, 
'written' language.  The camera is static.  The men philosophize about 
women, while the women ... well, the women sit around so that the men 
can philosophize about them.
Worse, the production values are shabbier than any I have seen for 
quite some time.  The sets are bland and unappealing, the lighting 
dim.  The editing and mise-en-scčne seem like the work of an amateur, 
although they are not: de Oliveira made his first film in 1931.  He is 
89 years old and still at work.  I am sure he is a fascinating human 
being.  I am sure, with all those years of life lived, he has some 
fascinating things to say about mortality.  I just wish he had come 
right out and said them, rather than making this movie.
Bits and pieces of ANXIETY show promise.  There are some nice images, 
like a shot of a rough-hewn tunnel lined with candles.  There is a 
blackly humourous moment at the end of the first part, which concerns 
a father and son arguing about whether the son should commit suicide 
so that he will remain famous after he's dead.   As I was watching 
these things, I was thinking, "That would have been interesting, if I 
actually gave a damn about what was going on."
There is also a neat twist in the transition from the first story to 
the second story, but unfortunately the second story is the worst of 
the lot, devoted largely to the musings of one man about a courtesan 
he has slept with, and what it is that she represents in the grand 
scheme of things.  The man's repeated invocation of the phrase "poor 
Suzy" becomes unintentional self-parody.  By the film's third act, a 
myth about a 1000-year-old 'Mother of a River' who passes on her 
knowledge to a young girl, I was numb to any possible pleasures, and 
simply looking forward to the end credits.
This is by no means the worst film I have seen; at the very least, it 
has some potentially compelling ideas, which is more than you can say 
for some movies.  The screenplay might actually make for good reading, 
but it just doesn't translate onto the screen.  De Oliveira seems to 
have been striving for the sort of static, contemplative mood used so 
successfully by, say, Tarkovsky.  But the artistry that makes a movie 
like THE SACRIFICE so mesmerizing is lacking here.  The fact is, I 
don't think most people would enjoy this movie even if it did succeed 
on its own terms, just as most people are probably put off by THE 
SACRIFICE and similar works.  I, however, am part of the target 
audience for ANXIETY, and I hated it.  That's never a good sign.

Title
Review for Trance (1998/I)
"Everything that is, is in the process of becoming something else."
Starring Alison Elliott, Jared Harris, Christopher Walken, Lois Smith;
Written and Directed by Michael Almereyda;
Cinematography by Jim Denault
        It's hard to make a gloomy mansion possessed by an undead spirit
seem like an original conceit, but American writer/director Michael
Almereyda gives it his best shot in TRANCE (aka THE ETERNAL).  He makes
sophisticated use of dark fantasy tropes and a sombre visual palette in
this horror story about a 2000-year-old druid haunting the ancestral home
of an Irish family, but ultimately fails to transcend the circumscribed
limits of the generic material.
        The movie begins in America, where Nora (Alison Elliott) and Jim
(Jared Harris) and their eight-year-old son are about to leave to visit
Nora's aging grandmother in Ireland.  Nora falls down a staircase and has
to see her doctor; he advises her to call off the trip and reminds her that
she should stop drinking because of her headaches.  She ignores him.  Next
stop, Ireland, for a couple of pints of Guiness in a village pub, and,
then, as the family drives down the winding road to their destination,
strange images obscure Nora's vision, and she crashes the car.  The family
is miraculously uninjured, and they exit the damaged vehicle to find Alice,
who lives with Nora's grandfather and uncle, standing solemnly by the side
of the road.  She leads them to the family home--a huge ancient house by
the dark, treacherous bog.
        Almereyda effectively develops a mood of unease and foreboding in
the early scenes, suggesting that Nora and Jim drown their personal demons
with heavy drinking, and anticipating the incursion of the supernatural
into the mundane world by showing us brief elliptical images in Nora's head
and having Alice appear with uncannily precise timing.  Things become
stranger when we meet Nora's uncle (Christopher Walken, sporting an
intermittent Irish accent).  He is a strange, reclusive fellow, perhaps
insane--at night, he leads Nora to the cellar, where he reveals the
preserved peat-encrusted body of an ancient druid woman.  Of course, the
druid will come to life, and she will kill people.  And the phone line is
down.  It is a horror story, after all.
        It's a superior example of its kind in large part because
Almereyda, in tandem with cinematographer Jim Denault (THE BOOK OF LIFE,
CLOCKWATCHERS), establishes a mesmeric, disquieting appearance for the
film: it looks the way horror movies should look.  Long shots of dim
hallways where characters stand shrouded in shadow, silhouetted by distant
light.  Malfunctioning electric lights which bathe scenes in stark ominous
flickering blue luminescence.  Abrupt images of weirdly solemn children who
appear at odd moments and say nothing.  TRANCE is fundamentally a
conventional tale, but it is distinguished by its visual elegance,
including some sequences shot in Super-8 and, so I'm told, Fisher-Price
Pixelvision; the latter produces extremely low-fi images which are
remarkably effective here as a vehicle for dissociative and enigmatic
flashbacks.
        TRANCE also stretches the limits of its genre by making supple
metaphoric use of supernatural motifs.  Almereyda is interested in using
the conventions of horror to explore the persona of Nora rather than to
exploit their shock value.  Nora's return home, from New World to Old
World, seems intended as a symbolic encounter with her past identity, a
coming-to-terms with the passionate girl she used to be, before she left
for America and the comfort of her vapid marriage to glib, superficial Jim.
        The druid, when she comes to life, appears in Nora's form, and
functions as an external manifestation of Nora's repressed self, as doubles
often do in supernatural tales (Poe's "William Wilson" is a classic
example).  While Nora is emotive, civilized, neurotic and peaceable, the
druid is silent, feral, implacable and violent; Alison Elliott is good in
the double role, conveying the differences without overplaying them.  The
film becomes a confrontation between two aspects of the same woman: it is
about the need to acknowledge the past and to assimilate our buried selves.
        Unfortunately, whatever its intentions, TRANCE devolves into
moments of predictable horror during the final third, which weaken the
otherwise intriguing finale.  There is, for instance, a ludicrous reversal
of situation when a character on the verge of death is saved by an
off-screen--and implausible--gunshot.  Later, the druid advances menacingly
down the hall of the old house while gusts of meteorogically unlikely wind
whip her hair about and swirl redundant leaves about her feet.  Almereyda
has a strong sense of irony, and brings style and flair even to these
routine moments; nevertheless, such moments root the film within a moribund
genre, when it should be stepping beyond it.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Ringu (1998)
"She killed a man just by willing him dead."
Starring Matsushima Nanako, Hiroyuki Sanada, Nakatani Miki;
Directed by Hideo Nakata;
Written by Hiroshi Takahashi, from a novel by Koji Suzuki;
Cinematography by Junichiro Hayashi
        Back in the 1790s, Ann Radcliffe, the most popular author of Gothic
fiction during its heyday, proposed a distinction between horror and
terror.  "Terror and horror," she wrote, "are so far opposite, that the
first expands the soul, and awakens the faculties to a high degree of life;
the other contracts, freezes, and nearly annihilates them."  In other
words, horror offends the senses, and terror exalts them; horror is cheap
thrills, terror is sublime.
        On the basis of RING, a Japanese movie which could be a working
model for Radcliffe's definition of terror, I'm inclined to agree.  For
ninety-plus minutes, it builds suspense and (of course) terror through
insinuation and understatement and measured pacing.  It is not graphic or
violent, but it nonetheless manages to be intensely scarifying.
        The premise: a mysterious video has been linked to a number of
deaths in Tokyo.  Rumour has it that those who see the video receive a
phone call moments later informing them that they have exactly a week to
live.  Asakawa, a journalist and single mother, investigates, finds the
video, and (because we need a plot) watches it.  She receives a phone call.
And the screw begins to turn ...
        Despite the modern trappings, RING is very much inspired by classic
ghost stories, and uses the same simple storytelling methods.  It gains our
interest by presenting us with sympathetic, everyday characters,
principally Asakawa (Matsushima Nanako) and her ex-husband (Hiroyuki
Sanada), whom she enlists to help her after receiving the fateful phone
call.  It involves a ghost who haunts our mortal realm because she has been
sinned against and cannot rest in peace.  It develops thematic links
between the past and present by having both strands include neglected
children.  It uses needless details--like a ride on a fishing boat across a
tempest-tossed sea--to intensify the mood of foreboding.  If Wilkie Collins
or M.R. James (or their Japanese counterparts) were alive now, they might
write such a tale.
        While the narrative is, for the most part, quiet and unhurried,
composed in the serene static Japanese style familiar from Ozu and
Mizoguchi onward, it is occasionally punctuated by brief disruptive
moments: flashes of images from the video or from the past, accompanied by
a harsh ominous score.  As is the case in the films of Takeshi Kitano,
whose contemplative storylines are interrupted by short bursts of extreme
violence, the contrast is potent and compelling.  There are other nice
touches, too, like the captions telling us which day it is, counting down
the time Asakawa has left--and matter-of-factly cranking up the tension.
        The video itself, shown early in the movie, proves to be perhaps
the freakiest paranormal moment seen on screen since the climax of THE
KINGDOM I.  It is a brief montage of enigmatic, blurry video footage, with
weird sounds in the background.  It reveals nothing at all, but conveys a
powerful sense of wrongness.  Although director Hideo Nakata's methods are
elsewhere straightforward--albeit effective--the composition of the video
is inspired.  Sections of it are shown repeatedly, but it becomes no less
eerie or estranging.
        The entire film could be construed as the set-up for one "money"
scene, in which a much-anticipated confrontation finally takes place,
although not in the expected manner.  Because the film is so well crafted,
this "money" scene delivers exactly what it is supposed to: chilling
terror.  Yes, that's a cliché, but it was literally true in my case--I had
shivers going up and down my spine like a parade was passing over my grave.
And in a tense moment earlier in the film, an unexpected development
elicited plenty of curt breathless screams from the audience.  RING was a
smash hit throughout South-East Asia, and based on the reaction at its
North American premiere, it's not hard to see why: it plays its audience
masterfully, regardless of their language.  In the grand scheme of things,
it may not be a great or important movie, but it is a near-perfect example
of its kind.  It understands the simplest rule of terror: the longer you
make them wait, the bigger and better the pay-off will be.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Forbrydelsens element (1984)
"The morality of the police is no different from that of society."
Starring Michael Elphick, Esmond Knight, Me Me Lai, Jerold Wells;
Directed by Lars von Trier;
Written by von Trier and Niels Vřrsen;
Cinematography by Michael Ellis
Sombre.  Enigmatic.  Brooding.  Opaque.  Ambitious.  THE ELEMENT OF 
CRIME, Lars von Trier's first film, inspires adjectives and defies 
explanation.  It is a sophisticated experiment in film noir, at once 
homage and update and critique.  It is the type of work that can only 
exist late in the life of a genre, when all the patterns are 
established and known, and so can be unstitched, picked apart, 
reworked.
It is similar, in many ways, to Paul Auster's "New York Trilogy," 
also written in the early 80s: both works take the building blocks of 
the detective story and rearrange them, turning them into the 
foundation for complex existential and epistemological explorations.  
We begin with detective Fisher (Michael Elphick), returning to England 
after years of exile in Cairo.  He meets his former boss and mentor, 
Osborne (Esmond Knight), who has written a book called "The Element of 
Crime," which outlines an investigative methodology based on 
identification with the criminal.  Fisher is then called to 
investigate the latest in a series of brutal child murders.  
Naturally, he applies Osborne's theories to the case.
He learns that the murders may or may not have been committed by a 
man named Harry Gray, who may or may not be dead, and who may or may 
not be preparing to kill again, to complete the (hypothetical) pattern 
he has begun.  Fisher retraces Gray's route from one murder scene to 
the next, trying to intuit the pattern and anticipate the next crime; 
as he does so, he begins to identify, on some level, with the 
(hypothetical) murderer.  It's complicated.
Superficially, much of what goes on follows the familiar routines of 
film noir: the detective is a loner with his own peculiar code of 
honour; he meets an elegant, sexy woman (Me Me Lai) who may be 
connected to the crime, and has an affair with her; his pursuit of the 
truth is haunted by a fatalistic sense of irrelevance.  But 
traditional detective stories expand: as the detective meets new 
suspects, finds new evidence, a larger pattern emerges. The story 
grows as it goes.  Here, the story contracts, shrinks, coils in on 
itself, becomes impacted and internal: Fisher becomes his own suspect, 
as he doubts his motivations, his capabilities, and perhaps his 
sanity.
Or maybe that's not what happens.  The film is ambiguous and 
non-literal to the point of being maddening.  It encourages many 
interpretations, but ratifies none of them.  Consider a scene in which 
we see Osborne on TV, answering questions about his theory-cum-book: 
"The element of crime," he says, "sets up a series of mental exercises 
designed to improve our understanding of the behavioural pattern of 
the criminal."  Of course, the title of his book is also the title of 
the movie, and so as we hear this the meaning is doubled: Osborne is 
explaining how his book is to be read, and von Trier is explaining how 
his film is to be understood. Or is he?  As we move on, the 
statement's usefulness diminishes, and soon we disregard it as overly 
simplistic.
This postmodern play of frames within frames, texts within texts, 
readings within readings, is typical of the movie as a whole, which 
contrives to be at once dense with import and thoroughly pointless.  
You can follow the ideas through, try to unravel the tangled knots of 
significance, but why bother?  Von Trier does not have a story of his 
own to tell: this a story about other stories.  It is art theory 
disguised as art.  There is no sense of engagement, of passion, of 
urgency: it is otiose and abstracted, and so its relationship to 
quotidian life is tangential at best.  You could easily write a 
compelling thesis on THE ELEMENT OF CRIME, but only with difficulty 
could you extract any practical wisdom, any human insight.
This is partly because the story does not take place in anything like 
the "real" world, but rather in an impressionistic refraction of 
post-war industrial Europe, a post-holocaust England where the place 
names are German, a rain-dark realm of derelict edifices and unsmiling 
citizens.  All is sepia-toned, slow-moving, shrouded in murk and 
shadow, seen from strange angles.  Von Trier uses silence and slow 
motion with subtlety and precision, deepening the vivid sense of the 
unreal, and he returns again and again to particular images--broken 
glass, a horse, blue light--so that they take on elusive, oneiric 
significance.  
It is a splendid piece of cinematic showmanship, a tour-de-force of 
atmosphere, and for ambience alone, the film has few equals--which is 
not surprising, given that von Trier is one of the finest directors 
at work today.  But THE ELEMENT OF CRIME is all ambience, all 
potential: it envisions a world in which memorable things might 
happen, but then they do not.  When he found his own stories to tell, 
in ZENTROPA and BREAKING THE WAVES and THE KINGDOM, von Trier came 
into his own.  In this, his debut, he shows that he knows what to do 
with a camera, but not what to say with it.  In the end, it's hard to 
say if it's a good film or a bad film.  It's complicated.

Title
Review for Topo, El (1971)
        Starring Alejandro Jodorowsky, Brontis Jodorowsky, Mara Lorenzio,
Paula Romo, Jacqueline Luis;
        Written & Directed by Alejandro Jodorowsky;
        Cinematography by Rafael Corkidi
        To trash EL TOPO requires no effort, for its flaws are plain to
see.  It makes no sense.  It is punctuated by abrupt and inconsistent tonal
shifts.  It is full of exaggerated violence and gratuitous nudity.  It
features hordes of physically "abnormal" people who are paraded across the
screen in service of the film's freakshow aesthetic.  There are absurd
gunfights and duels in which wounds are represented by immense quantities
of patently fake blood.   It offers itself up to harsh criticism with an
abandon that is almost perverse.  I loved it.
        EL TOPO ignores all traditional approaches to narrative and
characterization and thematic development.  One can still judge it by those
standards, of course, but why bother?  They are meaningless within its
parameters.  Instead, the movie indulges all the tasteless or risky or
extreme impulses which other filmmakers tiptoe around, perhaps in fear of
what might be set loose.  It starts as a Western of sorts, ends as an
apocalyptic spiritual drama, and never bothers to explain itself in the
interim.  It is to be experienced, not understood.
        In the opening sequence, a gunslinger in black--El Topo, played by
writer/director Alejandro Jodorowsky--rides out of the desert and
dismounts.  Seated behind him is a naked seven-year-old boy; he too
dismounts, and hunkers down in the sand.  The gunslinger hands the boy a
teddy bear and a picture of his mother.  He tells the boy that he is a man
now, and so must bury his first toy and the picture of his mother.  The boy
does so.  They ride off, and the film is already pregnant with potential
Oedipal conflicts (Freud would have a field day with this movie).
        El Topo and the boy arrive in a village where the people have been
slaughtered.   They learn that some bandits led by The Colonel are
responsible for the bloodbath.  They locate them in a monastery, and slay
them.  El Topo then leaves the boy in the care of the monks and rides off
into the desert with The Colonel's kept woman.  She asks El Topo to prove
his love to her by duelling four mysterious Masters.  He agrees to do so.
None of these events are linked by recognisable logic.  With either a
sinking heart or a sense of liberation--depending on your taste--you
abandon all hope of making sense of what is going on.
        Events become stranger, until the action seems to exist as an
excuse for a succession of grotesque and memorable images.  Some of these
images are merely parodic: gunfights which end in characters dying
protracted deaths after being shot by an inordinate number of bullets.
Some are absurd and blatant Freudianisms: a woman drinking a jet of water
spurting from a phallic rock in the middle of a desert.  Some are
outrageous and inspired: in a church in a strange town, members of the
congregation prove their faith by taking a gun loaded with a single bullet
from the minister and playing Russian roulette--those who have no faith
die.  And some are small moments of off-the-cuff weirdness: a man with no
arms braids another man's hair with his toes.
        There is much more.  It is simple enough to describe EL TOPO as a
catalogue of freakish, disconnected images, because that is how it unfolds.
On a narrative and thematic level, it never seems to add up, nor does that
seem to be the intention.  The overall effect is, however, wildly
subversive.  Jodorowsky explodes conventions at every turn, upsetting
preconceived notions of gender and character.  Women kiss women.  Men kiss
men.  Men dress up as women.  Men speak with the voices of women, and vice
versa.  The protagonist dies, and is reborn, his black hair now white, and
he becomes a benign pilgrim instead of a murderous gunslinger.  All is in
flux.
        The gunslinger's rebirth divides the movie in two.  The second half
is better; it seems more purposeful.  El Topo comes to life in a cavern,
inhabited by crippled, misshapen, and otherwise deformed people.  They are
trapped, wishing to escape to a nearby town.  El Topo shaves his head, dons
a monkish robe, leaves the cavern with his midget attendant, and goes to
the town.  It is inhabited by people dressed in incongruous Victorian
clothing.  They act out strange parodies of recognisable social
situations--a church service, a boxing match, a brothel--as if their
behaviour is twisted out of true by the force of the primal urges they are
striving to contain.
        El Topo's actions lead to an apocalyptic finale: a confrontation
between the "civilized" folk of the town and those who have emerged, like
insects, from their hole in the mountain, the very embodiment of the
marginalized and repressed of society.  This is the return of the
unconscious, with a vengeance.  Jodorowsky's sympathies are clearly with
the outcasts.  His film stands in relation to mainstream cinema as the
pariahs do to the townfolk.  It reveals what the majority prefers to keep
concealed.  It embraces the physical in all its manifestations, human and
animal, beautiful and grotesque.  It is saturated with acts of violence,
blood, sex, bodies of all kinds.
        It is unlikely that anyone will ever call EL TOPO a perfect movie.
In some sense, it is not even a good movie.  But it is unique.  And while
good movies are plentiful, unique movies are, by definition, one of a kind,
and so to be cherished.   The presence of other directors can be
felt--Fellini, Buńuel, and, in the Western-derived material, Sergio
Leone--but even if those filmmakers had never made a single movie, one
senses that EL TOPO would look much as it does now.  It is the work of a
man possessed by not one vision but by a thousand: a man who wants to cram
them all into two hours, and will use whatever internal logic suits his
purposes to achieve that end.
        The result is a kind of divine madness, celebratory in its excess.
Werner Herzog, one of the other great mad visionaries of the cinema, has
said that the twentieth century is starved for great images.  If we are
starving, then EL TOPO is like the miracle of the loaves and fishes: with a
few primitive ingredients, it can nourish multitudes.
        Review by David Dalgleish (subjective.freeservers.com) -- February
9th, 2000

Title
Review for Ai no corrida (1976)
        Many films have explored sexual obsession--DAMAGE, LAST TANGO IN 
PARIS, M. BUTTERFLY, FATAL ATTRACTION, to name a few--but most of them 
tiptoe around the central issue: sex.  These movies show us the 
consequences of unrestrained passion, but don't actually show us the 
obsession as it's played out in the bedroom.  Nagisa Oshima's infamous 
IN THE REALM OF THE SENSES is a movie which is not afraid to show us 
exactly what its lovers do when they're together.  It shows us in 
explicit detail, and it shows us again, and again, and again.
        I walked into the theatre knowing only that the movie, when first 
released, was considered scandalous for its sexual content.  I 
expected something like LAST TANGO IN PARIS, considered offensive in 
its time but no longer especially provocative.  About 15 minutes after 
the opening credits, as I watched an extreme close-up of semen 
dripping from a woman's lips, I realized that I had been--to put it 
mildly--mistaken.  IN THE REALM OF THE SENSES challenges the 
distinction between art and pornography.  It is relentlessly graphic 
and taboo-shattering.  A man tastes his lover's menstrual blood; he 
puts an egg in her vagina and asks her to lay it like a hen; she asks 
him to urinate into her as they have intercourse.  And there's much 
more.  The gruesome finale manages to top even THE COOK, THE THIEF, 
HIS WIFE & HER LOVER, while the sexual antics of the two principals 
makes 9 1/2 WEEKS seem about as shocking as adolescents playing 'Show 
me yours and I'll show you mine.'
        So we've established that it's daring.  But is it any good?  As a 
story, IN THE REALM OF THE SENSES is rather dull.  The lovers are 
Kichi and Saba (Tatsuya Fuji, Eiko Matsuda); he meets her when she 
comes to work in his household, and soon they are involved in a 
tempestuous affair.  The plot's trajectory is no different from 
countless other tales of compulsive desire: what begins as 
straightforward passion becomes twisted into something more sinister, 
as the lovers become consumed with one another.  Kichi and Saba 
copulate like bonobo chimps in heat, incessantly, relentlessly, and 
mundane sex acts soon become tiresome for them.  They begin to move 
beyond pleasure into the realm of pain, experimenting with a little 
S&M, a little bondage, and some heavy-duty strangulation.  Saba 
becomes possessive, to the point of referring to Kichi's penis as 
"him," and threatening to cut "him" off if Kichi does not stop 
sleeping with his wife.  The end result is predictably disastrous, and 
offers no insights which other, better films have not already offered.
        Fortunately, Oshima finds room for humour as the tale unfolds.  
Because the lovers are continually involved in one sex act or another, 
the servants basically go about their business, unheeding, while the 
happy couple go about their pleasure.  Their lovemaking has become 
such a matter-of-fact occurrence that the servants even converse with 
their master, Kichi, while he is in the throes of ecstasy.  These 
moments provide some welcome comic relief, momentary pauses in the 
film's single-minded examination of Kichi and Saba's all-consuming 
lust.
        We're all fascinated by sex, but mostly as it pertains to us; when 
it's only happening to other people, it can become real boring, real 
fast.  This is the problem with IN THE REALM OF THE SENSES: it becomes 
monotonous.  There is too much sex, and not enough theme, character, 
and story.  The film is beautifully photographed by Hideo Itoh in 
warm, golden tones, and the overall production values are solid.  But 
while it may be nicely packaged, the contents are somewhat trivial.
        For those who feel there's a meaningful distinction to be made 
between porn and art, the question to be asked is whether or not this 
is art.  It is.  Oshima is interested in more than mere titillation.  
This is a well-crafted movie that challenges our cultural taboos; it 
seeks to explore sexual issues through unabashed melodrama (based, 
however, on a true incident which shocked the Japanese nation in 
1936).  For me, however, the important question is not whether or not 
it's art, but whether or not it's good art--and, sadly, it is not.

Title
Review for Fukusho suruwa ware ni ari (1979)
A man gets into a truck with two co-workers.  He has done this many 
times before.  They joke casually and drive down the road a way.  The 
man and one of the co-workers get out, and go up a hill, out of sight 
of the truck.  The man then viciously kills his co-worker.  He returns 
to the truck, and later kills the other man, stabbing him repeatedly, 
remorselessly, in an act of unmitigated violence.  There is no obvious 
reason for him to do this.
There are many ways to respond when we hear about something like 
this.  Horror.  Incomprehension.  Sympathy for the victims' families.  
And curiosity.  Not the morbid curiosity which keeps tabloid 
talk-shows on TV, but the curiosity that makes us wonder why anyone 
would do something like this, hoping that if we understood, we might 
be able to come to terms with it.   Understanding might offer some 
measure of peace.
Shohei Imamura's VENGEANCE IS MINE is a lengthy, disturbing exercise 
in understanding.  As one would expect from the iconoclastic Japanese 
director, the serial killer (Ken Ogata, in a magnificent performance) 
is not treated in the expected manner.  This is not a suspense-filled 
yarn, pitting a brilliant detective against a wily villain in a deadly 
game of cat-and-mouse.  Imamura begins his film with the killer, 
Enokizu, already in police custody, aware that he will soon be 
executed for his crimes.  We are told how many people he killed, 
during the 78 days between the first murders and his arrest.  There is 
no suspense.
Instead, this is a character study told in flashbacks.  We meet 
Enokizu's father (Rentaro Mikuni), a devout Catholic who the young 
Enokizu considers a coward, after a key early childhood scene.  We 
meet his wife (Mitsuko Baisho), a young woman he impregnates and 
marries out of a sense of duty, not love.   He becomes a criminal, a 
con artist, and is imprisoned for fraud; his wife divorces him, but 
the father persuades her to remarry him.  He is released, and beats 
his wife for her infidelity.
The killings proceed logically from these past events, although we 
cannot point to a specific moment and say, 'That's what did it--that's 
what made him a murderer.' Later, we will meet his final victims, a 
brothel madam and her mother.  The madam (Mayumi Ogawa) falls in love 
with the killer, posing as a university professor, and remains devoted 
even after she learns what he has done.  He kills her too.  There is a 
sad inevitability to it all.
But because this is an Imamura film, it is not sad and reflective 
about what happens.  Shocking brutality and black humour are par for 
the course.  While there are only two notably violent scenes in 
VENGEANCE IS MINE (the first two murders), they are among the most 
disturbing I have ever seen.  The way Imamura accomplishes this is 
interesting.  He does not embellish the killings with stylistic 
flourishes, nor does he play campy music on the soundtrack ŕ la Lynch 
or Tarantino.  He simply presents these brutal acts plainly, 
objectively, without excess.  The movie does not tell us what to feel; 
it simply shows what happens, putting as little distance as possible 
between audience and screen, leaving us to consider these heinous 
crimes in cold, merciless detail.  It is disquieting, and it is also 
superb directing.
Imamura views Japanese society with the same clinical detachment.  
His entire career is an ongoing critique of his society, and here we 
see a Japan which passively allows a killer to walk in its midst, and 
even accepts him, on some level.  Enokizu's face is on billboard 
notices, on TV, even in movie theatres, after the first two murders, 
yet he walks the streets of Tokyo and no one turns him in.  Some 
people notice his resemblance to the serial killer whose picture is 
being broadcast, but they figure that it either can't be him, or if it 
is him, it's not worth getting involved.  And so three more people die 
because of an apathy, a complacency, a malaise which Imamura sees as 
deep-rooted in Japanese society.
But the focus of the film is the killer, not his society, and by the 
time the end credits roll, we know Enokizu intimately.  He does not 
rant and rave very often; he is not visibly different from anyone 
else; he is intelligent and capable of charm.  But we are not 
surprised that he killed people--we are only surprised that it took 
him so long.
Do we understand his actions any better, finally?  Enokizu has the 
definitive answer to that: when a detective says that he still doesn't 
understand the motive for the last two murders, the killer replies, 
"You never will."  We are in the same position.  We'll never 
understand.  And so Imamura--whose films don't give you a warm, fuzzy 
feeling at the best of times--here presents the one thing worse than a 
world where a man kills people for no apparent reason: a world in 
which there really is no reason for his actions.  It's an 
uncomfortable message, but turn on the evening news tonight, or open 
the newspaper tomorrow morning, and you may find it hard to disagree.

Title
Review for Profundo carmesí (1996)
Starring Daniel Giménez Cacho, Regina Orozco, Marisa Paredes, 
Verónica Merchant
Directed by Arturo Ripstein
Written by Paz Alicia Garciadiego
Cinematography by Guillermo Granillo
American movies are fascinated by the idea of violent lovers on the 
run.  BONNIE AND CLYDE, WILD AT HEART, NATURAL BORN KILLERS: they are 
repelled by their heartless, cruel anti-heroes, but they are also 
seduced by them, because underlying their violence is the romantic 
myth of the outlaw, an American myth if ever there was one.  DEEP 
CRIMSON is a mordant black comedy about a pair of violent lovers on 
the run, but it is a Mexican movie, and apparently Mexicans are less 
inclined to to romanticize their outlaws, because what we get is a 
portrait of homicidal loners rather different from the one we're used 
to--a portrait that is, I suspect, closer to the truth.
The lovers/loners in DEEP CRIMSON are Coral and Nicolas (Regina 
Orozco, Daniel Giménez Cacho).  She's a pathologically lonely single 
mother of two children, somewhat overweight but convinced that she is 
monstrously obese; he's a balding would-be Lothario, convinced that 
he's a freak because of his baldness, which he conceals with a 
hairpiece and a fedora.  She fantasizes about Charles Boyer (the time 
is the 1940s) while she reads Lonely Hearts columns in search of 
eligible men; he romances and then robs lonely women, meeting them via 
ads in Lonely Hearts columns in which he claims to look like Charles 
Boyer.
And so, of course, they meet.  They have an awkward first encounter; 
he leaves; he returns and they make love; he robs her and goes home.  
She, fully aware of his crime, follows him to his home, her children 
in tow, and demands that he let her live with him.  He says he can't 
have her in his home because he cannot afford to keep two children.  
She abandons the children, and--it's that kind of a 
relationship--touched by this act, he acquiesces to her demands: she 
will be his lover, and his partner in crime, helping him to select his 
victims.
They attempt to choose rich widows and then divest them of their 
wealth.  Unfortunately, Coral and Nicolas are not particularly good 
criminals: they manage to kill the widows, because Coral is jealous, 
but they turn out to not be so wealthy after all.  Soon the couple are 
fleeing from one backwater to another, disposing of the evidence as 
best they can after each failed scam.
DEEP CRIMSON has no illusions about Coral and Nicolas.  They are not 
young, beautiful, and coolly amoral.  There is nothing remotely noble 
or heroic about their anti-social stance.  Their fate is not tragic; 
it is pathetic.  The murders they commit are messy and complicated.  
And while American movies of this kind usually find the criminals more 
interesting than their victims (who tend to be rednecks, buffoons, and 
non-descripts), here each victim has a personality.  The final victim 
(Verónica Merchant), in particular, is shown to be a decent, 
hardworking, admirable young woman.  What Coral and Nicolas do to her 
is unforgivable; what they do right after that is even worse.
The film would be relentlessly bleak if it didn't have such a wicked 
sense of humour.  During their initial 'date,' when Nicolas notices a 
picture of Coral's children on the wall, he remarks that she failed to 
mention them in her ad.  Oh, she says, "it's just that they're so 
well-behaved that sometimes I forget they exist."  Indeed.  And in 
what may be the best scene, the murder of the couple's second victim 
(Marisa Paredes), an act of sudden and appalling brutality becomes 
laugh-out-loud funny because of the choice of murder weapon and the 
way in which its staged. 
Arturo Ripstein directs the film with verve, although scenes do tend 
to drag on too long.  The camera lingers on each setting, giving us 
plenty of time to take in every detail; the movie is seduced by its 
own production design.  Granted, the production design is terrific--be 
it a desolate exterior shot of brown, sere grassland or a cluttered 
interior shot of a widow's homely parlour where, inevitably, a 
figurine of the Virgin Mary stares down from the mantelpiece--but the 
pacing could have been faster, if only to direct our attention away 
from the realization that, despite the fresh approach, the story 
itself is nothing new (quite literally, since it's based on a true 
story previously filmed as THE HONEYMOON KILLERS).  There's a fine 
line between inevitability and predictability, and the plot of DEEP 
CRIMSON stays on the right side of that line, but only just.
Happily, aside from its morbid wit, the movie brings a great deal of 
insight to the story.  It understands that the Bonnies and Clydes of 
the world are few and far between, and murder is usually committed by 
desperate, lonely, confused people who probably never thought they 
were capable of killing, but one day they were pushed over the edge by 
factors that remain incomprehensible to them, by some insignificant 
event, and there was no turning back.  And then, if they're like Coral 
and Nicolas, they cling to whomever they can for as long as they can, 
and pray that someone, somewhere, will forgive them, although they 
know it's not bloody likely.

Title
Review for Unagi (1997)
"You talk to the eel because you don't like dealing with people, right?"
Starring Koji Yakusho, Misa Shimizu, Fujio Tokita, Mitsuko Baisho,
Akira Emoto;
Directed by Shohei Imamura;
Written by Imamura, Daisuke Tengan, and Motofumi Tomikawa, from a
novel by Akira Yoshimura;
Cinematography by Shigeru Komatsubara
        A roll call of Shohei Imamura's protagonists reads like a summary
of society's cast-offs.  A prostitute.  A pornographer.  A serial killer.
A pimp.  A radiation poisoning victim.  And, in THE EEL, a man who murders
his wife and, eight years later, tries to start a new life.  Imamura always
empathizes with the people in his movies, although they are not always
sympathetic: while some are victims, others deserve no pity.  Certainly, it
is difficult to feel sympathy for Yamashita, the wife-killer, when the
pre-credits sequence shows us the murder, which is sudden, brutal,
unforgivable, graphic, and not easy to sit through.
        This is what happens: Yamashita (Koji Yakusho of SHALL WE DANCE?
and TAMPOPO) suspects that his wife is cheating on him.  He comes home
early one night from fishing, to find a strange car in his driveway and the
sound of heated lovemaking coming from his bedroom.  He looks in.  We see a
close-up of his face as he watches, impassive, for a moment, and then his
face dissolves into shadow, as he goes to the side of the house, fetches a
sharp trowel, and then enters the bedroom.  He wounds the man in flagrante
delicto, then methodically stabs his wife to death.  The camera does not
turn away; blood spatters the lens.  Yamashita then cycles to the nearest
police station and, in a splendidly deadpan moment, matter-of-factly
confesses to the murder and hands over the murder weapon to the astonished
desk sergeant.  He does not dissemble.  He cannot: there are no excuses.
        We have gone from the everyday to the extreme to the absurd.  Time
for the opening credits.  Most directors would be unable to muster such a
sequence as a finale; for Imamura, it is merely the preamble to a movie
that is never dull and often superb.  Yamashita's action cannot, of course,
be justified, and he knows that.  But, his sentence over, he has a lot of
life remaining to him.  And this is where the movie really begins.
        THE EEL is about how a man rebuilds his life after committing a
crime he cannot rationalize or even explain.  There is a scene in which he
does try to explain--he killed his wife because he loved her too much to
forgive her, or something--but it is not much of an explanation.  He is not
a man capable of murder, but he murdered someone.  Go figure.  As with the
serial killer in Imamura's earlier VENGEANCE IS MINE, his motives are not
to be understood.  But there the similarity ends: the serial killer was
amoral and subtly insane, while Yamashita is soft-spoken, polite,
solicitous.
        He relocates to a small town, under the eye of his parole officer,
who is also a priest, and, having learned the trade of a barber during his
prison term, Yamashita opens a barbershop, and soon establishes a small but
loyal clientele--none of whom know about his past.  The locals see him as
rather eccentric, because he talks to his pet eel, and seems to care more
for it than anyone else.  In fact, Yamashita is rather dull, as killers go.
The same cannot be said for the townsfolk around him, who include a young
man who spends all his time trying to contact UFOs and a man obsessed with
eel fishing.  There is also a vivacious young woman, Keiko (Misa Shimizu),
who comes to work in Yamashita's shop--against his wishes--after he finds
her comatose in a field, an empty bubble-pack of pills by her outflung
hand, and has her rushed to hospital, saving her life.
        The would-be suicide has, like Yamashita, a troubled past, a past
which is revealed, piecemeal, in flashbacks.  Their cool professional
relationship inevitably warms, to become a guarded rapport, and then heats
up, becoming something more, although Yamashita holds something back: he
remains emotionally detached from the world, partly as self-imposed
punishment for what he did, partly from fear that he might do it again.
Having structured the film with the murder first, Imamura makes it
difficult to care for this man, but we do come to empathize with him:
everything about him elicits our understanding, except for that
inexplicable crime.
        He can no more forget it than we can.  The eel fisher takes him out
to teach him how to spear eels, but when he tries to stab one, he cannot:
thrusting the spear recalls the movement of his hand when he stabbed his
wife.  Images of an eel writhing on the end of a spear flash on the screen,
pulsing with guilt and sexual symbolism.  The symbolic associations of the
eel, developed mostly in night-time conversations with the eel fisher, are
actually one of the film's shortcomings, as Imamura overworks the metaphor,
tending to explain in the dialogue what is already obvious from the
context.
        The working out of the love relationship is also rather flawed,
sometimes predictable, sometimes sentimental, although the little things
are constantly refreshing, like the character of Keiko's mother, an
overbearing and mentally unbalanced flamenco dancer.  But sentimentality,
from this most unsentimental of directors, is perhaps not unwelcome.
Imamura tends to see human relationships as primarily pragmatic, as matters
of convenience.  He regards the finer emotions with skepticism--perhaps too
much skepticism.  In THE EEL (and his previous film, BLACK RAIN) there is a
touch of tenderness, new to his oeuvre, which makes his work seem broader,
more complex, and therefore more complete.
        Whatever the reason, Imamura's vision finds perhaps its
quintessential expression in the climactic sequence of THE EEL, when all
the major players in the film are brought together in the barbershop, as
Keiko's past catches up with her.  A melee erupts.  It is a madcap
orchestration of slapstick and sudden violence, funny and grotesque, and in
the midst of the chaos are a few people trying to do the right thing.
Imamura brings sense to the anarchy, and out of human failing creates hope.
It is the work of a master at the height of his craft, and it bustles with
life.  It contains, perhaps, a summary of all Imamura has to tell us, and
he has much to tell.

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
"It sure isn't heaven, and it's too cold to be hell."
Starring David Strathairn, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Vanessa
Martinez, Casey Siemazko, Kris Kristofferson;
Written & Directed by John Sayles;
Cinematography by Haskell Wexler
When John Sayles's career is over, his oeuvre will almost certainly
stand as the most complex, committed, complete attempt by an American
director to portray America in all its variety--not as a mythic land of
freedom and opportunity, but as a place populated largely by ordinary
people struggling to find the right person, to pay the bills, to balance
morality and necessity, to cope with the curveballs life keeps delivering.
Although not all his work is set in the U.S., Sayles is a staunchly
American director, and while other directors tend to focus on specific
elements in American society--Scorcese on the world of the mob, Spike Lee
on black America, Woody Allen on Manhattan intellectuals--Sayles ranges
from the Mexican border to New Jersey turnpikes to the coast of Alaska,
always taking the time to contemplate the small details that comprise the
substance of our lives.
        His films are therefore a remarkable cross-section of the melting
pot--a teenage girl graduating from high school, striking miners in West
Virginia, the middle-aged wife of an academic discovering she is a lesbian,
Mexican immigrants building new lives in a small Texas border town, and
more, and more.  LIMBO brings us to Port Henry, Alaska, painting a few more
tiles in the American mosaic.  The principal players, all superbly
portrayed, are Joe (David Strathairn), a former fisherman and pulp mill
worker who now works as a handyman; Donna (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio), an
aging harried lounge singer spending a year in Port Henry; and Donna's
daughter Noelle (Vanessa Martinez), a precocious troubled teenager who
resents her mother's string of deadbeat boyfriends and the subsequent lack
of attention she receives.
        Joe and Donna meet in an early scene, circumstances throw them
together, and they embark on a cagy relationship.  There is no love at
first sight, no sense of fate bringing two people together--their
relationship develops as relationships often do (though not in the movies),
incrementally, hesitantly, uncertainly.  Donna sings in a local bar, and
Joe comes to hear her; one night between performances she and Joe have a
straightforward conversation about who they are and where they come from,
the type of conversation two mature people hurt by previous mistakes might
have.  It is a wonderful scene because it seems so uncontrived, so
unassuming.  Given the spate of recent American movies which are either
Tarantino wannabes or slavish purveyors of Hollywood scriptwriting
formulas, it seems extraordinary for two people in a film to have an
ordinary exchange, charged with subtle emotion, fraught with human
vulnerability.
        The film offers many similar pleasures, such as the vivid secondary
characters who bring the community to life: the two women who run a
restaurant and employ both Joe and Noelle, the cannery worker whose boat
they now own, the pilot whose brother died in a boating accident which Joe
survived (Kris Kristofferson), Joe's brother Bobby who thinly disguises his
failures with bluster and false cheer (Casey Siemazko).  Because Sayles
takes the time to linger on the socio-economic realities of the town and
the specifics of place (the dialogue, for instance, is rich in atmospheric
details like the mechanics of fishing and sailing), the characters'
troubles and burdens take on poignancy and authenticity.  It is easy to
care, because if Joe and Donna and Noelle do not exist, people very like
them do exist, in Port Henry or elsewhere.  Despite some concessions to
conventional plotting, the first hour of the movie is a slow, expansive,
absorbing look at life in Port Henry, consciously presented as a
non-simplistic response to the tour-package vision of Alaska as the last
great American frontier, of nature as theme park.
        LIMBO is remarkable because of the vivid clarity with which it sees
its characters and gives them life, engaging our interest--there are two
sequences which I found to be as tense as anything I have seen in a theatre
in recent months, because I was so involved in the inner lives of these
people.  But LIMBO is also difficult and problematic, because it defies our
narrative expectations.  Midway through, the movie shifts gears to become a
harrowing account of flight and survival in the wild, when Joe, Donna, and
Noelle are stranded on an uninhabited island and forced to shelter in an
old house, stripping them of their familiar routines, bringing them to an
impasse where they must confront the stasis of their lives while waiting
for help which may never come.  Both halves of the movie are excellent on
their own, but as a whole it seems disjointed--although this seems to be
intentional.
        And then it ends.  Much has been made, already, about the
provocative ending, which some reviewers seem to dislike because it
violates an unwritten compact between auteur and audience; my problem is
not with the technique as such, but that it makes much of the expository
material in the slow first half seem, in retrospect, pointless.  Still, I
admire Sayles for being brave and foolhardy enough to stick to his guns.
LIMBO is intent on showing us life as it is really lived, not as it is
imagined in fiction.  In fiction, we usually know how the story will end,
or we at least know that it will end.  In real life, you never know what
will happen next, and that at least is also true of LIMBO.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
The Coen brothers make two kinds of movies.  The first kind are 
idiosyncratic takes on established Hollywood genres: BLOOD SIMPLE, 
MILLER'S CROSSING, THE HUDSUCKER PROXY.  The second kind are just 
plain idiosyncratic: dark comedies which can only be described as 
Coen-esque, and represent their best work (RAISING ARIZONA, BARTON 
FINK, FARGO).  Their latest effort, THE BIG LEBOWSKI, belongs in the 
latter category, in that it is a non-generic dark comedy (unless 
KINGPIN-meets-EXCESS BAGGAGE is a genre)--but it is not one of their 
better efforts.
Jeff Bridges stars as Jeff Lebowski, aka The Dude, Duder, or, if 
you're not into the brevity thing, El Duderino.  He's a pretty simple 
L.A. guy with a pretty simple life: he's unemployed, he smokes pot, 
and League Bowling is his first priority.  He bowls with opinionated, 
borderline-psychotic Vietnam vet Walter (John Goodman) and dimwitted 
Donny (Steve Buscemi).  But the Dude's simple life is complicated when 
two men burst into his apartment, dunk his head in the toilet, ask him 
to cough up a lot of money which he doesn't have, then urinate on his 
rug when he can't help them.  It turns out that these men were looking 
for another Jeffrey Lebowski (David Huddleston), this one a 
millionaire, and when The Dude goes to the other Lebowski's mansion to 
get his rug replaced, he is soon embroiled in a complex plot involving 
a kidnapping, a botched ransom exchange, a severed toe, a nymphomaniac 
porn starlet (Tara Reid), some neo-Nazis, a flaky New Age feminist 
(Julianne Moore), and malicious law enforcement officials.
THE BIG LEBOWSKI is certainly idiosyncratic, but there is a sense of 
strain about it.  It's cluttered with contrived attempts to be 
original and offbeat: there's a man in an iron lung, a philosophizing 
character called The Stranger (Sam Elliot), an elaborate 
dream-sequence production number.  By trying so hard, it comes across 
as forced; the Coens' vision is naturally skewed, and by pushing it 
they needlessly call attention to that fact.
There is a lot wrong with the movie, but since it's a comedy, the 
fundamental issue is this: is it funny?  The humour is irreverent in 
the extreme: death, pornography, child abuse, and disabled people are 
treated purely as sources of humour.  Some people in our PC 90s will 
doubtless object to this material on principle; my feeling is that if 
it's funny, it doesn't matter how offensive it is--when something's 
not funny, that's when I start to feel offended.  Fortunately, THE BIG 
LEBOWSKI is very funny, and that is its saving grace.  Bridges wins a 
lot of laughs as the hapless, laidback everyman thrown into an 
absurdist nightmare and unable to extricate himself; Goodman is 
wonderful as his headstrong best friend whose well-intentioned 
interference just makes matters worse and worse.
The other characters, however, exist only because they're funny, not 
because the script is particularly interested in them (most notably 
Julianne Moore's Maude), and the plot is a grab-bag of ideas, many of 
them inspired, but thrown together in a slapdash way.  The movie lacks 
any sense of coherence, and while all the actors are great, several 
are wasted in minor roles: John Turturro has fun with a manically 
over-the-top character, stealing his scenes, but David Thewlis and Jon 
Polito have only walk-on parts, mildly amusing but unnecessary, while 
Buscemi is woefully underused.  The dialogue is refreshing because it 
allows the characters to talk in a roundabout, unhurried, verbose way, 
but frustrating because it takes them an awful long time to get to the 
point.
The Coen brothers have taken pride, through the years, in doing 
things their own distinctive way--they confound expectations--but here 
that strategy has backfired.  For many people (myself included) FARGO 
signalled the Coens' arrival as filmmakers: they had fulfilled their 
potential, and their next movie was expected to be great.  But it 
seems that they have deliberately set out to not make a great movie in 
THE BIG LEBOWSKI, confounding the critics once again.  It is an 
extravagant entertainment, but shallow and ultimately pointless.  
Considered as a self-contained work, it is good; in the context of the 
Coens' career and their considerable talent, it is a disappointment.

Title
Review for Song jia huang chao (1997)
"Love is a kind of revolution, and revolution is a kind of love."
        Who were the Soong sisters?  I can tell you quite a lot about them 
after watching Mabel Cheung's biopic.  They were born around the turn 
of the century, in China, the daughters of Charlie Soong, a friend and 
ally of Dr. Sun Yat-Sen when he founded the Republic of China.  
Ai-Ling, the eldest, married the wealthiest man in China.  Ching-Ling 
married Sun Yat-Sen and continued his legacy after his death.  
May-Ling, the youngest, married Kai-Shek Chiang, who became the leader 
of the Nationalist Party.  They're all dead now.
        Their fortunes were inextricably bound up in the colossal political 
and military struggles that have beset China throughout this century.  
I do not particularly believe in the idea of fate, but this film gave 
me pause, because it shows three women who seemed destined to "live in 
interesting times," as the proverb would have it, from the moment of 
their birth onward.  Their story begged to be made into an epic, and 
an epic is what THE SOONG SISTERS is, in the best sense of the word.  
It's got it all: majestic cinematography, multiple stories played out 
against a vast backdrop, breathless narrative momentum, and great 
stars.  
        The stars include two of Hong Kong's leading women: Maggie Cheung 
(IRMA VEP, CHINESE BOX) plays Ching-Ling and Ai-Ling is played by 
Michelle Khan (aka Michelle Yeoh, of SUPERCOP and TOMORROW NEVER 
DIES).  THE PILLOW BOOK's Vivian Wu is May-Ling.  None of the 
performances are outstanding, but each actress brings the necessary 
charisma and presence to the part.  They look the way famous women 
should look in a big-budget, glossy epic.
        But who were these famous women, really?  What were they like, in 
their everyday lives?  That I can't tell you, because THE SOONG 
SISTERS isn't interested in that.  It is interested in these women as 
vital figures in China's tempestuous 20th century upheavals, and as 
representatives of the extraordinary, frightening, operatic emotions 
that can occur in any country at war with itself. The film uses 
Ai-Ling, Ching-Ling, and May-Ling as focal points to show us over five 
decades of Chinese history, from the beginning of this century till 
after the "liberation" by the People's Army, and to give us some sense 
of what it might have been like to live through such times.
        If any of this sounds like FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE to you, well, it 
does to me too.  The structure and intentions of both films are 
remarkably similar; THE SOONG SISTERS plays, to some extent, like a 
Hong Kong remake of Chen Kaige's masterpiece.  Both movies are 
visually superb, both are emotionally-charged melodramas, both use a 
triad of conflicting characters as the central focus of hugely 
ambitious narratives, and both films ran into trouble with the Chinese 
censors (18 minutes were cut from SISTERS for this reason).
        But there are telling differences.  In FAREWELL, history is the 
backdrop to a personal story: namely, the loyalties and conflicts that 
divide the two opera singers and the prostitute who marries one of 
them.  In SISTERS, history is both the backdrop and the personal 
story, because the three sisters are all involved in the making of 
history.  This difference, ultimately, is what makes SISTERS the 
lesser of the two movies.  The personal, intimate details of their 
lives are sacrificed in favour of extravagant gestures; the sisters 
seem to interact only at moments of intense emotion: in love and in 
war, during death-bed scenes, angry confrontations, tearful farewells.  
This is immensely pleasing on the level of story and spectacle, but in 
the end I would have preferred less excess and more subtlety.
Ai-Ling is a pragmatist, Ching-Ling a pro-Communist idealist, and 
May-Ling an important player in the Nationalist Party, and these three 
traits essentially define each character: they become types, not 
individuals.  I can't say I blame the filmmakers for treating the 
sisters in this light, because their story is so astounding, so 
larger-than-life, that these women, for all that they are modern, 
historical figures, take on the potency of myth.  Besides, while each 
sister may be one-dimensional, when you put them together you have 
three dimensions--which is one more than you need to make a movie.
        Some Chinese reviewers feel that the movie sacrifices the 
complexities of Chinese history in favour of reductive simplicities.  
I imagine they are right; I'm not really qualified to comment, since 
all I know of Chinese history is probably reductive simplicities.  But 
to accuse THE SOONG SISTERS of trivializing Chinese history by giving 
it the Hollywood treatment ignores a significant distinction: in 
Hollywood movies, fate is usually an ally of the hero, while in most 
Chinese movies (certainly in this one) fate is the enemy, implacable 
and omnipotent.  The sisters may be shown as one-dimensional 
romanticized types, but they're still ultimately treated no 
differently from many Chinese people, famous and obscure, in this 
century--victims of an unkind destiny they could neither choose nor 
avoid.

Title
Review for Yeogo Goedam (1998)
"Empty classrooms give me the creeps."
        WHISPERING CORRIDORS is a South Korean horror movie which avoids
the blatant tactics of most contemporary horror movies, but replaces them
with mere competence.  There are well-crafted sequences featuring darkened
rooms, billowing white drapes, long pregnant silences, elusive restless
spirits, abnormal phenomena, and sudden bursts of bloody violence.  But it
is no more than craftmanship.  It doesn't generate the desired frisson of
dread, doesn't scare the hell of us, and so it doesn't succeed.
        The action takes place entirely within the walls of an all-girls
Korean high school, which, unlike the high schools I attended, seems eerily
deserted even during school hours.  One morning, two students discover the
body of a middle-aged teacher unaffectionately known as Old Fox.  She seems
to have committed suicide by hanging, but we know better: the opening
sequence shows her  murder at the hands of a ghost.
        As events progress, we piece together the history of the ghost: she
is the spirit of Jin-Ju, a girl who attended the school a decade ago and
has not yet departed.  Jin-Ju was stifled in her creativity and passions,
and she committed suicide.  The room where she took her own life is now
off-limits.  Aspects of Jin-Ju's experiences seem to be reflected in the
lives of several students in a senior class, each troubled in her own way,
including a strange loner, an aspiring artist, her melancholy friend, and
the ace student of the class.  One of the teachers, former student
Eun-Young, was Jin-Ju's best friend, and tries to resolve the haunting
before more deaths occur.
        The villain of the piece, however, is not Jin-Ju but Mr. Oh--or Mad
Dog, as his students call him.  He is a hyperbolic authoritarian who,
having apparently missed his calling in life as a drill sergeant, hurls
invective at the girls, telling them that they must consider their
classmates as enemies if they are to achieve good grades.  Not content with
verbal abuse, he strikes girls who break the rules.  He makes advances on
others, toying intimately with their hair.
         Mad Dog, despite being caricatured as a swaggering overgrown
schoolyard bully, is a suitable focus for the film's anger, which is
directed toward the education system, of which both Jin-Ju and the
present-day students are victims.  After a strikingly savage incident
involving one of the girls--who, like Jin-Ju, has artistic
inclinations--Mad Dog has become a genuinely hateful figure.  Then, in a
prime example of the movie's maladroit handling of narrative development,
he becomes the ghost's next victim, effectively eliminating the antagonist
halfway through.  The movie founders from then on, trying to mount a climax
which will make us both afraid of Jin-Ju's ghost and sympathetic to her
adolescent need for friendship and acceptance.
        WHISPERING CORRIDORS is overtly concerned with the stifling effect
that the school's rules have on the girls, who must curb their tendencies
to act in anything other than a respectable manner.  Outside the class,
they swear and smoke and pierce their noses; they paint disturbing pictures
and listen to rock music.  Within the classroom, they sit in ordered rows,
demure and deferential in their staid school uniforms.  The ghost story is
an apt vehicle for the notion that the repressive atmosphere of the
classroom, and perhaps of South Korean society at large, results in
dangerous outbursts of uncontained desires, as embodied by Jin-Ju's acts of
violence, which are, ultimately, the acts of a confused and insecure young
woman.
        Less obviously, and perhaps unintentionally, the movie also
explores the girls' developing sexuality: it is inevitable that a movie
featuring adolescent girls and repeated shots of dripping blood is, on some
level, a dramatization of menarche and female sexual self-knowledge.  There
is also the barest hint of a suggestion that the "friendship" that Jin-Ju
seeks is not Platonic, but the movie sidesteps the issue--perhaps enforcing
the very codes of repression it criticizes.
        If the subtexts of the movie are far more intriguing than the
ostensible story, that's because it is transparent and ineffectual as
horror.  One problem is the heavy-handed use of frequent close-ups of
trembling-lipped, teary-eyed women as a substitute for emotional subtlety.
Another problem is that it tries to be an ensemble drama, rather than
providing us with a central viewpoint character.  Consequently, the ghost
of Jin-Ju is not seen as a dominant force in one person's life, but rather
remains a peripheral presence impacting on several lives.  We learn about
her in flashbacks and inferences, and, kept at a distance, it is difficult
to either fear her or empathize with her.  She suffers the same problem in
the movie as she did in life: she is marginalized when she should be the
centre of attention.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Earth (1998)
        EARTH is a harsh, unconsoling drama about the time when India
gained independence from Britain and the ensuing turmoil that engulfed the
subcontinent.  People who supposedly loved the same land and the same God
found themselves in bitter conflict, as the country divided into factions
fighting in the streets: Indian and Pakistani; Muslim, Hindu, Sikh, Parsee.
        The story takes place in Lahore, which was Indian before Partition,
and Pakistani afterward, regardless of what its citizens might call
themselves.  The action is seen through the eyes of Lenny (Maaia Sethna), a
young Parsee girl, but it is really about her nanny, Shanta.  Shanta has a
small circle of male admirers.  Two of the men are suitors: Hasan (Rahul
Khanna), a Hindu, and Dil Navaz (Aamir Khan), a Muslim.  The others--Sikh,
Hindu, Muslim--are older; some are married; but all appreciate Shanta, who
is played by the stirringly beautiful Nandita Das.  (She also starred in
Deepa Mehta's previous film, FIRE, the first part of a thematic trilogy
which will conclude with WATER.)
        In an early scene, the men are sitting in a park talking with
Shanta and Lenny; political tension in the country is growing as the day of
independence nears.  One of the men remarks, jokingly, that their little
group is probably one of the last places in the city where the different
religions can still get along.  He is wrong: the men make barbed little
comments to each other, spoken like jokes, but with an undercurrent of
fanaticism.  The tenor of these exchanges grows darker and more bitter as
the movie progresses.  It is easy to perceive, in these squabbles, the
trajectory which ends in mass violence and slaughter.
        The group around Shanta represents, in a sense, a united India, and
Shanta herself the ideal motherland--one which all love, which inspires
Hindu, Muslim, and Sikh to live peacably together.  But the circle around
Shanta is sundered, as is the State.  A Sikh is persecuted, hides, then
flees.  Another man is murdered.  The group of friends will not meet again.
The movie is rife with images of breakage and destruction: a plate
shattered on the floor, a stuffed toy torn apart by an upset child, and,
most brutally, when the tension escalates into violence, a man is held
down, tied between two cars, and ripped in half by the opposing movement of
the vehicles.  It is a visceral and effective metaphor for a country which
is being destroyed just as painfully.
        The crux of EARTH's plot is the transformation undergone by Dil
Navaz.  His sisters are killed in brutal fashion, by Hindus, because they
are Muslim.  Dil Navaz seeks solace from Shanta, and asks in desperation
that she marry him.  But she loves Hasan, and tenderly refuses Dil Navaz's
offer.  The combination of familial anguish and romantic rejection twists
inside him, and it is easy to see how he is seduced by the growing mob
mentality: the Muslim cause gives him a motive to vent his anger and hate.
Despite the things he later does, it is to the credit of EARTH that it does
not simply denounce Dil Navaz and those like him, but shows how
circumstances can make decent enough men do monstrous things.
        The conclusion--the consequence of Dil Navaz's transformation--is
rather abrupt.  The story EARTH tells does not end.  It just stops.   It is
an appropriate finish: giving us closure would have imparted, at least on
an aesthetic level, a sense of resolution, of satisfaction.  But there was
no resolution for India and Pakistan--they have been at war, on a small or
large scale, for decades.  Since the personal dramas in EARTH mirror the
political struggles of a nation, it is only right that those dramas should
have no terminus.  There is no healing to be had, no closure, on any level
(despite the needless, tacked-on ending, with voice-over narration from
Lenny as an adult, framing the story).
        EARTH is, in some ways, an unexceptional movie.  It does not
reinvent the wheel, following instead the standard pattern of historical
dramas.  But Deepa Mehta's directon is assured, and the issues she
addresses run deep.  EARTH does for India what movies like Zhang Yimou's TO
LIVE and Tian Zhuangzhuang's THE BLUE KITE did for China: they show us the
agonies endured by unremarkable people who had the bad luck to be caught up
and smashed in the crucible of history.  Such films strike me as inherently
valuable, even when flawed.  They may be biased or inaccurate, but they
bear the weight of human hardship, and this confers on them a nobility and
gravity which other, more inventive films, often lack.
        It is notable that all three movies were banned in their native
countries: the events shown may have happened decades ago, but they still
touch a nerve.  The issues tackled in EARTH have a particular urgency in
light of the nuclear test bombings that took place last year.  In the near
future, India and Pakistan may launch nuclear missiles at each other.  At
the time of the tests I had some understanding of the reasons why this
might happen; after seeing EARTH, I have a much, much better understanding.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Commedia (1999)
"He's a fake pretending to be a man who writes about fakes."
Original Title: Commedia;
Starring Jonathan Pryce, Susan Lynch, Claudia Gerini, Enrico Silvestrin;
Directed by Claudia Florio;
Written by David Ambrose;
Cinematography by Luciano Tovoli
        DECEIT does many things wrong, but one of its most glaring missteps
is to invite comparison to none other than "Othello."  Michela, one of the
main characters, is an actress.  In the first scene, she is auditioning for
the part of Desdemona.  At the same time, a "real life" drama involving
treachery, passion, and recrimination is beginning.  In the closing scenes,
we are shown moments from the production of "Othello" starring Michela,
counterpointed with the denouement of the movie's actual story.  The
transparent implication is that we are witnessing events whose emotional
intensity bears comparison to a work widely regarded as one of the greatest
tragedies in the English language.  To make such a comparison would be a
mistake for a good movie; for DECEIT, contrived and self-referential and
mediocre, it is suicidal.
        The premise is not uninspired.  A man (Jonathan Pryce) sees Michela
(Claudia Gerini) at her audition and leaves her an envelope containing
500,000 lira, some scripted dialogue, a postcard, and an invitiation.  He
asks her to come alone to a tea shop, drop the postcard on the floor, order
tea and lemon cake, and wait.  He will pick up the postcard and join her,
and then she should play out the scene according to the dialogue he has
provided.  Michela shows up, but brings her room-mate Corinna (Susan Lynch)
with her, because she is understandably worried that the proposal is driven
by sinister motives.  The man does not join her.  He sends her another
note, suggesting that she should really come alone next time.  Michela
decides not to bother.
        Corinna, intrigued, takes the script and shows up in Michela's
place.  The man, older, handsome, well-groomed, is nonplussed when he sees
her, but proceeds with the scene nevertheless.  Corinna is a bad actor,
forgetting some of the lines; even so, the man agrees to pay her another
500,000 lira for another rendezvouz, mailing her a new scene.
        Things go on like this for a while.  Corinna learns that the man's
name is Mark Walker and he is an art historian with an interest in fakes,
and she is playing the role of a woman named Fiemetta.  She doesn't learn
more, because Mark insists on sticking to the script: no questions, he
says.  Corinna plays along against her better judgement, seduced by the
enigma.  Her boyfriend (Enrico Silvestrin) understandably does not believe
her when she insists that her participation has nothing to do with sexual
attraction.  She is indeed attracted to Mark--but is she attracted to him
or to the role he's playing?  He seems to reciprocate--but is he attracted
to her or the persona he has scripted for her?
        DECEIT, like too many other self-important works, blurs the
boundary between reality and fiction, and assumes that the mere fact that
it does so is significant.  Corinna is a photographer for a food magazine
who takes pictures of fake food (because "real food doesn't look real
enough").  Mark is an art historian who writes about fake artworks.
Michela is an actress: her job is a form of illusion.  There are more such
references to the overlapping realms of the authentic and the counterfeit,
doubtless intended to amplify the movie's central themes.  Instead, they
remind us of how overdetermined it all is, while failing to explore the
issues it raises in a meaningful fashion.
        There is nothing wrong with films which are artificial, symbolic,
hermetic--as long as they don't pretend to be otherwise.  DECEIT, however,
insists on being accepted as mimesis.  The acting and mise-en-scene are
naturalistic.  Despite the ludicrous plot contortions, we are intended to
accept these people's lives as believable, while the roles they sometimes
inhabit are scripted--but there is no distinction, it all seems equally
contrived.  It is also predictable: I guessed Mark's true identity and
intentions about halfway through, and I'm usually hopeless at predicting
plot twists.
        One of the more tedious aspects of DECEIT is the oh-so-elegant air
of cultured respectability it cultivates at all times.  The characters are
intellectuals and artists--photographers, librarians, art historians,
actresses, editors--as if somehow tragedy doesn't mean anything if it
doesn't happen to the intelligentsia.  The exception is Corinna's
boyfriend, who happens to be the most poorly developed of the four main
characters.  The setting is old Rome, in chic apartments and antiquated
cobbled streets.  Each scene is chosen with an eye for sophisticated
refinement: posh restaurants, art exhibitions, theatres.  (No
lumpenproletariat allowed, thank you very much.)  An unspoken elitism
underlies it all, further distancing the audience from the drama.
        The actors do what they can.  The movie gains a dignity it doesn't
deserve from the presence of Jonathan Pryce, who provides a subtle and
humane interpretation of Mark's tortured motivations, but even Pryce cannot
make us care.  The movie remains at arm's length: Florio seems to have
spent too much time admiring her conceit and not enough time bringing it to
life.  Tragedy is about people, while DECEIT is about discourse.  Imagine
if Desdemona had only one scene in "Othello" and three lines of dialogue,
while the rest of the play was spent talking about her, and you'll have
some idea of what's wrong with this movie.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Crna macka, beli macor (1998)
Starring Bajram Severdzan, Florijan Ajdini, Srdan Todorovic, Branka Katic;
Directed by Emir Kusturica;
Written by Kusturica and Gordan Mihic;
Cinematography by Thierry Arbogast
        BLACK CAT, WHITE CAT is a movie in which no effort has been spared,
a movie which makes other films seem as if they are merely going through
the motions.  It is a riotous, exuberant, irrepressible comedy from Emir
Kusturica, who seems to treat every film as if it might be his last, and
had better put everything he's got into it.  His previous work,
UNDERGROUND, had the same energy and invention, but was concerned with the
matter of Yugoslavia, and was therefore a tragedy.  The joy of BLACK CAT,
WHITE CAT is untrammelled by the hardships of geopolitical conflicts.  It
exists merely for the pleasure of being, and that is more than enough.
        The gleefully convoluted plot, which I'm not sure I understood
entirely, goes something like this: Matko (Bajram Severdzan), a man of
gypsy descent living with his son Zare (Florijan Ajdini) by the side of the
Danube, has a get-rich-quick scheme which depends on purchasing a train
full of oil-drums and bringing it across the border to sell for major
profit.  To obtain the train, he calls in favours from rich obnoxious
gangster Dadan (Srdan Todorovic) and his father's old friend Grga (Sabri
Sulejmani).  But Dadan fleeces Matko and demands his money back.  Matko
can't repay him because he invested everything he had in the train, but,
according to his dead father's wishes, Dadan also needs to marry off his
sister (Salija Ibraimova)--who is called Afrodita but is variously
described as a dwarf or gnome--and says that he will forget the debt if
Zare marries Afrodita.  Matko reluctantly agrees, even though his son is
madly in love with the decidedly ungnomish Ida (Branka Katic).  Meanwhile,
Grga is urging his own grandson to get married, but the grandson is
determined that he will only marry the woman of his heart's desire.  We can
guess that all these hurtling narratives will collide before the movie is
done, and they do.
        Kusturica likes to hurl as much as he can into the frame and then
simply move the camera about, allowing us to observe the chaos.  The screen
teems with life: a recurring band of gypsy musicians orchestrating scenes
with their infectious upbeat playing; a gaggle of geese often found
swirling about the feet of characters as they bustle about; a pig munching
on the rusted frame of an old car; the black and white cats of the title.
These anarchic presences crop up again and again, their vital chaotic
antics paralleling and parodying the profuse comic antics of the people.
        The whirligig motions of the plot somehow come to rest without
flying off in all directions in the film's centrepiece, a wild wedding
which is a splendid illustration of Kusturica's technique.  Dadan dances
about shooting a gun into the air, the absent-minded official gets the name
of the bride wrong, a tearful Ida displays the wedding presents to the
guests, Matko's dead father lies under a block of melting ice in the attic,
abd the coerced bride escapes by shuffling about the floor in an overturned
box, slipping through a trapdoor, and escaping into a nearby forest where
she hides in a tree-stump as the wedding party searches for her; Grga and
his sons approach from the other direction, leading to a fateful encounter.
The ever-present gypsy music pulses throughout, heartbeat of the film.
        The movie as a whole approaches the same level of delirious
unstoppable energy.  What saves it from becoming overbearing is the
rightness of the details.  Kusturica enriches the film with generous human
touches, like the delightful sequence in which Zare and Ida chase each
other through a field of sunflowers, performing a gradual striptease as
they go, radiant with young love; like the secret stash Zare's grandfather
has set aside because he knows Matko is too irresponsible to provide for
his son; like the hideous teeth of the two patriarchs, Grga and Matko's
father, rotting and gold-capped, emblematic of human weakness and
mortality.  The "anything goes" sensibility of the film is somewhat
deceiving: the madness is so entertaining only because it so carefully
nuanced.
        BLACK CAT, WHITE CAT is not a perfect film, but it never stays in
one place long enough for us to dwell on its imperfections.  Perhaps the
abundance of motion and music and madcap plotting, the sheer relentlessness
of the spectacle, could be said to disguise the thinness of
characterization and the thematic incoherence.  But who cares?  The
disguise, in this case, is all that matters.  BLACK CAT, WHITE CAT is a
celebration, a carnival, a parade of the grotesque and bawdy, and it is
only as good as it is gaudy, colourful, lively.  As far as those qualities
are concerned, you couldn't ask for more than this movie gives.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Da yue bing (1986)
"Only good men are fit to be soldiers."
Starring Huang Xueqi, Lu Lei, Wu Ruofu, Guan Kiang, Kang Hua, Sun Chun;
Directed by Chen Kaige;
Written by Gao Lili;
Cinematography by Zhang Yimou
        THE BIG PARADE is a fine movie by a great director, tainted by an
irony too bitter to stomach.  It is a celebration of the Communist spirit,
focusing not so much on the ideology--although it is ever-present--but
rather on the appeal of solidarity.  It shows us, convincingly, how people
are ennobled when they go the extra distance for the sake of a common
purpose.  Unfortunately, the individuals are soldiers, and the celebration,
the eponymous parade, takes place in Tiananmen Square--the site, of course,
of one of the Chinese government's most infamous acts.
        The film closes with rousing images--row after row of marching
soldiers, strutting proud across the Square, below a banner bearing the
stern fatherly countenance of Chairman Mao--but these images recall other
images, snapshots of the massacre: a white-shirted protestor standing his
ground before an advancing column of tanks; a hysterical blood-spattered
student confronting the impassive mien of a People's Liberation Army
soldier.  THE BIG PARADE perhaps intends to bring to mind notions of
"heavenly peace," but becomes, through the lens of history, an unwitting
mockery of those notions.
        That said, it is by no means an unworthy film, when taken out of
context.  It does not, however, compare with Chen Kaige's best work, and I
imagine he now views it with misgivings, given the disillusionment with
Communism manifest in his other work.  THE BIG PARADE chronicles the
preparations of a squad of soldiers prior to the military display in
Tiananmen, which marks the 35th anniversary of the People's Republic
parade.  The parade is televised, and although the men will be on TV for
mere minutes, they devote the preceding weeks to intense training.  During
those mere minutes, a nation will be watching, and they want to show that
nation that it can feel proud of itself.
        On the basis of THE BIG PARADE, the nation should feel proud: these
are fine people. We follow a half-dozen men through the film, and each must
face a personal crisis; a bow-legged soldier strives to overcome his
deficiency, a young soldier's mother dies and he must return home.  These
incidents evolve smoothly, without contrivance; Chen has a penchant for
melodrama, but here chooses understatement, nicely balancing the hyperbole
of the officers' military mindset.  The relationships among the men are
explored thoughtfully, with admirable tough-mindedness, and as the training
proceeds, some soldiers must be cut from the squadron.  The grace with
which those who are dismissed accept their failure is enviable.  There are
no villains here, only decent men, impelled by duty, pride, and brotherhood
to push themselves to the limit, and step down if their limit is
inadequate.  Were it not for real life, we might almost be convinced that,
as we are told, only good men are fit to be soldiers.
        The account of the training period includes several engrossing
set-pieces, the best of which, perhaps, is the depiction of an exercise
which has the squad standing at attention on a stretch of hot tarmac under
the blazing noonday sun, for two hours, with no shade.  Medics watch
intently as the soldiers sweat and strain, as legs buckle, and rush to tend
those who collapse, overcome by the heat.  Some, through teeth-grinding
willpower, remain upright for the whole two hours.  The entire gruelling
mesmerizing endeavour embodies some essential quality of human
stubbornness, as men endure the codified barbarism that passes for
"conditioning" in the army, for the sake of a parade which does not, except
as a matter of principle, require anything like this level of mental and
physical discipline.
        Chen and cinematographer Zhang Yimou embrace military iconography
with a zeal that is almost fetishistic.  From uniforms and set jaws,
precise ordered ranks, synchronized marching feet, they fabricate a vision
of solidarity that is urgent, seductive, striking.  Perhaps a convoluted
argument could be made that they somehow subvert these sub-fascist
displays, but when the sounds of the Shaanxi Philharmonic Orchestra swell
up over the rows of marching figures in the closing scenes, it is difficult
to find subversion, easy to find adulation.
        It may also be tempting, because it's easier, to see the film as
strictly an aesthetic artifact, to remove it from history, to ignore the
ideological issues that sully the serene waters of its surface.  But, like
Leni Riefenstahl's Nazi documentaries, the historical context is what THE
BIG PARADE is all about: it idealizes a particular set of beliefs at a
particular place and time, and those beliefs must be recognized for what
they are.  Indeed, many mainland Chinese films since THE BIG PARADE (or,
more to the point, since Tiananmen) are, in some sense, acts of
recognition, of response.  It is easier to understand, after seeing this
film, why it is almost redundant to call a Chinese movie tragic, for here
is a rarity, one that ends on a high note, on a moment of hope and
unity--and it is nothing but propaganda.

Title
Review for Ringu (1998)
        The producers of the RING movies have evidently done their
economics homework.  They know that if a movie surpasses box office records
throughout South-East Asia, as THE RING did, then a sequel should reap
immense financial rewards.  And so they put out a sequel, which wasn't hard
to do, because the ending of the first movie is plenty ambiguous.  And if
the sequel is open-ended, then there is always the possibility of a third
movie, and more profits.  And so THE RING 2, sequel to the splendid
original, is open-ended, and THE RING 3 is already in pre-production, even
though the first two movies have only just premiered in North America, and
it would all seem like a blatant cash-grab, if the movies weren't so good.
        THE RING 2, remarkably, is almost as effective as its
predecessor--indeed, if you are not already familiar with the basic
material, it may be just as fine, although I would guess that proper
appreciation of THE RING 2 depends on knowledge of the original.  That film
introduced us to the memorable figure of Sadako, a white-garbed ghost with
a twisted posture and long black hair which obscures her face in an
indefinably sinister manner, and to the deranging video tape which heralds
her presence and signals to those who watch it that they have only a week
left to live.
        In THE RING, a journalist and her ex-husband went looking for
Sadako after seeing the tape.  The focus here is on the journalist's young
son, one of her co-workers, and the ex-husband's teaching assistant, as
they too come under Sadako's curse and seek to extricate themselves before
she claims them.  The sequel does its best to take the material in new
directions, following up on loose ends from the original to provide us with
new twists such as a mute possessed child, some pseudo-scientific
mumbo-jumbo about "energy transference," and a woman who can see into the
next world.
        Nevertheless, the strengths of THE RING 2 are, by and large, the
strengths of the original.  There is the seriously creepy presence of
Sadako.  There are images from the disquieting video tape, judiciously
recycled to great effect.  And there is Hideo Nakata's direction, which is
crisp, methodical, and inobtrusively superb, although there are moments in
THE RING 2 which verge on cliché and diminish its understated power.  The
least successful scene, to my mind, is a close-up of unconvincing blood
seeping from the body of a woman run over by a car, complete with the dead
woman's voice whispering spectrally on the soundtrack.  But such moments of
stock-in-trade triteness are rare: mostly, the movie is unaffected and
convincing.
        Its success depends on maintaining that tone of conviction.  Nakata
approaches his material with unblinking solemnity, depicting it as if he
believes in it.  He does not undercut the suspense with overplayed humour
or self-referential winks.  The sense of menace is never diminished.  Early
on, there is an unnerving set-piece in the neurological ward of a hospital:
a patient affected by Sadako's spirit causes other women in the ward to
have violent hysterical fits, while the TV in the corner crackles with
static and scenes from the video interrupt the broadcast.  The sense of
disruption this scene causes does not abate afterward.  Nakata proceeds
smoothly from one scene to the next, always with the same meticulous
mise-en-scene, and the unwavering consistency of tone allows earlier events
to inform and amplify those that follow.
        The end result is that the movie is chilling even when we can guess
what's coming--the horror depends not on surprise but on intensity.  Nakata
has, unfortunately, refused to direct the third installment, although it is
probably a wise decision.  He has given us two remarkable films, but now
it's time to turn out the lights.  The producers, so concerned with
economics of sequels, would do well to consider the law of diminishing
returns, which applies to art as it does to commerce.  The first time, it
was very scary.  The second time, it is kinda scary.  The third time, it
will be redundant.
                Subjective Camera (subjective.freeservers.com)
        Movie Reviews by David Dalgleish (daviddalgleish@yahoo.com)

Title
Review for Ta'm e guilass (1997)
Starring Homayon Ershadi, Abdolrahman Bagheri, Afshin Khorshid 
Bakhtiari
Directed, Written, Produced & Edited by Abbas Kiarostami
Cinematography by Homayun Payvar
        His name is Mr. Badii; he used to be in the army.  And that, really, 
is all we know about him.  Yet he is the heart of Abbas Kiarostami's 
Palme d'Or co-winner, THE TASTE OF CHERRY; he is in every scene; he 
drives what little action there is.  We do know one other thing about 
him: he wants to commit suicide.  He says he is "exhausted" by his 
life, and cannot wait for God to end it, so he will end it himself.  
He will not explain his reasons, saying that others may comprehend him 
analytically, but could never know what he is feeling.
        He has chosen a peculiar way to die.  He has dug a hole in the hills 
overlooking Tehran, and he plans to lie down in it at night, after 
swallowing all his sleeping pills.  He will pay someone to come at 
dawn to see if he is still alive; if not, they will fill the grave for 
him.  He is offering a lot of money for this service.
        The plot--what little there is--consists largely of Mr. Badii's 
search for the person who will check on him in the morning.  We do not 
learn much about Mr. Badii (does he have a family? a job?), but that's 
okay, because the movie is also about the ways in which people respond 
to his strange request.  A shy young soldier just doesn't want to get 
involved; a seminary student will not assist a suicide for religious 
reasons; an older man, a taxidermist, agrees to help, because he needs 
the money for his sick child, but he also does his best to change Mr. 
Badii's mind, expounding a simple philosophy of life: wouldn't Mr. 
Badii miss watching the sunrise? the taste of mulberries?  These 
secondary characters--and others he encounters along the way--are 
superbly realized, and their response to Mr. Badii speaks volumes 
about who they are; it is fascinating to watch them.
        This is a calm, reflective, unhurried movie.  There are lots of 
silences and long, unbroken takes.  As Mr. Badii drives through the 
hills in his Range Rover, Kiarostami is content to let the camera 
linger on the vehicle as it meanders down hot, dusty backroads.  He is 
also content to let it linger on Mr. Badii's face while he drives, 
framed by the car window, sometimes speaking to one of his passengers, 
sometimes alone.  This relaxed, unforced approach to film-making is 
refreshing.  We see it so rarely in English-language films; they are 
always so busy, filled with dialogue, quick cuts, moving cameras, 
afraid to leave us room to think.  THE TASTE OF CHERRY gives us time 
to contemplate the little details, to fully absorb the images it 
presents.   Kiarostami will let the camera remain, static, watching 
Mr. Badii from behind as he sits smoking a cigarette, looking out at 
the night lights of Tehran, for a couple of minutes.  And it works.  
The sleepy rhythms of the film (and the mellifluous Iranian voices) 
are hypnotic; in some respects, it plays like WINGS OF DESIRE without 
the voice-overs, although THE TASTE OF CHERRY is much more 
naturalistic and earthbound.
        If the movie were a novel, one could imagine it being written by 
Virginia Woolf; it approaches cinema the way she approached the novel, 
developing themes and character in unconventional ways, not through 
narrative and dialogue, but relying instead on mood, on images and 
moments.  It evokes, but it never explains.  It is not 'about' 
anything that can simply be put into words.
        But it has its weaknesses: watching it, we know that the ending will 
be as ambiguous as Mr. Badii himself, but it turns out to be a little 
too coy, a little too self-aware.  And it was also a little too easy, 
I think, for Kiarostami to make Mr. Badii so utterly enigmatic.  By 
revealing so little about his central figure, Kiarostami comes 
perilously close to making him merely a symbol.  In this movie, which 
is so concrete, so rich with detail, it is odd that nothing is more 
vague than that which matters most: the life--and death--of Mr. Badii.  
Had less time been spent lingering on the landscape, and more spent 
revealing Mr. Badii, the film could have had more emotional weight. 
        Homayon Ershadi's flawless performance largely compensates for this 
deficiency, however, making the character real, down-to-earth, 
enigmatic but not abstract.  Much of the movie's power resides in that 
performance; Mr. Badii's face, his plight, are haunting, thanks to 
Ershadi's portrayal.  Indeed, after the film, I found myself wondering 
what I would do in a similar situation, if a man like Mr. Badii 
approached me with such an offer.  I did not know; I had never given 
it any thought before.  And that is the beauty of THE TASTE OF CHERRY: 
it gives us something intriguing to think about, gives us time to 
think about it, and does not try to do our thinking for us.

Title
Review for Lady from Shanghai, The (1948)
"Maybe I'll live so long that I'll forget her. Maybe I'll die trying."
Starring Orson Welles, Rita Hayworth, Everett Sloane, Glenn Anders,
Ted de Corsia;
Written & Directed by Orson Welles, from a novel by Sherwood King;
Cinematography by Charles Lawton, Jr.
        Orson Welles's THE LADY FROM SHANGHAI reveals, as usual, a director
much enamoured of his own genius.  It dresses up its plot with spectacular
flourishes which frame and punctuate and sometimes overshadow the action.
Crucial scenes are backdropped by the Acapulco coastline, an aquarium
filled with very predatory seeming fish, a play in a Chinese theatre, and
an abandoned amusement park.   But Welles has the talent to flaunt his own
skill and get away with it, and he does, for the most part: THE LADY FROM
SHANGHAI is a wonderful film to look at.
        The story itself is classic noir fare, and must have seemed rather
routine even in 1948.  Welles plays worldly Irishman Michael O'Hara, who
falls for a beautiful enigmatic dame, Elsa, who, as played by Rita
Hayworth, is so blonde, imperial, and frigid she could be a Hitchcock
heroine.  Elsa is married to Arthur Bannister, a rich crippled lawyer (the
scene-stealing Everett Sloane).  Michael, after rescuing Elsa from
ruffians, is hired as bosun on the Bannisters' yacht, where his life is
complicated by his infatuation with Elsa, the schemes of Bannister's
partner, and the suspicion of his detective.  The cruise from San Francisco
to Mexico and back is rife with tension.  Everyone's double-crossing
everyone, unsurprisingly.
        We are given variations on the eternal noir themes: lust, greed,
corruption, betrayal.  One can sense Welles tweaking the material, trying
to put his own spin on it, adding clever touches in the background.  It's
entertaining as hell, with tart dialogue and extravagant performances, but
it seems somewhat forced.  At times the director's grandstanding is too
distracting, no more so than in a wildly overplayed courtroom scene, which
features preposterous plot twists (Bannister cross-examines himself on the
witness stand) and odd comical twitches (a juror whose sneezes keep
interrupting the prosecutor).  It deflates the doom-laden atmosphere which
has been building thus far.
        Never mind: the film soon recovers.  The famous finale--a gunfight
staged in a hall of mirrors--is a magnificent piece of virtuoso
film-making, with faces fracturing and multiplying and overlapping other
faces in kaleidoscopic patterns.  The fragmentation of images perfectly
dramatizes the disintegration of the characters' identities, as they fail
to resolve the contradictory roles they have enacted in pursuit of their
tangled schemes.
        But, again, the directorial brilliance is too much.  It takes the
emphasis off the tense confrontation which lies at the heart of film noir,
when illusion is stripped away, when characters are forced to reckon with
the deceptions they have wrought and the lies they have believed.  As a
stage director, Welles should know when to let his actors do the work
rather than his camera, but as hearts are being laid bare, he is still
showing off.  It's mighty impressive, but lacks the stark immediacy of,
say, THE MALTESE FALCON.
        There are blackly intense scenes to be found, nonetheless.  The
relations amongst Bannister and his wife and his partner betoken a deep
cynicism about human behaviour, verbalized by Michael in a showy but
effective monologue about sharks killing each other in a feeding frenzy.
There is a quiet conversation between Bannister and Michael while awaiting
a trial verdict that goes straight for the gut in its unsoftened
representation of hate and moral bankruptcy.  But although it's noir, it's
not noir enough: as a whole, the movie feels like the work of an inspired
director elaborating on material he doesn't quite believe in.  The touch of
evil is never truly felt.
        Review by David Dalgleish (subjective.freeservers.com) -- January
25th, 2000

Title
Review for Huang tu di (1984)
"Of all us poor folk, girls are the saddest."
Starring Xue Bai, Wang Xueyin, Tan Tuo, Liu Quiang
Directed by Chen Kaige
Written by Chen and Zhang Ziliang, from a novel by Ke Lan
Cinematography by Zhang Yimou
        Fate has two aspects in YELLOW EARTH, and both are pitiless.  There 
is the fate decreed by nature, and there is the fate decreed by 
society.  Young Cuiqiao (Xue Bai), a teenage girl in the rural Chinese 
region of Shaanxi, struggles against both these forces.  She does not 
desire the marriage that has been arranged for her by her father.  She 
would leave if she could, but it's 200 miles to Yenan, where she might 
join the Communist Army and escape the role her father has assigned 
her.
        Society and the natural world conspire against her, but she is not 
even aware that other options exist until Gu (Wang Xueyin), a 
Communist, comes to stay in her farming community.  He has come to 
gather folk songs, to bring back as inspiration for the army.  He 
tells Cuiqiao about female comrades who crop their hair, who can fight 
the Japanese, who can read and write.  "They have great spirit!" he 
says.  "Oh," she replies, and she begins to consider the 
possibilities.
        Meanwhile, she and her father (Tan Tuo) and her brother (Liu Quiang) 
go about their lives, while Gu studies them, asks questions, watches 
them live off the land.  The land is an awesome presence in YELLOW 
EARTH, magnificent and imposing.  In the flow of the river, the 
expanse of the sky, the sweep of the mountainside, there is a sense of 
space and freedom; at the same time, these landscapes overwhelm the 
people, and there is a sense of entrapment.  They land provides for 
them, but they are also at its mercy.  
        We see water being gathered in buckets from the river, plough-blades 
turning up the earth: in these pastoral moments, the film surrenders 
to the rhythms of the natural world.  There is a bond with the earth, 
an intimacy.  It's not surprising that cinematographer Zhang Yimou 
grew up in this area: he sees it so vividly.  But nature can be harsh.  
There is a drought; the earth becomes dry and dusty; food becomes 
scarce.  The farmers pray for rain, and nature is oblivious.  
Meanwhile, Cuiqiao, trapped by the vast, indomitable landscape and the 
stifling social codes of her people, continues to weigh her options.  
Which fate is better?
        Cuiqiao's sister is married to a man who beats her.  Gu asks her 
father why she must live such a hard life.  "Fate," he replies, as if 
that explained everything.  In his mind, it does.  But this so-called 
"fate" is simply the refusal to allow for other possibilities; as 
such, it is merely another name for oppression.  Gu--who the film 
treats quite sympathetically--does not approve of the father's 
fatalism, but he too will fail Cuiqiao, and his failure is the failure 
of Communism.  The movie ends with a stirring Maoist song--"The 
Communist Party will save us all!"--played over an image that makes 
the words savagely ironic.  You need to see the movie to appreciate 
its full impact, but the censors who subjected the film to their 
humourless appraisal must have been immune to irony.  Gu and the 
father are both guilty of the same sin: they can change Cuiqiao's 
"fate," but they don't, because it is easier not to.  Nature may be 
harsh, but at least she plays fair.
        YELLOW EARTH is a landmark film.  With Zhang Junzhao's ONE AND EIGHT 
(1984), it launched the Fifth Generation of Chinese filmmakers.  Zhang 
Yimou was the cinematographer on both films, and has since become the 
best-known director of the group, who are probably the most exciting 
filmmakers currently at work.  On an artistic level, they're exciting 
because they make great movies, plain and simple.  On a political 
level, they're exciting because they manage to make bold, subversive 
statements despite their government's best efforts to prevent them.  
YELLOW EARTH is a wonderful work of art, but it's also a fascinating 
study in the ways political artists can express themselves, even when 
limited by rigid restrictions.
        Chen's later movies FAREWELL MY CONCUBINE and TEMPTRESS MOON were 
both banned in China, yet YELLOW EARTH escaped that fate, even though 
it manifests a profound disillusionment with Communism.  You can't do 
anything about a drought, but you can give the people of your 
country--or your daughter--a better life, if you choose to do so.  But 
the men in this movie are incapable of such a choice.  You'd have 
better luck praying to the gods for rain. 

Title
Review for Carne trémula (1997)
Starring Liberto Rabal, Francesca Neri, Javier Bardem, Ŕngela Molina, 
José Sancho
Directed by Pedro Almodóvar
Written by Almodóvar, Jorge Guerricaechevarria & Ray Lorriga
Cinematography by Affonso Beato
LIVE FLESH is as lurid and sensual as you'd expect, with a title like 
that.  It's a sultry melodrama populated by larger-than-life people, 
brought together by a series of far-fetched coincidences.  It is 
preposterous and outrageous, but by the time the final credits roll, 
you've actually come to care about these peculiar people and their 
mixed-up lives.  Pedro Almodóvar takes sensational material and, 
through a tricky artistic balancing act, manages to keep it both 
touching and wildly implausible, without ever becoming too sappy or 
too silly.
It is a tale of five criss-crossed lovers.  Sancho (José Sancho), an 
abusive, alcoholic cop, is married to Carla (Ŕngela Molina), who is 
cheating on him.  Victor (Liberto Rabal) had sex with a stoned Elena 
(Francesca Neri) in a public washroom a week before, and is determined 
that she honour a date she barely remembers agreeing to.  Sancho and 
his partner David (Javier Bardem) are called to Elena's apartment when 
Victor appears there, demanding that she go out on the date with him, 
and is then mortally offended when she tells him that he was a lousy 
lover and she isn't interested in him.  Four of the five characters 
meet, there is a struggle, and a gun is fired.
Fast forward several years.  Victor has just been released from 
prison, ending his sentence for the shooting of David.  David, 
paralyzed from the waist down, has become a wheelchair basketball star 
(this is one of many nice touches that give the movie its quirky 
allure) and is now married to Elena, who is living clean and helping 
deprived children.  Carla is still trapped in her marriage to the 
violent, possessive Sancho, and she begins an affair with Victor.  All 
five will feel the effects of that one gunshot for the rest of their 
lives, and those lives are irrevocably linked.
This plot could have been lifted straight from a weekday afternoon 
soap, with one major distinction: this soap opera is less than two 
hours long, even though it has enough sex and betrayals and reversals 
and confrontations to keep a daytime show running for a year or more.  
In other words, it keeps all the fun stuff, but leaves out the tedious 
exposition.  The atmosphere is fun too.  Almodóvar films Madrid 
lovingly, in bright colours, whether it be a verdant, sun-drenched 
cemetery or a city bus at night where a baby is being delivered.  He 
has an eye for sensuous details: the beads of sweat on lovers' bodies 
and the flash of gunpowder from a gun's muzzle are as important as any 
of the plot twists.  LIVE FLESH shares some of film noir's sensibility 
in the intoxicating way it combines moodiness and melodrama.
But as exuberant and over-the-top as it is, LIVE FLESH is also a 
trenchant examination of sexual politics, and Almodóvar does justice 
to the complexities of desire.  Several of the relationships have a 
sadomasochistic element--be it mental or physical--and, in all of 
them, what is called love is really a welter of guilt, insecurity, 
need, lust, and martyr complexes.  In his own inimitable fashion, the 
flamboyant Spanish director is exploring some murky territory here; he 
could easily get lost, but does not.  It helps that the women are not 
demure and passive, seeking only to please their men, as they so often 
are in American films.  No, here they have their own desires, and are 
not afraid to act on them, or speak about them--as Victor finds out in 
one tender, amusing scene, when Carla explains to him why he has a 
long, long way to go before he can become the Best Lover in the World, 
as he would like to be.
There is something absurdly touching about this hope of Victor's.  
His motivation is simply to prove to Elena--a woman he did not know, 
whom he had sex with only once--that he is not a bad lover.  This 
motivation, which drives the entire film, is the motivation of a hurt, 
insecure adolescent.  And here, I think, is the key to the movie's 
success: all these characters are, on some level, simply confused 
adolescents acting on desires they do not fully understand.  Their 
sometimes humourous, sometimes painful struggles are the struggles we 
have all been through, and you can't help but feel for them.
A Review by David Dalgleish (February 22/98)

Title
Review for Company of Wolves, The (1984)
"If there's a beast in men, it meets its match in women, too."
Starring Sarah Patterson, Angela Lansbury, Tusse Silberg, David Warner
Directed by Neil Jordan
Written by Jordan and Angela Carter, from a story by Carter
Cinematography by Bryan Loftus
        In recent years, there has been a trend in the field of fantasy: 
writers have been revisiting the fertile world of myth and fairy tale 
and reclaiming that world, investing it with new life and energy.  In 
modern times, fairy tales have become Disneyfied and debased; they 
have become trite adventures involving leering witches, friendly 
dwarves, and cuddly talking animals.  But in their original forms, 
fairy tales have a dark, wicked edge.  Crows tear out the eyes of 
Cinderella's sisters, a gorier fate then they receive in the animated 
version.  Hansel and Gretel relish cooking the witch in her own oven.  
Writers have become fascinated by the bloodier, morally ambivalent 
aspects of fairy tales, and are now modernizing the old stories while 
simultaneously going back to their roots.
        Before this trend was in vogue, Angela Carter--whose stories always 
have a dark, wicked, subversive edge--had been reinventing fairy tales 
for years.  In THE COMPANY OF WOLVES, she and Neil Jordan retell the 
story of Red Riding Hood, enlivening it with werewolves, Rolls Royces, 
and a visit from Satan. 
        The story is structured as a dream, occurring in the mind of Rosaleen 
(Sarah Patterson), an adolescent girl about whose 'real' life we learn 
very little.  Within the dream, there are a number of inset stories, 
most told by dream-Rosaleen's grandmother (Angela Lansbury), and these 
tales gloss the central story in intriguing, suggestive ways.  The 
result is a surprisingly successful example of a sinister, 
contemporary fairy tale.
        I say "surprisingly" because there are so many ways this film could 
have gone wrong.  And there are ways in which it does.  The 
performances are mediocre, except for Lansbury's--she finds the right 
note for the prim, apple-cheeked granny, the wise and stern teller of 
cautionary tales.  The soundtrack, synth-heavy, reminded me of bad 80s 
horror movies, as did the special effects in the shapechanging scenes.  
Probably state-of-the-art at the time, they are now laughable.
        But Jordan succeeds at what I consider the trickiest aspect of the 
film: he transcends the poor acting/music/effects and conveys a sense 
of the fantastic, of otherness.  One of the problems in adapting 
full-blown fantasies is that fantasy is often best left to the 
imagination of the reader, rather than being subjected to the 
'realism' of the screen.  Part of me would love to see an adaptation 
of 'The Lord of the Rings,' but, on the other hand, I know that any 
filmmaker's recreation of ents, hobbits, and balrogs is inevitably 
going to be really lame compared to what I picture in my mind.
        This makes Jordan's accomplishment here seem mighty impressive to me: 
he imbues THE COMPANY OF WOLVES with a genuine sense of magic and 
mystery.  The somewhat Ruritanian dreamworld becomes a kind of 
ur-reality.  The sunshine is exceptionally warm and abundant.  The 
nights are quiet and misty and eerie and ghostly.  The peasant village 
is rustic and cozy, the woods old and hoary.
        This archetypal realm is the setting for a smart, subtle, literate 
script, a script which is as good as you'd expect from Jordan (himself 
an accomplished fiction writer) and Carter.  For Carter, the cauldron 
of story is a witches' brew, bubbling over with primal ingredients: 
mist-shrouded forests, ancient graveyards, virginal girls and wise 
women, wolves with glowing eyes.  She adeptly blends them all 
together.  There is a symbolic richness to the film; everything is 
permeated with a sense of significance.
        The point of it all, I think, is to represent a girl's 
rites-of-passage on an unconscious, primordial level.  A night-journey 
through the forest, from the village to the grandmother's home, is the 
crux of THE COMPANY OF WOLVES.  "Don't stray from the path," Rosaleen 
is told, again and again, and the path is both literal and figurative: 
the path through the forest and the path of life.   Staying on the 
path is the conventional approach suggested by Rosaleen's elders.  
Carter and Jordan, never conventional, explore what goes on when you 
leave the path.
        Those who stray will supposedly meet with a dark fate.  This fate is 
literalized in the dream as werewolves, but the werewolves connote 
many things: death, sex, knowledge.  If straying from the path leads 
to death, then it's not a good idea--but if that's what you have to 
risk to get sex and knowledge (and therefore power), then maybe it's 
worth the risk.  When you leave the path, the world becomes a 
dangerous, ambiguous place, but it's full of potential.  And it's 
certainly more interesting than the Disney version.
